Hence, home, you idle creatures, get you home.
What, know you not,
    Being mechanical, you ought not walk
    Upon a laboring day without the sign
    Of your profession?
You, sir, what trade are you?
Truly, sir, in respect of a fine workman, I am
    but, as you would say, a cobbler.
Nay, I beseech you, sir, be not out with me; yet,
    if you be out, sir, I can mend you.
Why, sir, cobble you.
You blocks, you stones, you worse than senseless things!
O you hard hearts, you cruel men of Rome,
    Knew you not Pompey?
Many a time and oft
    Have you climb'd up to walls and battlements,  
    To towers and windows, yea, to chimney tops,
    Your infants in your arms, and there have sat
    The livelong day with patient expectation
    To see great Pompey pass the streets of Rome.
And when you saw his chariot but appear,
    Have you not made an universal shout
    That Tiber trembled underneath her banks
    To hear the replication of your sounds
    Made in her concave shores?
And do you now put on your best attire?
And do you now cull out a holiday?
And do you now strew flowers in his way
    That comes in triumph over Pompey's blood?
Go you down that way towards the Capitol;
    This way will I.
Disrobe the images
    If you do find them deck'd with ceremonies.
I'll about
    And drive away the vulgar from the streets;
    So do you too, where you perceive them thick.
Stand you directly in Antonio's way,
    When he doth run his course.
A soothsayer you beware the ides of March.
Will you go see the order of the course?
I pray you, do.
Let me not hinder, Cassius, your desires;
    I'll leave you.
Brutus, I do observe you now of late;
    I have not from your eyes that gentleness
    And show of love as I was wont to have;
    You bear too stubborn and too strange a hand
    Over your friend that loves you.
Vexed I am
    Of late with passions of some difference,
    Conceptions only proper to myself,
    Which give some soil perhaps to my behaviors;
    But let not therefore my good friends be grieved-
    Among which number, Cassius, be you one-
    Nor construe any further my neglect
    Than that poor Brutus with himself at war
    Forgets the shows of love to other men.
Tell me, good Brutus, can you see your face?
'Tis just,
    And it is very much lamented, Brutus,
    That you have no such mirrors as will turn
    Your hidden worthiness into your eye
    That you might see your shadow.
Into what dangers would you lead me, Cassius,
    That you would have me seek into myself
    For that which is not in me?
Therefore, good Brutus, be prepared to hear,
    And since you know you cannot see yourself
    So well as by reflection, I your glass  
    Will modestly discover to yourself
    That of yourself which you yet know not of.
And be not jealous on me, gentle Brutus;
    Were I a common laugher, or did use
    To stale with ordinary oaths my love
    To every new protester, if you know
    That I do fawn on men and hug them hard
    And after scandal them, or if you know
    That I profess myself in banqueting
    To all the rout, then hold me dangerous.
Ay, do you fear it?
Then must I think you would not have it so.
But wherefore do you hold me here so long?
What is it that you would impart to me?
I know that virtue to be in you, Brutus,
    As well as I do know your outward favor.
I cannot tell what you and other men
    Think of this life, but, for my single self,
    I had as lief not be as live to be
    In awe of such a thing as I myself.
I was born free as Caesar, so were you;
    We both have fed as well, and we can both
    Endure the winter's cold as well as he.
O, you and I have heard our fathers say
    There was a Brutus once that would have brook'd
    The eternal devil to keep his state in Rome
    As easily as a king.
That you do love me, I am nothing jealous;
    What you would work me to, I have some aim.
How I have thought of this and of these times,
    I shall recount hereafter; for this present,
    I would not, so with love I might entreat you,  
    Be any further moved.
What you have said
    I will consider; what you have to say
    I will with patience hear, and find a time
    Both meet to hear and answer such high things.
As they pass by, pluck Casca by the sleeve,
    And he will, after his sour fashion, tell you
    What hath proceeded worthy note today.
But, look you, Cassius,
    The angry spot doth glow on Caesar's brow,  
    And all the rest look like a chidden train:
    Calpurnia's cheek is pale, and Cicero
    Looks with such ferret and such fiery eyes
    As we have seen him in the Capitol,
    Being cross'd in conference by some senators.
You pull'd me by the cloak; would you speak with me?
Why, you were with him, were you not?
I saw Mark Antony offer him a
    crown (yet 'twas not a crown neither, 'twas one of these
    coronets) and, as I told you, he put it by once.
But, soft, I pray you, what, did Caesars wound?
No, Caesar hath it not, but you, and I,
    And honest Casca, we have the falling sickness.
I know not what you mean by that, but I am sure Caesar fell
    down.
Nay, an I tell you that, I'll ne'er look you i' the face
    again; but those that understood him smiled at one another and
    shook their heads; but for mine own part, it was Greek to me.
I
    could tell you more news too: Marullus and Flavius, for pulling
    scarfs off Caesar's images, are put to silence.
Fare you well.
Will you sup with me tonight, Casca?
Will you dine with me tomorrow?
Good, I will expect you.
For this time I will leave you.
Tomorrow, if you please to speak with me,
    I will come home to you, or, if you will,
    Come home to me and I will wait for you.
Brought you Caesar home?
Why are you breathless, and why stare you so?
Are not you moved, when all the sway of earth
    Shakes like a thing unfirm?
Why, saw you anything more wonderful?
A common slave- you know him well by sight-
    Held up his left hand, which did flame and burn  
    Like twenty torches join'd, and yet his hand
    Not sensible of fire remain'd unscorch'd.
He doth, for he did bid Antonio
    Send word to you he would be there tomorrow.
For my part, I have walk'd about the streets,
    Submitting me unto the perilous night,
    And thus unbraced, Casca, as you see,
    Have bared my bosom to the thunderstone;
    And when the cross blue lightning seem'd to open  
    The breast of heaven, I did present myself
    Even in the aim and very flash of it.
But wherefore did you so much tempt the heavens?
You are dull, Casca, and those sparks of life
    That should be in a Roman you do want,
    Or else you use not.
But if you would consider the true cause
    Why all these fires, why all these gliding ghosts,
    Why birds and beasts from quality and kind,
    Why old men, fools, and children calculate,
    Why all these things change from their ordinance,
    Their natures, and preformed faculties
    To monstrous quality, why, you shall find
    That heaven hath infused them with these spirits
    To make them instruments of fear and warning  
    Unto some monstrous state.
'Tis Caesar that you mean, is it not, Cassius?
Therein, ye gods, you make the weak most strong;
    Therein, ye gods, you tyrants do defeat.
Now know you, Casca, I have moved already
    Some certain of the noblest-minded Romans
    To undergo with me an enterprise
    Of honorable-dangerous consequence;
    And I do know by this, they stay for me
    In Pompey's Porch.
Cinna, where haste you so?
To find out you.
Yes, you are.
O Cassius, if you could
    But win the noble Brutus to our party-
  CASSIUS.
Be you content.
Good Cinna, take this paper,
    And look you lay it in the praetor's chair,
    Where Brutus may but find it; and throw this  
    In at his window; set this up with wax
    Upon old Brutus' statue.
All this done,
    Repair to Pompey's Porch, where you shall find us.
All but Metellus Cimber, and he's gone
    To seek you at your house.
Well, I will hie
    And so bestow these papers as you bade me.
Come, Casca, you and I will yet ere day
    See Brutus at his house.
Call'd you, my lord?
Get you to bed again, it is not day.
Sir, 'tis your brother Cassius at the door,
    Who doth desire to see you.
Do you know them?
Good morrow, Brutus, do we trouble you?
Know I these men that come along with you?
Yes, every man of them, and no man here
    But honors you, and every one doth wish
    You had but that opinion of yourself
    Which every noble Roman bears of you.
You shall confess that you are both deceived.
We shall find of him
    A shrewd contriver; and you know his means,
    If he improve them, may well stretch so far
    As to annoy us all, which to prevent,
    Let Antony and Caesar fall together.
I wonder none of you have thought of him.
We'll leave you, Brutus,
    And, friends, disperse yourselves, but all remember
    What you have said and show yourselves true Romans.
And so, good morrow to you every one.
Portia, what mean you?
Wherefore rise you now?
have ungently, Brutus,
    Stole from my bed; and yesternight at supper
    You suddenly arose and walk'd about,
    Musing and sighing, with your arms across;
    And when I ask'd you what the matter was,
    You stared upon me with ungentle looks.
I urged you further; then you scratch'd your head,
    And too impatiently stamp'd with your foot.
Yet I insisted, yet you answer'd not,
    But with an angry waiter of your hand
    Gave sign for me to leave you.
It will not let you eat, nor talk, nor sleep,
    And, could it work so much upon your shape
    As it hath much prevail'd on your condition,
    I should not know you, Brutus.
No, my Brutus,
    You have some sick offense within your mind,
    Which by the right and virtue of my place
    I ought to know of; and, upon my knees,
    I charm you, by my once commended beauty,
    By all your vows of love and that great vow
    Which did incorporate and make us one,
    That you unfold to me, yourself, your half,
    Why you are heavy and what men tonight
    Have had resort to you; for here have been
    Some six or seven, who did hide their faces
    Even from darkness.
I should not need, if you were gentle Brutus.
Within the bond of marriage, tell me, Brutus,
    Is it excepted I should know no secrets  
    That appertain to you?
Am I yourself
    But, as it were, in sort or limitation,
    To keep with you at meals, comfort your bed,
    And talk to you sometimes?
Think you I am no stronger than my sex,
    Being so father'd and so husbanded?
Here is a sick man that would speak with you.
O, what a time have you chose out, brave Caius,
    To wear a kerchief!
Would you were not sick!
Such an exploit have I in hand, Ligarius,
    Had you a healthful ear to hear of it.
Set on your foot,
    And with a heart new-fired I follow you,
    To do I know not what; but it sufficeth
    That Brutus leads me on.
What mean you, Caesar?
Think you to walk forth?
They would not have you to stir forth today.
Call it my fear
    That keeps you in the house and not your own.
We'll send Mark Antony to the Senate House,
    And he shall say you are not well today.
I come to fetch you to the Senate House.
And you are come in very happy time
    To bear my greeting to the senators
    And tell them that I will not come today.
But, for your private satisfaction,
    Because I love you, I will let you know.
Your statue spouting blood in many pipes,
    In which so many smiling Romans bathed,
    Signifies that from you great Rome shall suck
    Reviving blood, and that great men shall press
    For tinctures, stains, relics, and cognizance.
And this way have you well expounded it.
I have, when you have heard what I can say.
If you shall send them word you will not come,
    Their minds may change.
Pardon me, Caesar, for my dear dear love
    To your proceeding bids me tell you this,
    And reason to my love is liable.
What, Brutus, are you stirr'd so early too?
Caius Ligarius,
    Caesar was ne'er so much your enemy
    As that same ague which hath made you lean.
I thank you for your pains and courtesy.
Now, Cinna; now, Metellus; what, Trebonius,
    I have an hour's talk in store for you;
    Remember that you call on me today;
    Be near me, that I may remember you.
If thou beest not immortal, look
    about you.
And so return to you, and nothing else?
Good morrow to you.
Trebonius doth desire you to o'er read,
    At your best leisure, this his humble suit.
What, urge you your petitions in the street?
Fare you well.
Trebonius knows his time, for, look you, Brutus,
    He draws Mark Antony out of the way.
Casca, you are the first that rears your hand.
I could be well moved, if I were as you;
    If I could pray to move, prayers would move me;
    But I am constant as the northern star,
    Of whose true-fix'd and resting quality
    There is no fellow in the firmament.
I know not, gentlemen, what you intend,
    Who else must be let blood, who else is rank.
I do beseech ye, if you bear me hard,
    Now, whilst your purpled hands do reek and smoke,
    Fulfill your pleasure.
Live a thousand years,
    I shall not find myself so apt to die;
    No place will please me so, no means of death,
    As here by Caesar, and by you cut off,
    The choice and master spirits of this age.
Though now we must appear bloody and cruel,
    As, by our hands and this our present act
    You see we do, yet see you but our hands
    And this the bleeding business they have done.
Our hearts you see not; they are pitiful;
    And pity to the general wrong of Rome-
    As fire drives out fire, so pity pity-
    Hath done this deed on Caesar.
For your part,
    To you our swords have leaden points, Mark Antony;
    Our arms in strength of malice, and our hearts
    Of brothers' temper, do receive you in
    With all kind love, good thoughts, and reverence.
Only be patient till we have appeased
    The multitude, beside themselves with fear,
    And then we will deliver you the cause
    Why I, that did love Caesar when I struck him,
    Have thus proceeded.
First, Marcus Brutus, will I shake with you;
    Next, Caius Cassius, do I take your hand;
    Now, Decius Brutus, yours; now yours, Metellus;
    Yours, Cinna; and, my valiant Casca, yours;
    Though last, not least in love, yours, good Trebonius.
My credit now stands on such slippery ground,
    That one of two bad ways you must conceit me,
    Either a coward or a flatterer.
I blame you not for praising Caesar so;
    But what compact mean you to have with us?
Will you be prick'd in number of our friends,
    Or shall we on, and not depend on you?
Friends am I with you all and love you all,
    Upon this hope that you shall give me reasons
    Why and wherein Caesar was dangerous.
Our reasons are so full of good regard
    That were you, Antony, the son of Caesar,
    You should be satisfied.
Brutus, a word with you.
] You know not what you do.
Know you how much the people may be moved
    By that which he will utter?
Mark Antony, here, take you Caesar's body.
You shall not in your funeral speech blame us,
    But speak all good you can devise of Caesar,
    And say you do't by our permission,
    Else shall you not have any hand at all
    About his funeral.
And you shall speak
    In the same pulpit whereto I am going,
    After my speech is ended.
You serve Octavius Caesar, do you not?
He did receive his letters, and is coming,
    And bid me say to you by word of mouth-
    O Caesar!
Cassius, go you into the other street
    And part the numbers.
Hear me for my cause, and be
    silent, that you may hear.
Believe me for mine honor, and have  
    respect to mine honor, that you may believe.
Censure me in your
    wisdom, and awake your senses, that you may the better judge.
Had you rather Caesar were living and die all slaves, than
    that Caesar were dead to live all freemen?
I have done no more to Caesar
    than you shall do to Brutus.
Here comes his body, mourned by Mark Antony, who, though he had
    no hand in his death, shall receive the benefit of his dying, a
    place in the commonwealth, as which of you shall not?
I do entreat you, not a man depart,
    Save I alone, till Antony have spoke.
For Brutus' sake, I am beholding to you.
The noble Brutus
    Hath told you Caesar was ambitious;
    If it were so, it was a grievous fault,
    And grievously hath Caesar answer'd it.
You all did love him once, not without cause;
    What cause withholds you then to mourn for him?
If I were disposed to stir
    Your hearts and minds to mutiny and rage,
    I should do Brutus wrong and Cassius wrong,
    Who, you all know, are honorable men.
I will not do them wrong; I rather choose
    To wrong the dead, to wrong myself and you,
    Than I will wrong such honorable men.
Have patience, gentle friends, I must not read it;
    It is not meet you know how Caesar loved you.
You are not wood, you are not stones, but men;
    And, being men, hearing the will of Caesar,
    It will inflame you, it will make you mad.
'Tis good you know not that you are his heirs,
    For if you should, O, what would come of it!
Will you be patient?
Will you stay awhile?
I have o'ershot myself to tell you of it.
Then make a ring about the corse of Caesar,
    And let me show you him that made the will.
And will you give me leave?
If you have tears, prepare to shed them now.
Look, in this place ran Cassius' dagger through;
    See what a rent the envious Casca made;
    Through this the well-beloved Brutus stabb'd;
    And as he pluck'd his cursed steel away,
    Mark how the blood of Caesar follow'd it,
    As rushing out of doors, to be resolved
    If Brutus so unkindly knock'd, or no;
    For Brutus, as you know, was Caesar's angel.
Judge, O you gods, how dearly Caesar loved him!
Then I, and you, and all of us fell down,
    Whilst bloody treason flourish'd over us.
O, now you weep, and I perceive you feel
    The dint of pity.
Kind souls, what weep you when you but behold
    Our Caesar's vesture wounded?
Look you here,
    Here is himself, marr'd, as you see, with traitors.
Good friends, sweet friends, let me not stir you up
    To such a sudden flood of mutiny.
They are wise and honorable,
    And will, no doubt, with reasons answer you.
I am no orator, as Brutus is;
    But, as you know me all, a plain blunt man,
    That love my friend, and that they know full well
    That gave me public leave to speak of him.
I only speak right on;
    I tell you that which you yourselves do know;
    Show you sweet Caesar's wounds, poor dumb mouths,
    And bid them speak for me.
Why, friends, you go to do you know not what.
Alas, you know not; I must tell you then.
You have forgot the will I told you of.
Moreover, he hath left you all his walks,
    His private arbors, and new-planted orchards,
    On this side Tiber; he hath left them you,
    And to your heirs forever- common pleasures,
    To walk abroad and recreate yourselves.
Whither are you going?
Where do you dwell?
Are you a married man or a bachelor?
Ay, and truly, you were best.
Your brother too must die; consent you, Lepidus?
But, Lepidus, go you to Caesar's house,
    Fetch the will hither, and we shall determine
    How to cut off some charge in legacies.
What, shall I find you here?
So you thought him,
    And took his voice who should be prick'd to die  
    In our black sentence and proscription.
Octavius, I have seen more days than you,
    And though we lay these honors on this man
    To ease ourselves of divers slanderous loads,
    He shall but bear them as the ass bears gold,
    To groan and sweat under the business,
    Either led or driven, as we point the way;
    And having brought our treasure where we will,
    Then take we down his load and turn him off,
    Like to the empty ass, to shake his ears
    And graze in commons.
He is at hand, and Pindarus is come
    To do you salutation from his master.
A word, Lucilius,
    How he received you.
Most noble brother, you have done me wrong.
Judge me, you gods!
Brutus, this sober form of yours hides wrongs,
    And when you do them-
  BRUTUS.
Cassius, be content,
    Speak your griefs softly, I do know you well.
Bid them move away;
    Then in my tent, Cassius, enlarge your griefs,
    And I will give you audience.
Lucilius, do you the like, and let no man
    Come to our tent till we have done our conference.
That you have wrong'd me doth appear in this:
    You have condemn'd and noted Lucius Pella
    For taking bribes here of the Sardians,
    Wherein my letters, praying on his side,
    Because I knew the man, were slighted off.
Let me tell you, Cassius, you yourself
    Are much condemn'd to have an itching palm,
    To sell and mart your offices for gold
    To undeservers.
You know that you are Brutus that speaks this,
    Or, by the gods, this speech were else your last.
Go to, you are not, Cassius.
I say you are not.
Go show your slaves how choleric you are,
    And make your bondmen tremble.
Must I observe you?
By the gods,
    You shall digest the venom of your spleen,
    Though it do split you, for, from this day forth,
    I'll use you for my mirth, yea, for my laughter,
    When you are waspish.
You say you are a better soldier:
    Let it appear so, make your vaunting true,  
    And it shall please me well.
You wrong me every way, you wrong me, Brutus.
If you did, I care not.
For your life you durst not.
You have done that you should be sorry for.
I did send to you
    For certain sums of gold, which you denied me,  
    For I can raise no money by vile means.
I did send
    To you for gold to pay my legions,
    Which you denied me.
I denied you not.
I do not, till you practise them on me.
Be angry when you will, it shall have scope;
    Do what you will, dishonor shall be humor.
O Cassius, you are yoked with a lamb,
    That carries anger as the flint bears fire,
    Who, much enforced, shows a hasty spark
    And straight is cold again.
Do you confess so much?
Have not you love enough to bear with me
    When that rash humor which my mother gave me
    Makes me forgetful?
Yes, Cassius, and from henceforth,
    When you are overearnest with your Brutus,
    He'll think your mother chides, and leave you so.
For shame, you generals!
What do you mean?
Get you hence, sirrah; saucy fellow, hence!
And come yourselves and bring Messala with you
    Immediately to us.
I did not think you could have been so angry.
Of your philosophy you make no use,
    If you give place to accidental evils.
How 'scaped killing when I cross'd you so?
No more, I pray you.
Had you your letters from your wife, my lord?
Why ask you?
Hear you aught of her in yours?
Now, as you are a Roman, tell me true.
I have as much of this in art as you,
    But yet my nature could not bear it so.
What do you think
    Of marching to Philippi presently?
I pray you, sirs, lie in my tent and sleep;
    It may be I shall raise you by and by
    On business to my brother Cassius.
So please you, we will stand and watch your pleasure.
Ay, my lord, an't please you.
Why did you so cry out, sirs, in your sleep?
Ay, saw you anything?
Prepare you, generals.
Why do you cross me in this exigent?
I do not cross you, but I will do so.
Not that we love words better, as you do.
In your bad strokes, Brutus, you give good words.
Witness the hole you made in Caesar's heart,
    Crying "Long live!
O, yes, and soundless too,
    For you have stol'n their buzzing, Antony,
    And very wisely threat before you sting.
O you flatterers!
Look,
    I draw a sword against conspirators;
    When think you that the sword goes up again?
If you dare fight today, come to the field;  
    If not, when you have stomachs.
Hark, a word with you.
What are you then determined to do?
Where did you leave him?
Hie you, Messala,
    And I will seek for Pindarus the while.
Friends, I owe moe tears
    To this dead man than you shall see me pay.
When you do find him, or alive or dead,
    He will be found like Brutus, like himself.
This is not Brutus, friend, but, I assure you,
    A prize no less in worth.
Farewell to you, and you, and you, Volumnius.
So, fare you well at once, for Brutus' tongue
    Hath almost ended his life's history.
Fare you well, my lord.
Free from the bondage you are in, Messala:
    The conquerors can but make a fire of him;
    For Brutus only overcame himself,
    And no man else hath honor by his death.
Ay, if Messala will prefer me to you.
I cannot conceive you.
Do you smell a fault?
- Do you know this noble gentleman,
     Edmund?
I must love you, and sue to know you better.
Our son of Cornwall,
     And you, our no less loving son of Albany,
     We have this hour a constant will to publish
     Our daughters' several dowers, that future strife
     May be prevented now.
Tell me, my daughters
     (Since now we will divest us both of rule,
     Interest of territory, cares of state),
     Which of you shall we say doth love us most?
Sir, I love you more than words can wield the matter;
     Dearer than eyesight, space, and liberty;
     Beyond what can be valued, rich or rare;  
     No less than life, with grace, health, beauty, honour;
     As much as child e'er lov'd, or father found;
     A love that makes breath poor, and speech unable.
Beyond all manner of so much I love you.
- Now, our joy,
     Although the last, not least; to whose young love
     The vines of France and milk of Burgundy
     Strive to be interest; what can you say to draw
     A third more opulent than your sisters?
Good my lord,
     You have begot me, bred me, lov'd me; I
     Return those duties back as are right fit,
     Obey you, love you, and most honour you.
Why have my sisters husbands, if they say
     They love you all?
I do invest you jointly in my power,
     Preeminence, and all the large effects
     That troop with majesty.
Ourself, by monthly course,  
     With reservation of an hundred knights,
     By you to be sustain'd, shall our abode
     Make with you by due turns.
The sway,
     Revenue, execution of the rest,
     Beloved sons, be yours; which to confirm,
     This coronet part betwixt you.
Thus Kent, O princes, bids you all adieu;
     He'll shape his old course in a country new.
My Lord of Burgundy,
     We first address toward you, who with this king
     Hath rivall'd for our daughter.
What in the least
     Will you require in present dower with her,
     Or cease your quest of love?
Most royal Majesty,
     I crave no more than hath your Highness offer'd,
     Nor will you tender less.
Will you, with those infirmities she owes,
     Unfriended, new adopted to our hate,
     Dow'r'd with our curse, and stranger'd with our oath,
     Take her, or leave her?
Then leave her, sir; for, by the pow'r that made me,
     I tell you all her wealth.
[To France] For you, great King,
     I would not from your love make such a stray
     To match you where I hate; therefore beseech you
     T' avert your liking a more worthier way
     Than on a wretch whom nature is asham'd
     Almost t' acknowledge hers.
I yet beseech your Majesty,
     If for I want that glib and oily art
     To speak and purpose not, since what I well intend,
     I'll do't before I speak- that you make known
     It is no vicious blot, murther, or foulness,
     No unchaste action or dishonoured step,
     That hath depriv'd me of your grace and favour;
     But even for want of that for which I am richer-
     A still-soliciting eye, and such a tongue
     As I am glad I have not, though not to have it
     Hath lost me in your liking.
My Lord of Burgundy,
     What say you to the lady?
Will you have her?
I am sorry then you have so lost a father
     That you must lose a husband.
The jewels of our father, with wash'd eyes
     Cordelia leaves you.
I know you what you are;
     And, like a sister, am most loath to call  
     Your faults as they are nam'd.
So farewell to you both.
Let your study
     Be to content your lord, who hath receiv'd you
     At fortune's alms.
You have obedience scanted,
     And well are worth the want that you have wanted.
Well may you prosper!
That's most certain, and with you; next month with us.
Pray you let's hit together.
Why so earnestly seek you to put up that letter?
What paper were you reading?
I beseech you, sir, pardon me.
If our father would sleep till I
     wak'd him, you should enjoy half his revenue for ever, and live
     the beloved of your brother,
                                                        'EDGAR.
'Sleep till I wak'd him, you should enjoy half
     his revenue.
When came this to you?
Hath he never before sounded you in this business?
If it shall please you to suspend
     your indignation against my brother till you can derive from him
     better testimony of his intent, you should run a certain course;
     where, if you violently proceed against him, mistaking his
     purpose, it would make a great gap in your own honour and shake  
     in pieces the heart of his obedience.
Think you so?
If your honour judge it meet, I will place you where you shall
     hear us confer of this and by an auricular assurance have your
     satisfaction, and that without any further delay than this very
     evening.
Edmund, seek him out; wind me into him, I pray
     you; frame the business after your own wisdom.
I will seek him, sir, presently; convey the business as I
     shall find means, and acquaint you withal.
What serious contemplation are you
     in?
Do you busy yourself with that?
I promise you, the effects he writes of succeed unhappily: as
     of unnaturalness between the child and the parent; death,
     dearth, dissolutions of ancient amities; divisions in state,
     menaces and maledictions against king and nobles; needless
     diffidences, banishment of friends, dissipation of cohorts,
     nuptial breaches, and I know not what.
How long have you been a sectary astronomical?
When saw you my father last?
Spake you with him?
Parted you in good terms?
Found you no displeasure in him by
     word or countenance
  Edg.
Bethink yourself wherein you may have offended him; and at my
     entreaty forbear his presence until some little time hath
     qualified the heat of his displeasure, which at this instant so
     rageth in him that with the mischief of your person it would
     scarcely allay.
I pray you have a continent forbearance till
     the speed of his rage goes slower; and, as I say, retire with me
     to my lodging, from whence I will fitly bring you to hear my
     lord speak.
If you do stir abroad,
     go arm'd.
Brother, I advise you to the best.
I am no honest man
     if there be any good meaning toward you.
I have told you what I  
     have seen and heard; but faintly, nothing like the image and
     horror of it.
Pray you, away!
Shall I hear from you anon?
I do serve you in this business.
If you come slack of former services,
     You shall do well; the fault of it I'll answer.
Put on what weary negligence you please,
     You and your fellows.
And let his knights have colder looks among you.
No, sir; but you have that in your countenance which I would
     fain call master.
Go you and call my fool hither.
You, you, sirrah, where's my daughter?
So please you-                                      Exit.
My lord, I know not what the matter is; but to my judgment
     your Highness is not entertain'd with that ceremonious affection
     as you were wont.
I beseech you pardon me, my lord, if I be mistaken; for
     my duty cannot be silent when I think your Highness wrong'd.
Go you and tell my
     daughter I would speak with her.
] Go you, call
     hither my fool.
O, you, sir, you!
Come you hither, sir.
you
     slave!
you cur!
Do you bandy looks with me, you rascal?
Nor tripp'd neither, you base football player?
I'll teach you differences.
If you will measure your lubber's length again, tarry; but
     away!
Have you wisdom?
Sirrah, you were best take my coxcomb.
Then 'tis like the breath of an unfeed lawyer- you gave me
     nothing for't.
Can you make no use of nothing, nuncle?
When were you wont to be so full of songs, sirrah?
An you lie, sirrah, we'll have you whipp'd.
Methinks you
     are too much o' late i' th' frown.
So your face
     bids me, though you say nothing.
Sir,
     I had thought, by making this well known unto you,
     To have found a safe redress, but now grow fearful,
     By what yourself, too, late have spoke and done,
     That you protect this course, and put it on
     By your allowance; which if you should, the fault
     Would not scape censure, nor the redresses sleep,
     Which, in the tender of a wholesome weal,  
     Might in their working do you that offence
     Which else were shame, that then necessity
     Must call discreet proceeding.
For you know, nuncle,

          The hedge-sparrow fed the cuckoo so long
          That it had it head bit off by it young.
Are you our daughter?
Come, sir,
     I would you would make use of that good wisdom
     Whereof I know you are fraught, and put away
     These dispositions that of late transform you
     From what you rightly are.
I do beseech you
     To understand my purposes aright.
As you are old and reverend, you should be wise.
Here do you keep a hundred knights and squires;
     Men so disorder'd, so debosh'd, and bold
     That this our court, infected with their manners,
     Shows like a riotous inn.
Be then desir'd
     By her that else will take the thing she begs  
     A little to disquantity your train,
     And the remainder that shall still depend
     To be such men as may besort your age,
     Which know themselves, and you.
- O, sir, are you come?
My lord, I am guiltless, as I am ignorant
     Of what hath mov'd you.
- Old fond eyes,
     Beweep this cause again, I'll pluck ye out,
     And cast you, with the waters that you lose,
     To temper clay.
Do you mark that, my lord?
I cannot be so partial, Goneril,
     To the great love I bear you -
  Gon.
Pray you, content.
Well, you may fear too far.
What, have you writ that letter to my sister?
Take you some company, and away to horse!
Get you gone,
     And hasten your return.
Go you before to Gloucester with these letters.
Acquaint my
     daughter no further with anything you know than comes from her
     demand out of the letter.
If your diligence be not speedy, I
     shall be there afore you.
And you, sir.
Pray you, what are they?
Have you heard of no likely wars toward 'twixt the two Dukes
     of Cornwall and Albany?
Fare you well, sir.
Intelligence is given where you are hid.
Have you not spoken 'gainst the Duke of Cornwall?
Have you nothing said
     Upon his party 'gainst the Duke of Albany?
In cunning I must draw my sword upon you.
Draw, seem to defend yourself; now quit you well.
Edmund, I hear that you have shown your father
     A childlike office.
He did bewray his practice, and receiv'd
     This hurt you see, striving to apprehend him.
Make your own purpose,
     How in my strength you please.
For you, Edmund,
     Whose virtue and obedience doth this instant
     So much commend itself, you shall be ours.
I shall serve you, sir,  
     Truly, however else.
You know not why we came to visit you-
  Reg.
I serve you, madam.
] Draw, you rogue!
I'll make a sop o' th'
     moonshine o' you.
Draw, you whoreson cullionly barbermonger!
Draw, you rascal!
Draw, you rogue, or I'll so carbonado your shanks!
Draw, you
     rascal!
Strike, you slave!
Stand, you neat slave!
With you, goodman boy, an you please!
No marvel, you have so bestirr'd your valour.
My lord, if
     you'll give me leave, I will tread this unbolted villain into
     mortar and daub the walls of a jakes with him.
'Spare my grey
     beard,' you wagtail?
You beastly knave, know you no reverence?
Smile you my speeches, as I were a fool?
Goose, an I had you upon Sarum Plain,
     I'ld drive ye cackling home to Camelot.
How fell you out?
To go out of my dialect, which you discommend so much.
He that beguil'd you in a plain
     accent was a plain knave, which, for my part, I will not be,
     though I should win your displeasure to entreat me to't.
What was th' offence you gave him?
You stubborn ancient knave, you reverent braggart,
     We'll teach you-
  Kent.
I serve the King;
     On whose employment I was sent to you.
Give you good morrow!
Made you no more offence but what you speak of?
Where learn'd you this, fool?
I would have all well betwixt you.
Good morrow to you both.
Regan, I think you are; I know what reason
     I have to think so.
[To Kent] O, are you free?
I pray you, sir, take patience.
O, sir, you are old!
Nature in you stands on the very verge
     Of her confine.
You should be rul'd, and led
     By some discretion that discerns your state
     Better than you yourself.
Therefore I pray you
     That to our sister you do make return;
     Say you have wrong'd her, sir.
Do you but mark how this becomes the house:
     'Dear daughter, I confess that I am old.
On my knees I beg
     That you'll vouchsafe me raiment, bed, and food.
Return you to my sister.
so will you wish on me
     When the rash mood is on.
If you do love old men, if your sweet sway
     Allow obedience- if yourselves are old,
     Make it your cause!
O sides, you are too tough!
Will you yet hold?
Did you?
I pray you, father, being weak, seem so.
I look'd not for you yet, nor am provided
     For your fit welcome.
Give ear, sir, to my sister;
     For those that mingle reason with your passion
     Must be content to think you old, and so-
     But she knows what she does.
What should you need of more?
Why might not you, my lord, receive attendance
     From those that she calls servants, or from mine?
If you will come to me
     (For now I spy a danger), I entreat you
     To bring but five-and-twenty.
I gave you all-
  Reg.
And in good time you gave it!
Made you my guardians, my depositaries;
     But kept a reservation to be followed
     With such a number.
What, must I come to you
     With five-and-twenty, Regan?
Said you so?
What need you five-and-twenty, ten, or five,
     To follow in a house where twice so many
     Have a command to tend you?
You see me here, you gods, a poor old man,
     As full of grief as age; wretched in both.
If it be you that stirs these daughters' hearts
     Against their father, fool me not so much
     To bear it tamely; touch me with noble anger,
     And let not women's weapons, water drops,
     Stain my man's cheeks!
No, you unnatural hags!
I will have such revenges on you both  
     That all the world shall- I will do such things-
     What they are yet, I know not; but they shall be
     The terrors of the earth!
I know you.
Sir, I do know you,
     And dare upon the warrant of my note
     Commend a dear thing to you.
Now to you:
     If on my credit you dare build so far  
     To make your speed to Dover, you shall find
     Some that will thank you, making just report
     Of how unnatural and bemadding sorrow
     The King hath cause to plain.
I am a gentleman of blood and breeding,
     And from some knowledge and assurance offer
     This office to you.
I will talk further with you.
If you shall see Cordelia
     (As fear not but you shall), show her this ring,
     And she will tell you who your fellow is
     That yet you do not know.
Have you no more to say?
You cataracts and hurricanoes, spout
     Till you have drench'd our steeples, drown'd the cocks!
I tax not you, you elements, with unkindness.
I never gave you kingdom, call'd you children,
     You owe me no subscription.
But yet I call you servile ministers,
     That will with two pernicious daughters join
     Your high-engender'd battles 'gainst a head
     So old and white as this!
Alas, sir, are you here?
Gracious my lord, hard by here is a hovel;
     Some friendship will it lend you 'gainst the tempest.
Repose you there, whilst I to this hard house
     (More harder than the stones whereof 'tis rais'd,
     Which even but now, demanding after you,
     Denied me to come in) return, and force
     Their scanted courtesy.
Go to; say you nothing.
Go you and
     maintain talk with the Duke, that my charity be not of him
     perceived.
Pray you be careful.
Poor naked wretches, wheresoe'er you are,
     That bide the pelting of this pitiless storm,
     How shall your houseless heads and unfed sides,
     Your loop'd and window'd raggedness, defend you
     From seasons such as these?
Off, off, you lendings!
What is't you seek?
What are you there?
Though their injunction be to bar my doors
     And let this tyrannous night take hold upon you,
     Yet have I ventur'd to come seek you out
     And bring you where both fire and food is ready.
Let me ask you one word in private.
O, cry you mercy, sir.
Take him you on.
If the matter of this paper be certain, you have mighty
     business in hand.
I will not be
     long from you.
Now, you she-foxes!
How do you, sir?
Stand you not so amaz'd.
Will you lie down and rest upon the cushions?
[To Kent] You are o' th' commission,
     Sit you too.
Cry you mercy, I took you for a joint-stool.
Sir, where is the patience now
     That you so oft have boasted to retain?
Avaunt, you curs!
[To Edgar] You, sir- I entertain you for one of my  
     hundred; only I do not like the fashion of your garments.
Edmund, keep you our sister
     company.
Advise the Duke where you
     are going, to a most festinate preparation.
Unmerciful lady as you are, I am none.
What will you do?
Come, sir, what letters had you late from France?
And what confederacy have you with the traitors
     Late footed in the kingdom?
To whose hands have you sent the lunatic King?
If you see vengeance-
  1.
I have serv'd you ever since I was a child;
     But better service have I never done you
     Than now to bid you hold.
How now, you dog?
If you did wear a beard upon your chin,
     I'ld shake it on this quarrel.
What do you mean?
My lord, you have one eye left
     To see some mischief on him.
How look you?
I told him you were coming:
     His answer was, 'The worse.
[to Edmund] Then shall you go no further.
Ere long you are like to hear
     (If you dare venture in your own behalf)
     A mistress's command.
What have you done?
Tigers, not daughters, what have you perform'd?
A father, and a gracious aged man,
     Whose reverence even the head-lugg'd bear would lick,
     Most barbarous, most degenerate, have you madded.
Could my good brother suffer you to do it?
This shows you are above,
     You justicers, that these our nether crimes
     So speedily can venge!
Why the King of France is so suddenly gone back know you the
     reason?
Of Albany's and Cornwall's powers you heard not?
Well, sir, I'll bring you to our master Lear
     And leave you to attend him.
When I am known aright, you shall not grieve
     Lending me this acquaintance.
I pray you go
     Along with me.
All blest secrets,  
     All you unpublish'd virtues of the earth,
     Spring with my tears!
Might not you
     Transport her purposes by word?
I know you are of her bosom.
Therefore I do advise you take this note.
If you do find him, pray you give him this;  
     And when your mistress hears thus much from you,
     I pray desire her call her wisdom to her.
If you do chance to hear of that blind traitor,
     Preferment falls on him that cuts him off.
Hark, do you hear the sea?
Set me where you stand.
O you mighty gods!
Ho you, sir!
Hear you, sir?
What are you, sir?
Feel you your legs?
Upon the crown o' th' cliff what thing was that
     Which parted from you?
That thing you speak of,
     I took it for a man.
O, ho, are you there with me?
Yet you see how this world goes.
Come, come, I am a king;
     My masters, know you that?
You are a royal one, and we obey you.
Nay, an you get it, you shall get it
     by running.
Sir, speed you.
Do you hear aught, sir, of a battle toward?
I thank you sir.
I thank you, sir
                                               Exit [Gentleman].
You ever-gentle gods, take my breath from me;
     Let not my worser spirit tempt me again
     To die before you please!
Well pray you, father.
Now, good sir, what are you?
Give me your hand;
     I'll lead you to some biding.
Chill be plain with you.
Sit you down, father; rest you.
Come, father, I'll bestow you with a friend.
My boon I make it that you know me not
     Till time and I think meet.
O you kind gods,
     Cure this great breach in his abused nature!
Please you draw near.
Had you not been their father, these white flakes
     Had challeng'd pity of them.
Madam, do you; 'tis fittest.
Sir, do you know me?
When did you die?
No, sir, you must not kneel.
Methinks I should know you, and know this man;
     Yet I am doubtful; for I am mainly ignorant  
     What place this is; and all the skill I have
     Remembers not these garments; nor I know not
     Where I did lodge last night.
If you have poison for me, I will drink it.
I know you do not love me; for your sisters
     Have, as I do remember, done me wrong.
Pray you now, forget and forgive.
Fare you well, sir.
Now, sweet lord,
     You know the goodness I intend upon you.
Tell me- but truly- but then speak the truth-
     Do you not love my sister?
But have you never found my brother's way
     To the forfended place?
That thought abuses you.
I am doubtful that you have been conjunct  
     And bosom'd with her, as far as we call hers.
Sir, you speak nobly.
I shall attend you presently at your tent.
Sister, you'll go with us?
Pray you go with us.
I'll overtake you.
Before you fight the battle, ope this letter.
If you have victory, let the trumpet sound  
     For him that brought it.
If you miscarry,
     Your business of the world hath so an end,
     And machination ceases.
Fortune love you!
Here is the guess of their true strength and forces
     By diligent discovery; but your haste
     Is now urg'd on you.
If ever I return to you again,
     I'll bring you comfort.
Grace go with you, sir!
Sir, you have show'd to-day your valiant strain,
     And fortune led you well.
We do require them of you, so to use them
     As we shall find their merits and our safety
     May equally determine.
With him I sent the Queen,
     My reason all the same; and they are ready
     To-morrow, or at further space, t' appear
     Where you shall hold your session.
Sir, by your patience,
     I hold you but a subject of this war,
     Not as a brother.
Methinks our pleasure might have been demanded
     Ere you had spoke so far.
That were the most if he should husband you.
That eye that told you so look'd but asquint.
Mean you to enjoy him?
If you will marry, make your loves to me;
     My lady is bespoke.
He that dares approach,
     On him, on you, who not?
What are you?
and why you answer
     This present summons?
I perceive you know it.
What, you have charg'd me with, that have I done,
     And more, much more.
Where have you hid yourself?
How have you known the miseries of your father?
This speech of yours hath mov'd me,
     And shall perchance do good; but speak you on;
     You look as you had something more to say.
O, you are men of stone.
A plague upon you, murderers, traitors all!
Who are you?
I'll tell you straight.
Are you not Kent?
He's a good fellow, I can tell you that.
For us, we will resign,
     During the life of this old Majesty,
     To him our absolute power; [to Edgar and Kent] you to your
        rights;
     With boot, and Such addition as your honours
     Have more than merited.
Pray you undo this button.
Thank you, sir.
Do you see this?
[To Kent and Edgar] Friends of my soul, you
        twain
     Rule in this realm, and the gor'd state sustain.
Therefore, brave conquerors- for so you are
    That war against your own affections
    And the huge army of the world's desires-
    Our late edict shall strongly stand in force:
    Navarre shall be the wonder of the world;
    Our court shall be a little Academe,
    Still and contemplative in living art.
If you are arm'd to do as sworn to do,
    Subscribe to your deep oaths, and keep it too.
Let me say no, my liege, an if you please:
    I only swore to study with your Grace,
    And stay here in your court for three years' space.
Things hid and barr'd, you mean, from common sense?
Light, seeking light, doth light of light beguile;  
    So, ere you find where light in darkness lies,
    Your light grows dark by losing of your eyes.
At Christmas I no more desire a rose
    Than wish a snow in May's new-fangled shows;
    But like of each thing that in season grows;
    So you, to study now it is too late,
    Climb o'er the house to unlock the little gate.
No, my good lord; I have sworn to stay with you;
    And though I have for barbarism spoke more
    Than for that angel knowledge you can say,
    Yet confident I'll keep what I have swore,
    And bide the penance of each three years' day.
'
    This article, my liege, yourself must break;
    For well you know here comes in embassy
    The French king's daughter, with yourself to speak-
    A mild of grace and complete majesty-
    About surrender up of Aquitaine  
    To her decrepit, sick, and bedrid father;
    Therefore this article is made in vain,
    Or vainly comes th' admired princess hither.
What say you, lords?
Our court, you know, is haunted
    With a refined traveller of Spain,
    A man in all the world's new fashion planted,
    That hath a mint of phrases in his brain;
    One who the music of his own vain tongue
    Doth ravish like enchanting harmony;
    A man of complements, whom right and wrong
    Have chose as umpire of their mutiny.
How you delight, my lords, I know not, I;
    But I protest I love to hear him lie,
    And I will use him for my minstrelsy.
Signior Arme- Arme- commends you.
There's villainy abroad;
    this letter will tell you more.
Will you hear this letter with attention?
Of other men's secrets, I beseech you.
Me, an't shall please you; I am Antony Dull.
But, sirrah, what say you to
    this?
Did you hear the proclamation?
Sir, I will pronounce your sentence: you shall fast a week
    with bran and water.
How mean you, sir?
Speak you this in my praise, master?
Then I am sure you know how much the gross sum of deuce-ace
    amounts to.
Now here is three
    studied ere ye'll thrice wink; and how easy it is to put 'years'
    to the word 'three,' and study three years in two words, the
    dancing horse will tell you.
[Aside] To prove you a cipher.
Then if she fear, or be to blame,
               By this you shall not know;
             For still her cheeks possess the same
               Which native she doth owe.
Sir, the Duke's pleasure is that you keep Costard safe; and
    you must suffer him to take no delight nor no penance; but 'a
    must fast three days a week.
Fare you well.
Lord, how wise you are!
So I heard you say.
Fair weather after you!
I am more bound to you than your fellows, for they are but
    lightly rewarded.
Come, you transgressing slave, away.
Be now as prodigal of all dear grace
    As Nature was in making graces dear,
    When she did starve the general world beside
    And prodigally gave them all to you.
Beauty is bought by judgment of the eye,
    Not utt'red by base sale of chapmen's tongues;  
    I am less proud to hear you tell my worth
    Than you much willing to be counted wise
    In spending your wit in the praise of mine.
Therefore to's seemeth it a needful course,
    Before we enter his forbidden gates,
    To know his pleasure; and in that behalf,
    Bold of your worthiness, we single you
    As our best-moving fair solicitor.
Know you the man?
Navarre had notice of your fair approach,
    And he and his competitors in oath
    Were all address'd to meet you, gentle lady,
    Before I came.
Marry, thus much I have learnt:
    He rather means to lodge you in the field,
    Like one that comes here to besiege his court,
    Than seek a dispensation for his oath,
    To let you enter his unpeopled house.
'Fair' I give you back again; and 'welcome' I
    have not yet.
YOU Will the sooner that I were away,
    For you'll prove perjur'd if you make me stay.
Did not I dance with you in Brabant once?
Did not I dance with you in Brabant once?
I know you did.
'Tis long of you, that spur me with such questions.
And send you many lovers!
Amen, so you be none.
I do protest I never heard of it;
    And, if you prove it, I'll repay it back
    Or yield up Aquitaine.
Boyet, you can produce acquittances
    For such a sum from special officers
    Of Charles his father.
So please your Grace, the packet is not come,
    Where that and other specialties are bound;
    To-morrow you shall have a sight of them.
You may not come, fair Princess, within my gates;
    But here without you shall be so receiv'd
    As you shall deem yourself lodg'd in my heart,
    Though so denied fair harbour in my house.
To-morrow shall we visit you again.
Lady, I will commend you to mine own heart.
Pray you, do my commendations;  
    I would be glad to see it.
I would you heard it groan.
Sir, I pray you, a word: what lady is that same?
Monsieur, fare you well.
I beseech you a word: what is she in the white?
A woman sometimes, an you saw her in the light.
Pray you, sir, whose daughter?
Farewell to me, sir, and welcome to you.
It was well done of you to take him at his
    word.
So you grant pasture for me.
Methought all his senses were lock'd in his eye,
    As jewels in crystal for some prince to buy;
    Who, tend'ring their own worth from where they were glass'd,
    Did point you to buy them, along as you pass'd.
I'll give you Aquitaine and all that is his,
    An you give him for my sake but one loving kiss.
Do you hear, my mad wenches?
What, then; do you see?
Master, will you win your love with a French brawl?
No, my complete master; but to jig off a tune at the tongue's
    end, canary to it with your feet, humour it with turning up your
    eyelids, sigh a note and sing a note, sometime through the
    throat, as if you swallowed love with singing love, sometime
    through the nose, as if you snuff'd up love by smelling love,
    with your hat penthouse-like o'er the shop of your eyes, with
    your arms cross'd on your thin-belly doublet, like a rabbit on a
    spit, or your hands in your pocket, like a man after the old
    painting; and keep not too long in one tune, but a snip and away.
These are complements, these are humours; these betray nice  
    wenches, that would be betrayed without these; and make them men
    of note- do you note me?
But have you forgot your love?
By heart you love her, because your heart cannot come by
    her; in heart you love her, because your heart is in love with
    her; and out of heart you love her, being out of heart that you
    cannot enjoy her.
Marry, sir, you must send the ass upon the horse, for he is
    very slow-gaited.
Now will I begin your moral, and do you follow with my l'envoy.
A good l'envoy, ending in the goose; would you desire more?
Then call'd you for the l'envoy.
Thus came your argument in;
    Then the boy's fat l'envoy, the goose that you bought;
    And he ended the market.
I will tell you sensibly.
True, true; and now you will be my purgation, and let me
    loose.
'- 'No, I'll give
    you a remuneration.
Pray you, sir, how much carnation ribbon may a man buy for
    a remuneration?
God be wi' you!
When would you have it done, sir?
Well, I will do it, sir; fare you well.
Hereby, upon the edge of yonder coppice;
    A stand where you may make the fairest shoot.
Nothing but fair is that which you inherit.
God dig-you-den all!
Pray you, which is the head lady?
Are not you the chief woman?
Boyet, you can carve.
Did you ever hear better?
I told you: my lord.
Shall I teach you to know?
Come, come, you talk greasily; your lips grow foul.
She's too hard for you at pricks, sir; challenge her to
    bowl.
The deer was, as you know, sanguis, in blood; ripe as
    the pomewater, who now hangeth like a jewel in the ear of caelo,
    the sky, the welkin, the heaven; and anon falleth like a crab on
    the face of terra, the soil, the land, the earth.
You two are book-men: can you tell me by your wit
    What was a month old at Cain's birth that's not five weeks old as
      yet?
Sir Nathaniel, will you hear an extemporal epitaph on
    the death of the deer?
Perge, good Master Holofernes, perge, so it shall please
    you to abrogate scurrility.
Sir, I praise the Lord for you, and so may my
    parishioners; for their sons are well tutor'd by you, and their
    daughters profit very greatly under you.
God give you good morrow, Master Person.
I
    beseech you read it.
But, damosella virgin,
    was this directed to you?
Sir, you have done this in the fear of God, very
    religiously; and, as a certain father saith-
  HOLOFERNES.
But to return to the verses: did they please you, Sir
    Nathaniel?
I do dine to-day at the father's of a certain pupil of
    mine; where, if, before repast, it shall please you to gratify
    the table with a grace, I will, on my privilege I have with the
    parents of the foresaid child or pupil, undertake your ben  
    venuto; where I will prove those verses to be very unlearned,
    neither savouring of poetry, wit, nor invention.
And thank you too; for society, saith the text, is the
    happiness of life.
[To DULL] Sir, I do invite you too; you shall not say me nay:
    pauca verba.
By earth, she is not, corporal: there you lie.
[Advancing] Come, sir, you blush; as his, your case is such.
I have been closely shrouded in this bush,
    And mark'd you both, and for you both did blush.
I heard your guilty rhymes, observ'd your fashion,
    Saw sighs reek from you, noted well your passion.
But are you not ashamed?
Nay, are you not,
    All three of you, to be thus much o'ershot?
Not you by me, but I betrayed to you.
I that am honest, I that hold it sin
    To break the vow I am engaged in;
    I am betrayed by keeping company
    With men like you, men of inconstancy.
When shall you see me write a thing in rhyme?
When shall you hear that I
    Will praise a hand, a foot, a face, an eye,
    A gait, a state, a brow, a breast, a waist,  
    A leg, a limb-
  KING.
If it mar nothing neither,
    The treason and you go in peace away together.
What is in you?
[ To COSTARD] Ah, you whoreson loggerhead, you were born
      to do me shame.
That you three fools lack'd me fool to make up the mess;
    He, he, and you- and you, my liege!
O, dismiss this audience, and I shall tell you more.
' quoth you.
'Twere good yours did; for, sir, to tell you plain,
    I'll find a fairer face not wash'd to-day.
Have at you, then, affection's men-at-arms.
Consider what you first did swear unto:
    To fast, to study, and to see no woman-
    Flat treason 'gainst the kingly state of youth.
Say, can you fast?
And, where that you you have vow'd to study, lords,
    In that each of you have forsworn his book,
    Can you still dream, and pore, and thereon look?
For when would you, my lord, or you, or you,
    Have found the ground of study's excellence
    Without the beauty of a woman's face?
For when would you, my liege, or you, or you,
    In leaden contemplation have found out
    Such fiery numbers as the prompting eyes
    Of beauty's tutors have enrich'd you with?
Then fools you were these women to forswear;
    Or, keeping what is sworn, you will prove fools.
be first advis'd,  
    In conflict, that you get the sun of them.
I praise God for you, sir.
[To HOLOFERNES] Monsieur, are you not lett'red?
Do you not educate youth at the charge-house on the
    top of the mountain?
The word is well
    cull'd, chose, sweet, and apt, I do assure you, sir, I do assure.
Now, understanding that the
    curate and your sweet self are good at such eruptions and sudden
    breaking-out of mirth, as it were, I have acquainted you withal,  
    to the end to crave your assistance.
Sir, you shall present before her the Nine Worthies.
Where will you find men worthy enough to present them?
So, if any of the audience hiss, you may
    cry 'Well done, Hercules; now thou crushest the snake!
Shall I tell you a thing?
I beseech you,
    follow.
Look you what I have from the loving King.
Had she been light, like you,
    Of such a merry, nimble, stirring spirit,
    She might 'a been a grandam ere she died.
And so may you; for a light heart lives long.
Look what you do, you do it still i' th' dark.
So do not you; for you are a light wench.
Indeed, I weigh not you; and therefore light.
O, that's you care not for me.
But, Rosaline, you have a favour too?
I would you knew.
But, Katharine, what was sent to you from fair
    Dumain?
Did he not send you twain?
Love doth approach disguis'd,
    Armed in arguments; you'll be surpris'd.
Under the cool shade of a sycamore  
    I thought to close mine eyes some half an hour;
    When, lo, to interrupt my purpos'd rest,
    Toward that shade I might behold addrest
    The King and his companions; warily
    I stole into a neighbour thicket by,
    And overheard what you shall overhear-
    That, by and by, disguis'd they will be here.
And change you favours too; so shall your loves
    Woo contrary, deceiv'd by these removes.
Be gone, you rogue.
What would you with the Princess?
She says you have it, and you may be gone.
They say that they have measur'd many a mile
    To tread a measure with you on this grass.
If to come hither you have measur'd miles,
    And many miles, the Princess bids you tell
    How many inches doth fill up one mile.
How many weary steps
    Of many weary miles you have o'ergone
    Are numb'red in the travel of one mile?
We number nothing that we spend for you;
    Our duty is so rich, so infinite,  
    That we may do it still without accompt.
Nay, you must do it soon.
Will you not dance?
How come you thus estranged?
Since you are strangers, and come here by chance,  
    We'll not be nice; take hands.
Price you yourselves.
Then cannot we be bought; and so adieu-
    Twice to your visor and half once to you.
If you deny to dance, let's hold more chat.
Nay, then, two treys, an if you grow so nice,
    Metheglin, wort, and malmsey; well run dice!
Since you can cog, I'll play no more with you.
Will you vouchsafe with me to change a word?
Say you so?
Please it you,
    As much in private, and I'll bid adieu.
I know the reason, lady, why you ask.
Look how you butt yourself in these sharp mocks!
Will you give horns, chaste lady?
One word in private with you ere I die.
Bleat softly, then; the butcher hears you cry.
Farewell, mad wenches; you have simple wits.
Will they not, think you, hang themselves to-night?
Lord Longaville said I came o'er his heart;
    And trow you what he call'd me?
But will you hear?
Good madam, if by me you'll be advis'd,  
    Let's mock them still, as well known as disguis'd.
Fair sir, God save you!
Construe my speeches better, if you may.
Then wish me better; I will give you leave.
We came to visit you, and purpose now
    To lead you to our court; vouchsafe it then.
Rebuke me not for that which you provoke.
You nickname virtue: vice you should have
      spoke;
    For virtue's office never breaks men's troth.
O, you have liv'd in desolation here,
    Unseen, unvisited, much to our shame.
This proves you wise and rich, for in my eye-
  BEROWNE.
But that you take what doth to you belong,
    It were a fault to snatch words from my tongue.
I cannot give you less.
Which of the vizards was it that you wore?
Why demand you this?
Why look you pale?
Sans 'sans,' I pray you.
These lords are visited; you are not free,
    For the Lord's tokens on you do I see.
It is not so; for how can this be true,
    That you stand forfeit, being those that sue?
Peace; for I will not have to do with you.
Were not you here but even now, disguis'd?
And were you well advis'd?
When you then were here,
    What did you whisper in your lady's ear?
When she shall challenge this, you will reject
    her.
Peace, peace, forbear;
    Your oath once broke, you force not to forswear.
What mean you, madam?
By heaven, you did; and, to confirm it plain,
    You gave me this; but take it, sir, again.
What, will you have me, or your pearl again?
Much upon this it is; [To BOYET] and might not you
    Forestall our sport, to make us thus untrue?
Do not you know my lady's foot by th' squier,
    And laugh upon the apple of her eye?
Go, you are allow'd;
    Die when you will, a smock shall be your shroud.
You leer upon me, do you?
You cannot beg us, sir, I can assure you, sir; we know what we
      know;
    I hope, sir, three times thrice, sir-
  BEROWNE.
O Lord, sir, it were pity you should get your living by  
    reck'ning, sir.
Nay, my good lord, let me o'errule you now.
Why ask you?
I wish you the peace of mind, most royal couplement!
You lie, you are not he.
Your nose says, no, you are not; for it stands to right.
Most true, 'tis right, you were so, Alisander.
[To Sir Nathaniel] O, Sir, you have overthrown Alisander
    the conqueror!
[Sir Nathaniel retires] There, an't shall please you, a foolish
    mild man; an honest man, look you, and soon dash'd.
you see how 'tis- a little o'erparted.
The more shame for you, Judas!
What mean you, sir?
Begin, sir; you are my elder.
But you have outfac'd them all.
Faith, unless you play the honest Troyan, the poor wench
    is cast away.
I bepray you, let me borrow my
    arms again.
Master, let me take you a buttonhole lower.
Do you not see
    Pompey is uncasing for the combat?
What mean you?
What reason have you for 't?
God save you, madam!
Madam, not so; I do beseech you stay.
I thank you, gracious lords,
    For all your fair endeavours, and entreat,
    Out of a new-sad soul, that you vouchsafe
    In your rich wisdom to excuse or hide
    The liberal opposition of our spirits,
    If over-boldly we have borne ourselves
    In the converse of breath- your gentleness
    Was guilty of it.
I understand you not; my griefs are double.
We to ourselves prove false,
    By being once false for ever to be true
    To those that make us both- fair ladies, you;
    And even that falsehood, in itself a sin,
    Thus purifies itself and turns to grace.
No, no, my lord, your Grace is perjur'd much,
    Full of dear guiltiness; and therefore this,
    If for my love, as there is no such cause,
    You will do aught- this shall you do for me:
    Your oath I will not trust; but go with speed
    To some forlorn and naked hermitage,
    Remote from all the pleasures of the world;
    There stay until the twelve celestial signs
    Have brought about the annual reckoning.
You must he purged too, your sins are rack'd;
    You are attaint with faults and perjury;
    Therefore, if you my favour mean to get,  
    A twelvemonth shall you spend, and never rest,
    But seek the weary beds of people sick.
A beard, fair health, and honesty;
    With threefold love I wish you all these three.
O, shall I say I thank you, gentle wife?
Come when the King doth to my lady come;
    Then, if I have much love, I'll give you some.
The liker you; few taller are so young.
Oft have I heard of you, my Lord Berowne,
    Before I saw you; and the world's large tongue
    Proclaims you for a man replete with mocks,
    Full of comparisons and wounding flouts,
    Which you on all estates will execute
    That lie within the mercy of your wit.
To weed this wormwood from your fruitful brain,
    And therewithal to win me, if you please,
    Without the which I am not to be won,
    You shall this twelvemonth term from day to day
    Visit the speechless sick, and still converse
    With groaning wretches; and your task shall be,
    With all the fierce endeavour of your wit,
    To enforce the pained impotent to smile.
A jest's prosperity lies in the ear
    Of him that hears it, never in the tongue
    Of him that makes it; then, if sickly ears,
    Deaf'd with the clamours of their own dear groans,
    Will hear your idle scorns, continue then,
    And I will have you and that fault withal.
But if they will not, throw away that spirit,
    And I shall find you empty of that fault,
    Right joyful of your reformation.
No, madam; we will bring you on your way.
But, most esteemed greatness, will you
    hear the dialogue that the two learned men have compiled in
    praise of the Owl and the Cuckoo?
Live you?
or are you aught
    That man may question?
You should be women,
    And yet your beards forbid me to interpret
    That you are so.
Speak, if you can.
What are you?
Good sir, why do you start, and seem to fear
    Things that do sound so fair?
To me you speak not.
If you can look into the seeds of time,
    And say which grain will grow and which will not,
    Speak then to me, who neither beg nor fear
    Your favors nor your hate.
Stay, you imperfect speakers, tell me more.
Say from whence
    You owe this strange intelligence, or why
    Upon this blasted heath you stop our way
    With such prophetic greeting?
Speak, I charge you.
Why do you dress me
    In borrow'd robes?
[Aside to Banquo] Do you not hope your children shall be kings,
    When those that gave the Thane of Cawdor to me
    Promised no less to them?
] That, trusted home,
    Might yet enkindle you unto the crown,
    Besides the Thane of Cawdor.
But 'tis strange;  
    And oftentimes, to win us to our harm,
    The instruments of darkness tell us truths,
    Win us with honest trifles, to betray's
    In deepest consequence-
    Cousins, a word, I pray you.
] Two truths are told,
    As happy prologues to the swelling act
    Of the imperial theme-I thank you, gentlemen.
Sons, kinsmen, thanes,
    And you whose places are the nearest, know
    We will establish our estate upon
    Our eldest, Malcolm, whom we name hereafter
    The Prince of Cumberland; which honor must
    Not unaccompanied invest him only,
    But signs of nobleness, like stars, shall shine
    On all deservers.
From hence to Inverness,
    And bind us further to you.
The rest is labor, which is not used for you.
So please you, it is true; our Thane is coming.
Come, you spirits
    That tend on mortal thoughts, unsex me here
    And fill me from the crown to the toe top-full
    Of direst cruelty!
He that's coming
    Must be provided for; and you shall put
    This night's great business into my dispatch,
    Which shall to all our nights and days to come
    Give solely sovereign sway and masterdom.
Herein I teach you
    How you shall bid God 'ield us for your pains,
    And thank us for your trouble.
Why have you left the chamber?
Know you not he has?
Was the hope drunk
    Wherein you dress'd yourself?
What beast wast then  
    That made you break this enterprise to me?
When you durst do it, then you were a man,
    And, to be more than what you were, you would
    Be so much more the man.
Nor time nor place
    Did then adhere, and yet you would make both.
They have made themselves, and that their fitness now
    Does unmake you.
I have given suck and know
    How tender 'tis to love the babe that milks me-
    I would, while it was smiling in my face,
    Have pluck'd my nipple from his boneless gums
    And dash'd the brains out had I so sworn as you
    Have done to this.
When in swinish sleep
    Their drenched natures lie as in a death,
    What cannot you and I perform upon
    The unguarded Duncan?
I dreamt last night of the three weird sisters:
    To you they have show'd some truth.
I think not of them;
    Yet, when we can entreat an hour to serve,
    We would spend it in some words upon that business,
    If you would grant the time.
If you shall cleave to my consent, when 'tis,
    It shall make honor for you.
Thanks, sir, the like to you.
Did not you speak?
What do you mean?
Why did you bring these daggers from the place?
Your constancy
    Hath left you unattended.
Have napkins enow about you; here you'll sweat fort.
Come in, tailor; here you may
    roast your goose.
What are you?
I pray you, remember the  
    porter.
Was it so late, friend, ere you went to bed,
    That you do lie so late?
I'll bring you to him.
I know this is a joyful trouble to you,
    But yet 'tis one.
What is't you say?
Mean you his Majesty?
O gentle lady,
    'Tis not for you to hear what I can speak:
    The repetition in a woman's ear
    Would murther as it fell.
Wherefore did you so?
What will you do?
Why, see you not?
Will you to Scone?
Well, may you see things well done there.
God's benison go with you and with those
    That would make good of bad and friends of foes!
Ride you this afternoon?
Is't far you ride'!
Hie you to horse; adieu,
    Till you return at night.
Goes Fleance with you?
I wish your horses swift and sure of foot,
    And so I do commend you to their backs.
While then, God be with you!
Sirrah, a word with you.
Well then, now
    Have you consider'd of my speeches?
Know
    That it was he in the times past which held you
    So under fortune, which you thought had been
    Our innocent self?
This I made good to you
    In our last conference, pass'd in probation with you:
    How you were borne in hand, how cross'd, the instruments,
    Who wrought with them, and all things else that might
    To half a soul and to a notion crazed  
    Say, "Thus did Banquo.
Do you find
    Your patience so predominant in your nature,
    That you can let this go?
Are you so gospel'd,
    To pray for this good man and for his issue,
    Whose heavy hand hath bow'd you to the grave
    And beggar'd yours forever?
Now if you have a station in the file,
    Not i' the worst rank of manhood, say it,
    And I will put that business in your bosoms
    Whose execution takes your enemy off,
    Grapples you to the heart and love of us,
    Who wear our health but sickly in his life,
    Which in his death were perfect.
Both of you
    Know Banquo was your enemy.
We shall, my lord,
    Perform what you command us.
Your spirits shine through you.
Within this hour at most
    I will advise you where to plant yourselves,
    Acquaint you with the perfect spy o' the time,
    The moment on't; fort must be done tonight
    And something from the palace (always thought
    That I require a clearness); and with him-
    To leave no rubs nor botches in the work-
    Fleance his son, that keeps him company,  
    Whose absence is no less material to me
    Than is his father's, must embrace the fate
    Of that dark hour.
Resolve yourselves apart;
    I'll come to you anon.
I'll call upon you straight.
Why do you keep alone,
    Of sorriest fancies your companions making,
    Using those thoughts which should indeed have died
    With them they think on?
So shall I, love, and so, I pray, be you.
Which of you have done this?
Pray you, keep seat.
If much you note him,
    You shall offend him and extend his passion.
Feed, and regard him not-Are you a man?
This is the very painting of your fear;
    This is the air-drawn dagger which you said
    Led you to Duncan.
Why do you make such faces?
How say you?
My worthy lord,
    Your noble friends do lack you.
Pray you sit still.
You make me strange
    Even to the disposition that I owe
    When now I think you can behold such sights
    And keep the natural ruby of your cheeks
    When mine is blanch'd with fear.
I pray you, speak not; he grows worse and worse;
    Question enrages him.
Did you send to him, sir?
Have I not reason, beldams as you are,
    Saucy and overbold?
How did you dare
    To trade and traffic with Macbeth
    In riddles and affairs of death,
    And I, the mistress of your charms,
    The close contriver of all harms,
    Was never call'd to bear my part,
    Or show the glory of our art?
And, which is worse, all you have done
    Hath been but for a wayward son,
    Spiteful and wrathful, who, as others do,
    Loves for his own ends, not for you.
Get you gone,
    And at the pit of Acheron
    Meet me i' the morning.
And you all know security
    Is mortals' chiefest enemy.
And the right valiant Banquo walk'd too late,
    Whom, you may say, if't please you, Fleance kill'd,
    For Fleance fled.
Sir, can you tell
    Where he bestows himself?
And now about the cauldron sing,
    Like elves and fairies in a ring,
    Enchanting all that you put in.
How now, you secret, black, and midnight hags?
What is't you do?
I conjure you, by that which you profess
    (Howeer you come to know it) answer me:
    Though you untie the winds and let them fight
    Against the churches, though the yesty waves
    Confound and swallow navigation up,
    Though bladed corn be lodged and trees blown down,
    Though castles topple on their warders' heads,
    Though palaces and pyramids do slope
    Their heads to their foundations, though the treasure
    Of nature's germaines tumble all together
    Even till destruction sicken, answer me
    To what I ask you.
Deny me this,
    And an eternal curse fall on you!
Why do you show me this?
I'll charm the air to give a sound,
    While you perform your antic round,
    That this great King may kindly say
    Our duties did his welcome pay.
Saw you the weird sisters?
Came they not by you?
'Tis two or three, my lord, that bring you word
    Macduff is fled to England.
My dearest coz,  
    I pray you, school yourself.
I take my leave of you;
    Shall not be long but I'll be here again.
My pretty cousin,
    Blessing upon you!
And what will you do now?
How will you live?
Nay, how will you do for a husband?
Then you'll buy 'em to sell again.
If he were dead, you'ld weep for him; if you would not, it
    were a good sign that I should quickly have a new father.
Bless you, fair dame!
I am not to you known,
    Though in your state of honor I am perfect.
I doubt some danger does approach you nearly.
If you will take a homely man's advice,
    Be not found here; hence, with your little ones.
To fright you thus, methinks I am too savage;
    To do worse to you were fell cruelty,
    Which is too nigh your person.
Heaven preserve you!
What, you egg!
Run away, I pray you!
What you have spoke, it may be so perchance.
You have loved him well;
    He hath not touch'd you yet.
But I shall crave your pardon;
    That which you are, my thoughts cannot transpose.
Why in that rawness left you wife and child,
    Those precious motives, those strong knots of love,
    Without leave-taking?
I pray you,
    Let not my jealousies be your dishonors,
    But mine own safeties.
Be not offended;
    I speak not as in absolute fear of you.
But fear not yet
    To take upon you what is yours.
You may
    Convey your pleasures in a spacious plenty
    And yet seem cold, the time you may so hoodwink.
We have willing dames enough; there cannot be
    That vulture in you to devour so many
    As will to greatness dedicate themselves,
    Finding it so inclined.
Why are you silent?
Comes the King forth, I pray you?
I thank you, Doctor.
No mind that's honest
    But in it shares some woe, though the main part
    Pertains to you alone.
To relate the manner
    Were, on the quarry of these murther'd deer,
    To add the death of you.
Did you say all?
Receive what cheer you may,
    The night is long that never finds the day.
I have two nights watched with you, but can perceive no
    truth in your report.
In this slumbery
    agitation, besides her walking and other actual performances,
    what, at any time, have you heard her say?
You may to me, and 'tis most meet you should.
Neither to you nor anyone, having no witness to
    confirm my speech.
Lo you, here she comes!
Do you mark that?
Go to, go to; you have known what you should not.
I tell you yet again, Banquo's buried; he cannot come out
    on's grave.
The English force, so please you.
Within this three mile may you see it coming;
    I say, a moving grove.
Now near enough; your leavy screens throw down,
    And show like those you are.
Fare you well.
We'll have thee, as our rarer monsters are,
    Painted upon a pole, and underwrit,
    "Here may you see the tyrant.
We shall not spend a large expense of time
    Before we reckon with your several loves
    And make us even with you.
Of government the properties to unfold
    Would seem in me t' affect speech and discourse,
    Since I am put to know that your own science
    Exceeds, in that, the lists of all advice
    My strength can give you; then no more remains
    But that to your sufficiency- as your worth is able-
    And let them work.
There is our commission,
    From which we would not have you warp.
Exit an ATTENDANT
    What figure of us think you he will bear?
For you must know we have with special soul  
    Elected him our absence to supply;
    Lent him our terror, dress'd him with our love,
    And given his deputation all the organs
    Of our own power.
What think you of it?
We have with a leaven'd and prepared choice
    Proceeded to you; therefore take your honours.
We shall write to you,
    As time and our concernings shall importune,
    How it goes with us, and do look to know
    What doth befall you here.
So, fare you well.
To th' hopeful execution do I leave you
    Of your commissions.
Yet give leave, my lord,
    That we may bring you something on the way.
My haste may not admit it;
    Nor need you, on mine honour, have to do
    With any scruple: your scope is as mine own,
    So to enforce or qualify the laws
    As to your soul seems good.
Once more, fare you well.
Lead forth and bring you back in happiness!
I thank you.
Fare you well.
I shall desire you, sir, to give me leave
    To have free speech with you; and it concerns me
    To look into the bottom of my place:
    A pow'r I have, but of what strength and nature
    I am not yet instructed.
there's one yonder arrested and carried
    to prison was worth five thousand of you all.
Besides, you know, it draws something near to the
    speech we had to such a purpose.
what's the news with you?
You have not
   heard of the proclamation, have you?
Come, fear not you: good counsellors lack no clients.
Though you change your place you need not change your trade; I'll
    be your tapster still.
Courage, there will be pity taken on you;
    you that have worn your eyes almost out in the service, you will
    be considered.
Away, sir; you must go.
Lucio, a word with you.
A hundred, if they'll do you any good.
I thank you, good friend Lucio.
My holy sir, none better knows than you
    How I have ever lov'd the life removed,
    And held in idle price to haunt assemblies
    Where youth, and cost, a witless bravery keeps.
It rested in your Grace
    To unloose this tied-up justice when you pleas'd;
    And it in you more dreadful would have seem'd
    Than in Lord Angelo.
Moe reasons for this action
    At our more leisure shall I render you.
And have you nuns no farther privileges?
Gentle Isabella,
    Turn you the key, and know his business of him:
    You may, I may not; you are yet unsworn;
    When you have vow'd, you must not speak with men
    But in the presence of the prioress;
    Then, if you speak, you must not show your face,
    Or, if you show your face, you must not speak.
He calls again; I pray you answer him.
Hail, virgin, if you be, as those cheek-roses
    Proclaim you are no less.
Can you so stead me
    As bring me to the sight of Isabella,
    A novice of this place, and the fair sister
    To her unhappy brother Claudio?
Let me ask
    The rather, for I now must make you know
    I am that Isabella, and his sister.
Gentle and fair, your brother kindly greets you.
Not to be weary with you, he's in prison.
I would not- though 'tis my familiar sin
    With maids to seem the lapwing, and to jest,  
    Tongue far from heart- play with all virgins so:
    I hold you as a thing enskied and sainted,
    By your renouncement an immortal spirit,
    And to be talk'd with in sincerity,
    As with a saint.
All hope is gone,
    Unless you have the grace by your fair prayer
    To soften Angelo.
And that's my pith of business  
    'Twixt you and your poor brother.
Assay the pow'r you have.
I humbly thank you.
I take my leave of you.
Let but your honour know,
    Whom I believe to be most strait in virtue,
    That, in the working of your own affections,
    Had time coher'd with place, or place with wishing,
    Or that the resolute acting of our blood
    Could have attain'd th' effect of your own purpose
    Whether you had not sometime in your life
    Err'd in this point which now you censure him,  
    And pull'd the law upon you.
What are you, sir?
How know you that?
Do you hear how he misplaces?
No, indeed, sir, not of a pin; you are therein in the
    right; but to the point.
As I say, this Mistress Elbow, being, as
    I say, with child, and being great-bellied, and longing, as I
    said, for prunes; and having but two in the dish, as I said,  
    Master Froth here, this very man, having eaten the rest, as I
    said, and, as I say, paying for them very honestly; for, as you
    know, Master Froth, I could not give you three pence again-
  FROTH.
Very well; you being then, if you be rememb'red, cracking
    the stones of the foresaid prunes-
  FROTH.
Why, very well; I telling you then, if you be rememb'red,
    that such a one and such a one were past cure of the thing you
    wot of, unless they kept very good diet, as I told you-
  FROTH.
Come, you are a tedious fool.
Sir, but you shall come to it, by your honour's leave.
And,
    I beseech you, look into Master Froth here, sir, a man of
    fourscore pound a year; whose father died at Hallowmas- was't not  
    at Hallowmas, Master Froth?
He, sir, sitting, as
    I say, in a lower chair, sir; 'twas in the Bunch of Grapes,
    where, indeed, you have a delight to sit, have you not?
This will last out a night in Russia,
    When nights are longest there; I'll take my leave,
    And leave you to the hearing of the cause,
    Hoping you'll find good cause to whip them all.
I beseech you, sir, ask him what this man did to my wife.
I beseech you, sir, look in this gentleman's face.
Nay, I beseech you, mark it well.
He's in the right, constable; what say you to it?
First, an it like you, the house is a respected house; next,
    this is a respected fellow; and his mistress is a respected
    woman.
If he took you a box o' th' ear, you might have your
    action of slander too.
Where were you born, friend?
Are you of fourscore pounds a year?
Yes, an't please you, sir.
What trade are you of, sir?
Master Froth, I
    would not have you acquainted with tapsters: they will draw you,
    Master Froth, and you will hang them.
Get you gone, and let me
    hear no more of you.
[Exit FROTH]
    Come you hither to me, Master Tapster; what's your name, Master
    Tapster?
Troth, and your bum is the greatest thing about you; so  
    that, in the beastliest sense, you are Pompey the Great.
Pompey,
    you are partly a bawd, Pompey, howsoever you colour it in being a
    tapster.
Are you not?
Come, tell me true; it shall be the better
    for you.
How would you live, Pompey- by being a bawd?
What do you
    think of the trade, Pompey?
If
    your worship will take order for the drabs and the knaves, you
    need not to fear the bawds.
There is pretty orders beginning, I can tell you: but it
    is but heading and hanging.
If you head and hang all that offend that way but for ten
    year together, you'll be glad to give out a commission for more  
    heads; if this law hold in Vienna ten year, I'll rent the fairest
    house in it, after threepence a bay.
If you live to see this come
    to pass, say Pompey told you so.
Thank you, good Pompey; and, in requital of your prophecy,
    hark you: I advise you, let me not find you before me again upon
    any complaint whatsoever- no, not for dwelling where you do; if I
    do, Pompey, I shall beat you to your tent, and prove a shrewd
    Caesar to you; in plain dealing, Pompey, I shall have you whipt.
So for this time, Pompey, fare you well.
How long have you been in this place of constable?
I thought, by the readiness in the office, you had
    continued in it some time.
Alas, it hath been great pains to you!
They do you wrong  
    to put you so oft upon't.
Look you, bring me in the names of some six or seven, the
    most sufficient of your parish.
Fare you well.
[Exit ELBOW]
    What's o'clock, think you?
I pray you home to dinner with me.
I humbly thank you.
I'll tell him of you.
Pray you do.
Do you your office, or give up your place,
    And you shall well be spar'd.
Here is the sister of the man condemn'd
    Desires access to you.
Exit SERVANT
    See you the fornicatress be remov'd;  
    Let her have needful but not lavish means;
    There shall be order for't.
I have a brother is condemn'd to die;
    I do beseech you, let it be his fault,
    And not my brother.
[To ISABELLA] Give't not o'er so; to him again, entreat him,
    Kneel down before him, hang upon his gown;
    You are too cold: if you should need a pin,
    You could not with more tame a tongue desire it.
Yes; I do think that you might pardon him.
But can you, if you would?
But might you do't, and do the world no wrong,
    If so your heart were touch'd with that remorse
    As mine is to him?
If he had been as you, and you as he,
    You would have slipp'd like him; but he, like you,
    Would not have been so stern.
Pray you be gone.
I would to heaven I had your potency,
    And you were Isabel!
Your brother is a forfeit of the law,
    And you but waste your words.
How would you be
    If He, which is the top of judgment, should
    But judge you as you are?
Be you content, fair maid.
Good, good my lord, bethink you.
So you must be the first that gives this sentence,
    And he that suffers.
Why do you put these sayings upon me?
- Fare you well.
Hark how I'll bribe you; good my lord, turn back.
Ay, with such gifts that heaven shall share with you.
Hail to you, Provost!
so I think you are.
[To JULIET] I have provided for you; stay awhile
    And you shall be conducted.
Repent you, fair one, of the sin you carry?
I'll teach you how you shall arraign your conscience,
    And try your penitence, if it be sound
    Or hollowly put on.
Love you the man that wrong'd you?
'Tis meet so, daughter; but lest you do repent
    As that the sin hath brought you to this shame,  
    Which sorrow is always toward ourselves, not heaven,
    Showing we would not spare heaven as we love it,
    But as we stand in fear-
  JULIET.
Grace go with you!
One Isabel, a sister, desires access to you.
That you might know it would much better please me
    Than to demand what 'tis.
Yet may he live awhile, and, it may be,
    As long as you or I; yet he must die.
I beseech you; that in his reprieve,
    Longer or shorter, he may be so fitted
    That his soul sicken not.
Say you so?
Then I shall pose you quickly.
Which had you rather- that the most just law
    Now took your brother's life; or, to redeem him,
    Give up your body to such sweet uncleanness
    As she that he hath stain'd?
How say you?
Please you to do't,
    I'll take it as a peril to my soul
    It is no sin at all, but charity.
Pleas'd you to do't at peril of your soul,
    Were equal poise of sin and charity.
Nay, but hear me;
    Your sense pursues not mine; either you are ignorant
    Or seem so, craftily; and that's not good.
Admit no other way to save his life,
    As I subscribe not that, nor any other,
    But, in the loss of question, that you, his sister,
    Finding yourself desir'd of such a person
    Whose credit with the judge, or own great place,
    Could fetch your brother from the manacles
    Of the all-binding law; and that there were
    No earthly mean to save him but that either
    You must lay down the treasures of your body
    To this supposed, or else to let him suffer-
    What would you do?
Were not you, then, as cruel as the sentence
    That you have slander'd so?
Be that you are,
    That is, a woman; if you be more, you're none;
    If you be one, as you are well express'd
    By all external warrants, show it now
    By putting on the destin'd livery.
I have no tongue but one; gentle, my lord,
    Let me intreat you speak the former language.
Plainly conceive, I love you.
My brother did love Juliet,  
    And you tell me that he shall die for't.
He shall not, Isabel, if you give me love.
My unsoil'd name, th' austereness of my life,
    My vouch against you, and my place i' th' state,
    Will so your accusation overweigh
    That you shall stifle in your own report,
    And smell of calumny.
As for you,
    Say what you can: my false o'erweighs your true.
So, then you hope of pardon from Lord Angelo?
I humbly thank you.
Dear sir, ere long I'll visit you again.
Most holy sir, I thank you.
Provost, a word with you.
As many as you please.
Lord Angelo, having affairs to heaven,
    Intends you for his swift ambassador,
    Where you shall be an everlasting leiger.
Therefore, your best appointment make with speed;
    To-morrow you set on.
Yes, brother, you may live:
    There is a devilish mercy in the judge,
    If you'll implore it, that will free your life,
    But fetter you till death.
Ay, just; perpetual durance, a restraint,
    Though all the world's vastidity you had,
    To a determin'd scope.
In such a one as, you consenting to't,
    Would bark your honour from that trunk you bear,
    And leave you naked.
Why give you me this shame?
Think you I can a resolution fetch
    From flow'ry tenderness?
What sin you do to save a brother's life,
    Nature dispenses with the deed so far
    That it becomes a virtue.
O you beast!
Might you dispense with your leisure, I would by and by have
    some speech with you; the satisfaction I would require is  
    likewise your own benefit.
I have no superfluous leisure; my stay must be stolen out
    of other affairs; but I will attend you awhile.
Son, I have overheard what hath pass'd between you and your
    sister.
Do not satisfy your
    resolution with hopes that are fallible; to-morrow you must die;
    go to your knees and make ready.
Hold you there.
[Exit CLAUDIO] Provost, a word with
    you.
That, now you are come, you will be gone.
The hand that hath made you fair hath made you good; the
    goodness that is cheap in beauty makes beauty brief in goodness;
    but grace, being the soul of your complexion, shall keep the body
    of it ever fair.
The assault that Angelo hath made to you,
    fortune hath convey'd to my understanding; and, but that frailty
    hath examples for his falling, I should wonder at Angelo.
How
    will you do to content this substitute, and to save your brother?
That shall not be much amiss; yet, as the matter now stands,
    he will avoid your accusation: he made trial of you only.
I do make myself believe
    that you may most uprighteously do a poor wronged lady a merited
    benefit; redeem your brother from the angry law; do no stain to
    your own gracious person; and much please the absent Duke, if
    peradventure he shall ever return to have hearing of this
    business.
Let me hear you speak farther; I have spirit to do
    anything that appears not foul in the truth of my spirit.
Have you not
    heard speak of Mariana, the sister of Frederick, the great
    soldier who miscarried at sea?
It is a rupture that you may easily heal; and the cure of it
    not only saves your brother, but keeps you from dishonour in
    doing it.
Go you to Angelo; answer his
    requiring with a plausible obedience; agree with his demands to  
    the point; only refer yourself to this advantage: first, that
    your stay with him may not be long; that the time may have all
    shadow and silence in it; and the place answer to convenience.
If you think well to carry this as you may, the
    doubleness of the benefit defends the deceit from reproof.
What
    think you of it?
Haste you speedily to
    Angelo; if for this night he entreat you to his bed, give him
    promise of satisfaction.
I thank you for this comfort.
Fare you well, good father.
Nay, if there be no remedy for it, but that you will needs
    buy and sell men and women like beasts, we shall have all the
    world drink brown and white bastard.
Bless you, good father friar.
And you, good brother father.
What offence hath this man made
    you, sir?
You will turn good husband now, Pompey; you
    will keep the house.
If you take it not
    patiently, why, your mettle is the more.
Bless you, friar.
And you.
Can you tell me of any?
Some say he is with the Emperor of Russia; other some, he is
    in Rome; but where is he, think you?
Is it
    true, think you?
O, sir, you are deceiv'd.
He would be drunk too; that let me inform you.
No, pardon; 'tis a secret must be lock'd within the teeth
    and the lips; but this I can let you understand: the greater file
    of the subject held the Duke to be wise.
Either this is envy in you, folly, or mistaking; the very
    stream of his life, and the business he hath helmed, must, upon a
    warranted need, give him a better proclamation.
Therefore you
    speak unskilfully; or, if your knowledge be more, it is much
    dark'ned in your malice.
I can hardly believe that, since you know not what you speak.
But, if ever the Duke return, as our prayers are he may, let me
    desire you to make your answer before him.
If it be honest you
    have spoke, you have courage to maintain it; I am bound to call
    upon you; and I pray you your name?
He shall know you better, sir, if I may live to report you.
I fear you not.
O, you hope the Duke will return no more; or you imagine me
    too unhurtful an opposite.
But, indeed, I can do you little harm:
    you'll forswear this again.
So please you, this friar hath been with him, and advis'd
    him for th' entertainment of death.
Bliss and goodness on you!
Of whence are you?
I pray you, sir, of what disposition was the Duke?
But leave we him to his events, with a prayer they
    may prove prosperous; and let me desire to know how you find
    Claudio prepar'd.
I am made to understand that you have lent him
    visitation.
Fare you well.
Peace be with you!
Exit BOY
    I cry you mercy, sir, and well could wish
    You had not found me here so musical.
I pray you tell me hath anybody inquir'd for me here to-day.
I do constantly believe you.
May be I will call upon
    you anon, for some advantage to yourself.
I am always bound to you.
But shall you on your knowledge find this way?
Are there no other tokens
    Between you 'greed concerning her observance?
Re-enter MARIANA

    I pray you be acquainted with this maid;
    She comes to do you good.
Do you persuade yourself that I respect you?
Good friar, I know you do, and have found it.
Will't please you walk aside?
She'll take the enterprise upon her, father,
    If you advise it.
Little have you to say,
    When you depart from him, but, soft and low,
    'Remember now my brother.
Nor, gentle daughter, fear you not at all.
To bring you thus together 'tis no sin,
    Sith that the justice of your title to him
    Doth flourish the deceit.
Can you cut off a man's head?
Here
    is in our prison a common executioner, who in his office lacks a
    helper; if you will take it on you to assist him, it shall redeem
    you from your gyves; if not, you shall have your full time of
    imprisonment, and your deliverance with an unpitied whipping, for
    you have been a notorious bawd.
Do you call, sir?
Sirrah, here's a fellow will help you to-morrow in your
    execution.
If you think it meet, compound with him by the year,
    and let him abide here with you; if not, use him for the present,
    and dismiss him.
He cannot plead his estimation with you; he hath
    been a bawd.
Go to, sir; you weigh equally; a feather will turn the
    scale.
Pray, sir, by your good favour- for surely, sir, a good
    favour you have but that you have a hanging look- do you call,
    sir, your occupation a mystery?
Are you agreed?
I do desire to learn, sir; and I hope, if you have occasion
    to use me for your own turn, you shall find me yare; for truly,
    sir, for your kindness I owe you a good turn.
The best and wholesom'st spirits of the night
    Envelop you, good Provost!
Have you no countermand for Claudio yet
    But he must die to-morrow?
My lord hath sent you this note; and by me this further
    charge, that you swerve not from the smallest article of it,
    neither in time, matter, or other circumstance.
I told you: Lord Angelo, belike thinking me remiss in mine
    office, awakens me with this unwonted putting-on; methinks
    strangely, for he hath not us'd it before.
Pray you, let's hear.
[Reads] 'Whatsoever you may hear to the contrary, let
    Claudio be executed by four of the clock, and, in the afternoon,  
    Barnardine.
Thus fail not
    to do your office, as you will answer it at your peril.
'
    What say you to this, sir?
Claudio, whom here you have warrant to execute, is no
    greater forfeit to the law than Angelo who hath sentenc'd him.
To
    make you understand this in a manifested effect, I crave but four
    days' respite; for the which you are to do me both a present and
    a dangerous courtesy.
By the vow of mine order, I warrant you, if my instructions
    may be your guide.
O, death's a great disguiser; and you may add to it.
If anything fall to you upon this more than thanks and
    good fortune, by the saint whom I profess, I will plead against
    it with my life.
Were you sworn to the Duke, or to the deputy?
You will think you have made no offence if the Duke avouch
    the justice of your dealing?
Yet since I see you  
    fearful, that neither my coat, integrity, nor persuasion, can
    with ease attempt you, I will go further than I meant, to pluck
    all fears out of you.
Look you, sir, here is the hand and seal of
    the Duke.
You know the character, I doubt not; and the signet is
    not strange to you.
The contents of this is the return of the Duke; you shall
    anon over-read it at your pleasure, where you shall find within
    these two days he will be here.
Yet you are amaz'd, but this shall
    absolutely resolve you.
What are you?
[ Within ] Away, you rogue, away; I am sleepy.
Pray, Master Barnardine, awake till you are executed, and
    sleep afterwards.
How now, Abhorson, what's the news with you?
Truly, sir, I would desire you to clap into your prayers;
    for, look you, the warrant's come.
Look you, sir, here comes your ghostly father.
Do we jest now, think you?
Sir, induced by my charity, and hearing how hastily you are
    to depart, I am come to advise you, comfort you, and pray with
    you.
O, Sir, you must; and therefore I beseech you
    Look forward on the journey you shall go.
But hear you-
  BARNARDINE.
Not a word; if you have anything to say to me, come to
    my ward; for thence will not I to-day.
Now, sir, how do you find the prisoner?
Ere twice the sun hath made his journal greeting
    To the under generation, you shall find
    Your safety manifested.
Make a swift return;
    For I would commune with you of such things
    That want no ear but yours.
Good morning to you, fair and gracious daughter.
This nor hurts him nor profits you a jot;
    Forbear it, therefore; give your cause to heaven.
Mark what I say, which you shall find
    By every syllable a faithful verity.
If you can, pace your wisdom
    In that good path that I would wish it go,
    And you shall have your bosom on this wretch,
    Grace of the Duke, revenges to your heart,
    And general honour.
I am directed by you.
Her cause and yours
    I'll perfect him withal; and he shall bring you
    Before the Duke; and to the head of Angelo
    Accuse him home and home.
Wend you with this letter.
Well, you'll answer this one day.
Did you such a thing?
Rest you well.
If bawdy
    talk offend you, we'll have very little of it.
Well, I beseech you, let it be proclaim'd;
    Betimes i' th' morn I'll call you at your house;
    Give notice to such men of sort and suit
    As are to meet him.
I shall, sir; fare you well.
The matter being afoot, keep your instruction
    And hold you ever to our special drift;
    Though sometimes you do blench from this to that
    As cause doth minister.
Come, I have found you out a stand most fit,
    Where you may have such vantage on the Duke
    He shall not pass you.
Our old and faithful friend, we are glad to see you.
Many and hearty thankings to you both.
We have made inquiry of you, and we hear
    Such goodness of your justice that our soul
    Cannot but yield you forth to public thanks,
    Forerunning more requital.
Come, Escalus,
    You must walk by us on our other hand,
    And good supporters are you.
O worthy Prince, dishonour not your eye
    By throwing it on any other object
    Till you have heard me in my true complaint,
    And given me justice, justice, justice, justice.
Here is Lord Angelo shall give you justice;
    Reveal yourself to him.
Hear me yourself; for that which I must speak
    Must either punish me, not being believ'd,  
    Or wring redress from you.
What would you say?
I wish you now, then;
    Pray you take note of it; and when you have
    A business for yourself, pray heaven you then  
    Be perfect.
It may be right; but you are i' the wrong
    To speak before your time.
Some one hath set you on;
    Confess the truth, and say by whose advice
    Thou cam'st here to complain.
Then, O you blessed ministers above,
    Keep me in patience; and, with ripened time,  
    Unfold the evil which is here wrapt up
    In countenance!
I know you'd fain be gone.
Know you that Friar Lodowick that she speaks of?
First, for this woman-
    To justify this worthy nobleman,
    So vulgarly and personally accus'd-
    Her shall you hear disproved to her eyes,
    Till she herself confess it.
Exit ISABELLA guarded
    Do you not smile at this, Lord Angelo?
Come, cousin Angelo;
    In this I'll be impartial; be you judge
    Of your own cause.
What, are you married?
Are you a maid?
Why, you are nothing then; neither maid, widow, nor wife.
Know you this woman?
Exit PROVOST
    And you, my noble and well-warranted cousin,
    Whom it concerns to hear this matter forth,
    Do with your injuries as seems you best
    In any chastisement.
I for a while will leave you;
    But stir not you till you have well determin'd
    Upon these slanderers.
Exit DUKE
    Signior Lucio, did not you say you knew that Friar Lodowick to be
    a dishonest person?
We shall entreat you to abide here till he come and
    enforce them against him.
[Exit an ATTENDANT] Pray you, my lord, give me leave to
    question; you shall see how I'll handle her.
Say you?
Marry, sir, I think, if you handled her privately, she would
    sooner confess; perchance, publicly, she'll be asham'd.
Come on, mistress; here's a gentlewoman denies all that
    you have said.
Speak not you to him till we call upon
    you.
Come, sir; did you set these women on to slander Lord
    Angelo?
They have confess'd you did.
Know you where you are?
The Duke's in us; and we will hear you speak;
    Look you speak justly.
But, O, poor souls,
    Come you to seek the lamb here of the fox,
    Good night to your redress!
The Duke's unjust
    Thus to retort your manifest appeal,
    And put your trial in the villain's mouth
    Which here you come to accuse.
We'll touze you
    Joint by joint, but we will know his purpose.
What can you vouch against him, Signior Lucio?
Is this the man that you did tell us of?
Do you know me?
I remember you, sir, by the sound of your voice.
I met you at
    the prison, in the absence of the Duke.
O did you so?
And do you remember what you said of the Duke?
Do you so, sir?
And was the Duke a fleshmonger, a fool, and
    a coward, as you then reported him to be?
You must, sir, change persons with me ere you make that my
    report; you, indeed, spoke so of him; and much more, much worse.
Why, you
    bald-pated lying rascal, you must be hooded, must you?
Show your
    knave's visage, with a pox to you!
[To Lucio] Sneak not away, sir, for the friar and you
    Must have a word anon.
[To ESCALUS] What you have spoke I pardon; sit you down.
Do you the office, friar; which consummate,
    Return him here again.
And now, dear maid, be you as free to us.
Your brother's death, I know, sits at your heart;
    And you may marvel why I obscur'd myself,
    Labouring to save his life, and would not rather
    Make rash remonstrance of my hidden pow'r
    Than let him so be lost.
For this new-married man approaching here,
    Whose salt imagination yet hath wrong'd
    Your well-defended honour, you must pardon
    For Mariana's sake; but as he adjudg'd your brother-
    Being criminal in double violation
    Of sacred chastity and of promise-breach,
    Thereon dependent, for your brother's life-
    The very mercy of the law cries out
    Most audible, even from his proper tongue,
    'An Angelo for Claudio, death for death!
O my most gracious lord,
    I hope you will not mock me with a husband.
It is your husband mock'd you with a husband.
Consenting to the safeguard of your honour,
    I thought your marriage fit; else imputation,
    For that he knew you, might reproach your life,
    And choke your good to come.
For his possessions,
    Although by confiscation they are ours,
    We do instate and widow you withal
    To buy you a better husband.
[To LUCIO] Now, sir, to you.
Sweet Isabel, take my part;
    Lend me your knees, and all my life to come
    I'll lend you all my life to do you service.
Against all sense you do importune her.
O Isabel, will you not lend a knee?
[Kneeling] Most bounteous sir,
    Look, if it please you, on this man condemn'd,
    As if my brother liv'd.
Had you a special warrant for the deed?
For which I do discharge you of your office;
    Give up your keys.
I am sorry one so learned and so wise
    As you, Lord Angelo, have still appear'd,
    Should slip so grossly, both in the heat of blood
    And lack of temper'd judgment afterward.
[To ISABELLA] If he be like your brother, for his sake
    Is he pardon'd; and for your lovely sake,
    Give me your hand and say you will be mine,
    He is my brother too.
Well, Angelo, your evil quits you well.
Look that you love your wife; her worth worth yours.
Wherein have I so deserv'd of you
    That you extol me thus?
If you will hang me for it, you may; but I had rather it would
    please you I might be whipt.
Your
    Highness said even now I made you a duke; good my lord, do not
    recompense me in making me a cuckold.
Exeunt OFFICERS with LUCIO
    She, Claudio, that you wrong'd, look you restore.
Joy to you, Mariana!
Forgive him, Angelo, that brought you home
    The head of Ragozine for Claudio's:
    Th' offence pardons itself.
Dear Isabel,
    I have a motion much imports your good;
    Whereto if you'll a willing ear incline,
    What's mine is yours, and what is yours is mine.
So, bring us to our palace, where we'll show
    What's yet behind that's meet you all should know.
It wearies me; you say it wearies you;
    But how I caught it, found it, or came by it,
    What stuff 'tis made of, whereof it is born,
    I am to learn;
    And such a want-wit sadness makes of me
    That I have much ado to know myself.
Why then you are in love.
Then let us say you are sad
    Because you are not merry; and 'twere as easy
    For you to laugh and leap and say you are merry,
    Because you are not sad.
Fare ye well;
    We leave you now with better company.
I would have stay'd till I had made you merry,
    If worthier friends had not prevented me.
I take it your own business calls on you,
    And you embrace th' occasion to depart.
My Lord Bassanio, since you have found Antonio,
    We two will leave you; but at dinner-time,
    I pray you, have in mind where we must meet.
I will not fail you.
Believe me, you are marvellously chang'd.
Well, we will leave you then till dinner-time.
Fare you well; I'll grow a talker for this gear.
His reasons are as two grains of wheat hid
    in, two bushels of chaff: you shall seek all day ere you find
    them, and when you have them they are not worth the search.
Well; tell me now what lady is the same
    To whom you swore a secret pilgrimage,
    That you to-day promis'd to tell me of?
'Tis not unknown to you, Antonio,
    How much I have disabled mine estate
    By something showing a more swelling port
    Than my faint means would grant continuance;
    Nor do I now make moan to be abridg'd
    From such a noble rate; but my chief care
    Is to come fairly off from the great debts
    Wherein my time, something too prodigal,
    Hath left me gag'd.
To you, Antonio,  
    I owe the most, in money and in love;
    And from your love I have a warranty
    To unburden all my plots and purposes
    How to get clear of all the debts I owe.
I pray you, good Bassanio, let me know it;
    And if it stand, as you yourself still do,
    Within the eye of honour, be assur'd
    My purse, my person, my extremest means,
    Lie all unlock'd to your occasions.
I owe you much; and, like a wilful youth,
    That which I owe is lost; but if you please
    To shoot another arrow that self way
    Which you did shoot the first, I do not doubt,
    As I will watch the aim, or to find both,  
    Or bring your latter hazard back again
    And thankfully rest debtor for the first.
You know me well, and herein spend but time
    To wind about my love with circumstance;
    And out of doubt you do me now more wrong
    In making question of my uttermost
    Than if you had made waste of all I have.
Your father was ever virtuous, and holy men at their death
    have good inspirations; therefore the lott'ry that he hath
    devised in these three chests, of gold, silver, and lead- whereof
    who chooses his meaning chooses you- will no doubt never be
    chosen by any rightly but one who you shall rightly love.
He doth nothing but frown, as who should say 'An you will
    not have me, choose.
How say you by the French lord, Monsieur Le Bon?
What say you then to Falconbridge, the young baron of
    England?
You know I say nothing to him, for he understands not me,
    nor I him: he hath neither Latin, French, nor Italian, and you  
    will come into the court and swear that I have a poor pennyworth
    in the English.
What think you of the Scottish lord, his neighbour?
How like you the young German, the Duke of Saxony's
    nephew?
If he should offer to choose, and choose the right casket,
    you should refuse to perform your father's will, if you should
    refuse to accept him.
You need not fear, lady, the having any of these lords;
    they have acquainted me with their determinations, which is
    indeed to return to their home, and to trouble you with no more
    suit, unless you may be won by some other sort than your father's
    imposition, depending on the caskets.
Do you not remember, lady, in your father's time, a
    Venetian, a scholar and a soldier, that came hither in company of
    the Marquis of Montferrat?
The four strangers seek for you, madam, to take their
    leave; and there is a forerunner come from a fifth, the Prince of
    Morocco, who brings word the Prince his master will be here
    to-night.
For the which, as I told you, Antonio shall be bound.
May you stead me?
Will you pleasure me?
Have you heard any imputation to the contrary?
Ho, no, no, no, no; my meaning in saying he is a good man
    is to have you understand me that he is sufficient; yet his means
    are in supposition: he hath an argosy bound to Tripolis, another
    to the Indies; I understand, moreover, upon the Rialto, he hath a
    third at Mexico, a fourth for England- and other ventures he
    hath, squand'red abroad.
Be assur'd you may.
If it please you to dine with us.
I will buy with
    you, sell with you, talk with you, walk with you, and so
    following; but I will not eat with you, drink with you, nor pray
    with you.
Shylock, do you hear?
how many months
    Do you desire?
[To ANTONIO]  Rest you fair, good signior;
    Your worship was the last man in our mouths.
I had forgot- three months; you told me so.
Well then, your bond; and, let me see- but hear you,
    Methoughts you said you neither lend nor borrow
    Upon advantage.
No, not take interest; not, as you would say,
    Directly int'rest; mark what Jacob did:
    When Laban and himself were compromis'd
    That all the eanlings which were streak'd and pied
    Should fall as Jacob's hire, the ewes, being rank,  
    In end of autumn turned to the rams;
    And when the work of generation was
    Between these woolly breeders in the act,
    The skilful shepherd pill'd me certain wands,
    And, in the doing of the deed of kind,
    He stuck them up before the fulsome ewes,
    Who, then conceiving, did in eaning time
    Fall parti-colour'd lambs, and those were Jacob's.
[Aside]  Mark you this, Bassanio,
    The devil can cite Scripture for his purpose.
Well, Shylock, shall we be beholding to you?
Signior Antonio, many a time and oft
    In the Rialto you have rated me
    About my moneys and my usances;
    Still have I borne it with a patient shrug,
    For suff'rance is the badge of all our tribe;
    You call me misbeliever, cut-throat dog,
    And spit upon my Jewish gaberdine,
    And all for use of that which is mine own.
Well then, it now appears you need my help;
    Go to, then; you come to me, and you say
    'Shylock, we would have moneys.
' You say so-
    You that did void your rheum upon my beard
    And foot me as you spurn a stranger cur
    Over your threshold; moneys is your suit.
What should I say to you?
' Or
    Shall I bend low and, in a bondman's key,
    With bated breath and whisp'ring humbleness,
    Say this:
    'Fair sir, you spit on me on Wednesday last,
    You spurn'd me such a day; another time
    You call'd me dog; and for these courtesies
    I'll lend you thus much moneys'?
Why, look you, how you storm!
I would be friends with you, and have your love,  
    Forget the shames that you have stain'd me with,
    Supply your present wants, and take no doit
    Of usance for my moneys, and you'll not hear me.
Go with me to a notary, seal me there
    Your single bond, and, in a merry sport,
    If you repay me not on such a day,
    In such a place, such sum or sums as are
    Express'd in the condition, let the forfeit
    Be nominated for an equal pound
    Of your fair flesh, to be cut off and taken
    In what part of your body pleaseth me.
Pray you, tell me this:
    If he should break his day, what should I gain
    By the exaction of the forfeiture?
I say,
    To buy his favour, I extend this friendship;
    If he will take it, so; if not, adieu;
    And, for my love, I pray you wrong me not.
Then meet me forthwith at the notary's;
    Give him direction for this merry bond,
    And I will go and purse the ducats straight,
    See to my house, left in the fearful guard
    Of an unthrifty knave, and presently
    I'll be with you.
But, if my father had not scanted me,
    And hedg'd me by his wit to yield myself
    His wife who wins me by that means I told you,
    Yourself, renowned Prince, then stood as fair
    As any comer I have look'd on yet
    For my affection.
Even for that I thank you.
Therefore, I pray you, lead me to the caskets
    To try my fortune.
You must take your chance,
    And either not attempt to choose at all,
    Or swear before you choose, if you choose wrong,
    Never to speak to lady afterward
    In way of marriage; therefore be advis'd.
'Conscience,' say I, (you counsel well.
' 'Fiend,' say I, 'you
    counsel well.
Master young man, you, I pray you, which is the way to
    master Jew's?
Master young gentleman, I pray you, which is the way to
    master Jew's?
Can you tell
    me whether one Launcelot, that dwells with him, dwell with him or
    no?
Talk you of young Master Launcelot?
- Talk you of young Master
    Launcelot?
But I pray you, ergo, old man, ergo, I beseech you, talk
    you of young Master Launcelot?
Talk not of Master Launcelot,
    father; for the young gentleman, according to Fates and Destinies
    and such odd sayings, the Sisters Three and such branches of  
    learning, is indeed deceased; or, as you would say in plain
    terms, gone to heaven.
Do you know me, father?
Alack the day, I know you not, young gentleman; but I pray
    you tell me, is my boy- God rest his soul!
Do you not know me, father?
Alack, sir, I am sand-blind; I know you not.
Nay, indeed, if you had your eyes, you might fail of the
    knowing me: it is a wise father that knows his own child.
Well,
    old man, I will tell you news of your son.
Pray you, sir, stand up; I am sure you are not Launcelot my
    boy.
Pray you, let's have no more fooling about it, but give
    me your blessing; I am Launcelot, your boy that was, your son
    that is, your child that shall be.
I cannot think you are my son.
How 'gree you now?
I
    am famish'd in his service; you may tell every finger I have with
    my ribs.
Father, I am glad you are come; give me your present to
    one Master Bassanio, who indeed gives rare new liveries; if I
    serve not him, I will run as far as God has any ground.
To be brief, the very truth is that the Jew, having done
    me wrong, doth cause me, as my father, being I hope an old man,
    shall frutify unto you-
  GOBBO.
What would you?
Serve you, sir.
The old proverb is very well parted between my master
    Shylock and you, sir: you have the grace of God, sir, and he hath
    enough.
I have suit to you.
You must not deny me: I must go with you to Belmont.
Why, then you must.
Nay, but I bar to-night; you shall not gauge me
    By what we do to-night.
No, that were pity;
    I would entreat you rather to put on
    Your boldest suit of mirth, for we have friends
    That purpose merriment.
But fare you well;
    I have some business.
And I must to Lorenzo and the rest;
    But we will visit you at supper-time.
An it shall please you to break up this, it shall seem
    to signify.
Go, gentlemen,                                Exit LAUNCELOT
    Will you prepare you for this masque to-night?
Call you?
I beseech you, sir, go; my young master doth expect your
    reproach.
And they have conspired together; I will not say you
    shall see a masque, but if you do, then it was not for nothing
    that my nose fell a-bleeding on Black Monday last at six o'clock
    i' th' morning, falling out that year on Ash Wednesday was four
    year, in th' afternoon.
Hear you me, Jessica:
    Lock up my doors, and when you hear the drum,
    And the vile squealing of the wry-neck'd fife,
    Clamber not you up to the casements then,
    Nor thrust your head into the public street
    To gaze on Christian fools with varnish'd faces;
    But stop my house's ears- I mean my casements;  
    Let not the sound of shallow fopp'ry enter
    My sober house.
Go you before me, sirrah;
    Say I will come.
Do as I bid you, shut doors after you.
Farewell; and if my fortune be not crost,
    I have a father, you a daughter, lost.
Not I, but my affairs, have made you wait.
When you shall please to play the thieves for wives,
    I'll watch as long for you then.
Who are you?
And now who knows  
    But you, Lorenzo, whether I am yours?
I am glad 'tis night, you do not look on me,
    For I am much asham'd of my exchange;
    But love is blind, and lovers cannot see
    The pretty follies that themselves commit,
    For, if they could, Cupid himself would blush
    To see me thus transformed to a boy.
Descend, for you must be my torch-bearer.
So are you, sweet,
    Even in the lovely garnish of a boy.
I will make fast the doors, and gild myself  
    With some moe ducats, and be with you straight.
'Tis nine o'clock; our friends all stay for you;
    No masque to-night; the wind is come about;
    Bassanio presently will go aboard;
    I have sent twenty out to seek for you.
The one of them contains my picture, Prince;
    If you choose that, then I am yours withal.
'All that glisters is not gold,
         Often have you heard that told;
         Many a man his life hath sold
         But my outside to behold.
Had you been as wise as bold,
         Young in limbs, in judgment old,
         Your answer had not been inscroll'd.
Fare you well, your suit is cold.
You were best to tell Antonio what you hear;
    Yet do not suddenly, for it may grieve him.
He answered 'Do not so;
    Slubber not business for my sake, Bassanio,
    But stay the very riping of the time;
    And for the Jew's bond which he hath of me,
    Let it not enter in your mind of love;
    Be merry, and employ your chiefest thoughts
    To courtship, and such fair ostents of love
    As shall conveniently become you there.
If you choose that wherein I am contain'd,
    Straight shall our nuptial rites be solemniz'd;
    But if you fail, without more speech, my lord,
    You must be gone from hence immediately.
I am enjoin'd by oath to observe three things:
    First, never to unfold to any one
    Which casket 'twas I chose; next, if I fail
    Of the right casket, never in my life
    To woo a maid in way of marriage;  
    Lastly,
    If I do fail in fortune of my choice,
    Immediately to leave you and be gone.
[Aside]  Too long a pause for that which you find there.
Take what wife you will to bed,  
         I will ever be your head.
So be gone; you are sped.
You knew, none so well, none so well as you, of my
    daughter's flight.
But tell us, do you hear whether
    Antonio have had any loss at sea or no?
If
    you prick us, do we not bleed?
If you tickle us, do we not laugh?
If you poison us, do we not die?
And if you wrong us, shall we
    not revenge?
If we are like you in the rest, we will resemble you
    in that.
The villainy you teach me
    I will execute; and itshall go hard but I will better the
    instruction.
Gentlemen, my master Antonio is at his house, and desires to
    speak with you both.
I pray you tarry; pause a day or two
    Before you hazard; for, in choosing wrong,
    I lose your company; therefore forbear a while.
There's something tells me- but it is not love-
    I would not lose you; and you know yourself
    Hate counsels not in such a quality.
But lest you should not understand me well-
    And yet a maiden hath no tongue but thought-
    I would detain you here some month or two
    Before you venture for me.
I could teach you
    How to choose right, but then I am forsworn;
    So will I never be; so may you miss me;
    But if you do, you'll make me wish a sin,
    That I had been forsworn.
I speak too long, but 'tis to peize the time,
    To eke it, and to draw it out in length,
    To stay you from election.
Ay, but I fear you speak upon the rack,
    Where men enforced do speak anything.
If you do love me, you will find me out.
Look on beauty  
    And you shall see 'tis purchas'd by the weight,
    Which therein works a miracle in nature,
    Making them lightest that wear most of it;
    So are those crisped snaky golden locks
    Which make such wanton gambols with the wind
    Upon supposed fairness often known
    To be the dowry of a second head-
    The skull that bred them in the sepulchre.
Since this fortune falls to you,
         Be content and seek no new.
If you be well pleas'd with this,
         And hold your fortune for your bliss,
         Turn to where your lady is
         And claim her with a loving kiss.
Like one of two contending in a prize,
    That thinks he hath done well in people's eyes,
    Hearing applause and universal shout,
    Giddy in spirit, still gazing in a doubt
    Whether those peals of praise be his or no;
    So, thrice-fair lady, stand I even so,
    As doubtful whether what I see be true,  
    Until confirm'd, sign'd, ratified by you.
Though for myself alone
    I would not be ambitious in my wish
    To wish myself much better, yet for you
    I would be trebled twenty times myself,
    A thousand times more fair, ten thousand times more rich,
    That only to stand high in your account
    I might in virtues, beauties, livings, friends,
    Exceed account.
Myself and what is mine to you and yours
    Is now converted.
I give them with this ring,
    Which when you part from, lose, or give away,
    Let it presage the ruin of your love,
    And be my vantage to exclaim on you.
Madam, you have bereft me of all words;
    Only my blood speaks to you in my veins;
    And there is such confusion in my powers
    As, after some oration fairly spoke
    By a beloved prince, there doth appear
    Among the buzzing pleased multitude,
    Where every something, being blent together,
    Turns to a wild of nothing, save of joy
    Express'd and not express'd.
My Lord Bassanio, and my gentle lady,
    I wish you all the joy that you can wish,
    For I am sure you can wish none from me;
    And, when your honours mean to solemnize
    The bargain of your faith, I do beseech you
    Even at that time I may be married too.
I thank your lordship, you have got me one.
My eyes, my lord, can look as swift as yours:
    You saw the mistress, I beheld the maid;
    You lov'd, I lov'd; for intermission
    No more pertains to me, my lord, than you.
Madam, it is, so you stand pleas'd withal.
And do you, Gratiano, mean good faith?
Lorenzo and Salerio, welcome hither,
    If that the youth of my new int'rest here
    Have power to bid you welcome.
For my part, my lord,
    My purpose was not to have seen you here;
    But meeting with Salerio by the way,
    He did entreat me, past all saying nay,
    To come with him along.
Signior Antonio
    Commends him to you.
Ere I ope his letter,
    I pray you tell me how my good friend doth.
Not sick, my lord, unless it be in mind;
    Nor well, unless in mind; his letter there
    Will show you his estate.
I would you had won the fleece that he hath lost.
With leave, Bassanio: I am half yourself,
    And I must freely have the half of anything
    That this same paper brings you.
Gentle lady,
    When I did first impart my love to you,
    I freely told you all the wealth I had
    Ran in my veins- I was a gentleman;
    And then I told you true.
And yet, dear lady,
    Rating myself at nothing, you shall see
    How much I was a braggart.
When I told you
    My state was nothing, I should then have told you  
    That I was worse than nothing; for indeed
    I have engag'd myself to a dear friend,
    Engag'd my friend to his mere enemy,
    To feed my means.
First go with me to church and call me wife,
    And then away to Venice to your friend;
    For never shall you lie by Portia's side
    With an unquiet soul.
Come, away;
    For you shall hence upon your wedding day.
Bid your friends welcome, show a merry cheer;
    Since you are dear bought, I will love you dear.
[Reads]  'Sweet Bassanio, my ships have all miscarried,
    my creditors grow cruel, my estate is very low, my bond to the
    Jew is forfeit; and since, in paying it, it is impossible I  
    should live, all debts are clear'd between you and I, if I might
    but see you at my death.
Notwithstanding, use your pleasure; if
    your love do not persuade you to come, let not my letter.
But if you knew to whom you show this honour,
    How true a gentleman you send relief,
    How dear a lover of my lord your husband,
    I know you would be prouder of the work
    Than customary bounty can enforce you.
I do desire you
    Not to deny this imposition,
    The which my love and some necessity
    Now lays upon you.
Madam, with all my heart
    I shall obey you in an fair commands.
My people do already know my mind,
    And will acknowledge you and Jessica
    In place of Lord Bassanio and myself.
So fare you well till we shall meet again.
Fair thoughts and happy hours attend on you!
I thank you for your wish, and am well pleas'd
    To wish it back on you.
Fare you well, Jessica.
Come on, Nerissa, I have work in hand
    That you yet know not of; we'll see our husbands
    Before they think of us.
Yes, truly; for, look you, the sins of the father are to
    be laid upon the children; therefore, I promise you, I fear you.
I was always plain with you, and so now I speak my agitation of
    the matter; therefore be o' good cheer, for truly I think you are
    damn'd.
There is but one hope in it that can do you any good, and
    that is but a kind of bastard hope, neither.
Marry, you may partly hope that your father got you not-
   that you are not the Jew's daughter.
Truly then I fear you are damn'd both by father and
    mother; thus when I shun Scylla, your father, I fall into
    Charybdis, your mother; well, you are gone both ways.
I'll tell my husband, Launcelot, what you say; here he
    comes.
I shall grow jealous of you shortly, Launcelot, if you
    thus get my wife into corners.
Nay, you need nor fear us, Lorenzo; Launcelot and I are
    out; he tells me flatly there's no mercy for me in heaven,
    because I am a Jew's daughter; and he says you are no good member
    of the commonwealth, for in converting Jews to Christians you
    raise the price of pork.
I shall answer that better to the commonwealth than you
    can the getting up of the negro's belly; the Moor is with child
    by you, Launcelot.
Goodly Lord, what a wit-snapper are you!
Will you cover, then, sir?
Nay, let me praise you while I have a stomach.
Well, I'll set you forth.
If you deny it, let the danger light
    Upon your charter and your city's freedom.
What, are you answer'd yet?
Are you answered?
I pray you, think you question with the Jew.
Therefore, I do beseech you,
    Make no moe offers, use no farther means,
    But with all brief and plain conveniency
    Let me have judgment, and the Jew his will.
You have among you many a purchas'd slave,
    Which, fike your asses and your dogs and mules,
    You use in abject and in slavish parts,  
    Because you bought them; shall I say to you
    'Let them be free, marry them to your heirs-
    Why sweat they under burdens?
' So do I answer you:
    The pound of flesh which I demand of him
    Is dearly bought, 'tis mine, and I will have it.
If you deny me, fie upon your law!
Came you from Padua, from Bellario?
He attendeth here hard by
    To know your answer, whether you'll admit him.
Some three or four of you
    Go give him courteous conduct to this place.
I beseech you let his lack
    of years be no impediment to let him lack a reverend estimation,
    for I never knew so young a body with so old a head.
Give me your hand; come you from old Bellario?
Are you acquainted with the difference
    That holds this present question in the court?
Of a strange nature is the suit you follow;
    Yet in such rule that the Venetian law
    Cannot impugn you as you do proceed.
You stand within his danger, do you not?
Do you confess the bond?
And, I beseech you,
    Wrest once the law to your authority;
    To do a great right do a little wrong,
    And curb this cruel devil of his will.
I pray you, let me look upon the bond.
It doth appear you are a worthy judge;
    You know the law; your exposition
    Hath been most sound; I charge you by the law,
    Whereof you are a well-deserving pillar,
    Proceed to judgment.
'Twere good you do so much for charity.
You, merchant, have you anything to say?
Give me your hand, Bassanio; fare you well.
Grieve not that I am fall'n to this for you,
    For herein Fortune shows herself more kind
    Than is her custom.
Commend me to your honourable wife;
    Tell her the process of Antonio's end;
    Say how I lov'd you; speak me fair in death;
    And, when the tale is told, bid her be judge
    Whether Bassanio had not once a love.
Repent but you that you shall lose your friend,
    And he repents not that he pays your debt;
    For if the Jew do cut but deep enough,  
    I'll pay it instantly with all my heart.
Antonio, I am married to a wife
    Which is as dear to me as life itself;
    But life itself, my wife, and all the world,
    Are not with me esteem'd above thy life;
    I would lose all, ay, sacrifice them all
    Here to this devil, to deliver you.
Your wife would give you little thanks for that,
    If she were by to hear you make the offer.
'Tis well you offer it behind her back;
    The wish would make else an unquiet house.
And you must cut this flesh from off his breast.
Now, infidel, I have you on the hip.
The law hath yet another hold on you.
You take my house when you do take the prop
    That doth sustain my house; you take my life  
    When you do take the means whereby I live.
What mercy can you render him, Antonio?
I pray you, give me leave to go from hence;  
    I am not well; send the deed after me
    And I will sign it.
Sir, I entreat you home with me to dinner.
I am sorry that your leisure serves you not.
Antonio, gratify this gentleman,
    For in my mind you are much bound to him.
And stand indebted, over and above,
    In love and service to you evermore.
He is well paid that is well satisfied,
    And I, delivering you, am satisfied,
    And therein do account myself well paid.
I pray you, know me when we meet again;
    I wish you well, and so I take my leave.
Dear sir, of force I must attempt you further;
    Take some remembrance of us, as a tribute,
    Not as fee.
Grant me two things, I pray you,
    Not to deny me, and to pardon me.
[To BASSANIO]  And, for your love, I'll take this ring from you.
Do not draw back your hand; I'll take no more,
    And you in love shall not deny me this.
This ring, good sir- alas, it is a trifle;
    I will not shame myself to give you this.
The dearest ring in Venice will I give you,
    And find it out by proclamation;
    Only for this, I pray you, pardon me.
I see, sir, you are liberal in offers;
    You taught me first to beg, and now, methinks,
    You teach me how a beggar should be answer'd.
Well, peace be with you!
Exit GRATIANO
    Come, you and I will thither presently;
    And in the morning early will we both
    Fly toward Belmont.
Fair sir, you are well o'erta'en.
My Lord Bassanio, upon more advice,
    Hath sent you here this ring, and doth entreat
    Your company at dinner.
His ring I do accept most thankfully,
    And so, I pray you, tell him.
Furthermore,
    I pray you show my youth old Shylock's house.
Sir, I would speak with you.
Come, good sir, will you show me to this house?
I would out-night you, did no body come;
    But, hark, I hear the footing of a man.
Your name, I pray you, friend?
I pray you, is my master yet return'd?
Did you see Master Lorenzo?
My friend Stephano, signify, I pray you,
    Within the house, your mistress is at hand;
    And bring your music forth into the air.
Go in, Nerissa;
    Give order to my servants that they take
    No note at all of our being absent hence;
    Nor you, Lorenzo; Jessica, nor you.
We are no tell-tales, madam, fear you not.
We should hold day with the Antipodes,
    If you would walk in absence of the sun.
I thank you, madam; give welcome to my friend.
You should in all sense be much bound to him,
    For, as I hear, he was much bound for you.
Sir, you are very welcome to our house.
[To NERISSA]  By yonder moon I swear you do me wrong;
    In faith, I gave it to the judge's clerk.
Would he were gelt that had it, for my part,
    Since you do take it, love, so much at heart.
What talk you of the posy or the value?
You swore to me, when I did give it you,  
    That you would wear it till your hour of death,
    And that it should lie with you in your grave;
    Though not for me, yet for your vehement oaths,
    You should have been respective and have kept it.
You were to blame, I must be plain with you,
    To part so slightly with your wife's first gift,
    A thing stuck on with oaths upon your finger
    And so riveted with faith unto your flesh.
What ring gave you, my lord?
Not that, I hope, which you receiv'd of me.
If I could add a lie unto a fault,
    I would deny it; but you see my finger
    Hath not the ring upon it; it is gone.
Sweet Portia,
    If you did know to whom I gave the ring,
    If you did know for whom I gave the ring,
    And would conceive for what I gave the ring,
    And how unwillingly I left the ring,
    When nought would be accepted but the ring,
    You would abate the strength of your displeasure.
If you had known the virtue of the ring,
    Or half her worthiness that gave the ring,
    Or your own honour to contain the ring,
    You would not then have parted with the ring.
What man is there so much unreasonable,
    If you had pleas'd to have defended it
    With any terms of zeal, wanted the modesty
    To urge the thing held as a ceremony?
Pardon me, good lady;
    For by these blessed candles of the night,
    Had you been there, I think you would have begg'd
    The ring of me to give the worthy doctor.
Let not that doctor e'er come near my house;
    Since he hath got the jewel that I loved,
    And that which you did swear to keep for me,
    I will become as liberal as you;
    I'll not deny him anything I have,
    No, not my body, nor my husband's bed.
Lie not a night from home; watch me like Argus;
    If you do not, if I be left alone,
    Now, by mine honour which is yet mine own,
    I'll have that doctor for mine bedfellow.
And I his clerk; therefore be well advis'd
    How you do leave me to mine own protection.
Well, do you so, let not me take him then;
    For, if I do, I'll mar the young clerk's pen.
Sir, grieve not you; you are welcome not withstanding.
Mark you but that!
Then you shall be his surety.
Here is a letter; read it at your leisure;  
    It comes from Padua, from Bellario;
    There you shall find that Portia was the doctor,
    Nerissa there her clerk.
Lorenzo here
    Shall witness I set forth as soon as you,
    And even but now return'd; I have not yet
    Enter'd my house.
Antonio, you are welcome;
    And I have better news in store for you
    Than you expect.
Unseal this letter soon;
    There you shall find three of your argosies
    Are richly come to harbour suddenly.
Were you the doctor, and I knew you not?
Were you the clerk that is to make me cuckold?
Sweet doctor, you shall be my bedfellow;
    When I am absent, then lie with my wife.
Sweet lady, you have given me life and living;  
    For here I read for certain that my ships
    Are safely come to road.
My clerk hath some good comforts too for you.
There do I give to you and Jessica,
    From the rich Jew, a special deed of gift,
    After his death, of all he dies possess'd of.
Fair ladies, you drop manna in the way
    Of starved people.
It is almost morning,
    And yet I am sure you are not satisfied
    Of these events at full.
If Sir John Falstaff have committed
    disparagements unto you, I am of the church, and will be
    glad to do my benevolence, to make atonements and
    compremises between you.
It is not meet the Council hear a riot; there is no
    fear of Got in a riot; the Council, look you, shall desire
    to hear the fear of Got, and not to hear a riot; take your
    vizaments in that.
It is that fery person for all the orld, as just as you
    will desire; and seven hundred pounds of moneys, and
    gold, and silver, is her grandsire upon his death's-bed-Got
    deliver to a joyful resurrections!
Shall I tell you a lie?
The knight Sir John is there; and, I beseech you, be
    ruled by your well-willers.
Here is Got's plessing, and your friend, and Justice
  Shallow; and here young Master Slender, that peradventures
    shall tell you another tale, if matters grow to your
    likings.
I thank you for
    my venison, Master Shallow.
Master Page, I am glad to see you; much good do
    it your good heart!
-and I thank you
    always with my heart, la!
Sir, I thank you.
Sir, I thank you; by yea and no, I do.
I am glad to see you, good Master Slender.
You'll not confess, you'll not confess.
Sir, he is within; and I would I could do a good office
    between you.
Now, Master Shallow, you'll complain of me to
    the King?
Knight, you have beaten my men, kill'd my deer,
    and broke open my lodge.
'Twere better for you if it were known in counsel:
    you'll be laugh'd at.
Slender, I broke your  
    head; what matter have you against me?
Marry, sir, I have matter in my head against you;
    and against your cony-catching rascals, Bardolph, Nym,
    and Pistol.
Can you tell, cousin?
Peace, I pray you.
Pistol, did you pick Master Slender's purse?
Be avis'd, sir, and pass good humours; I will say
    'marry trap' with you, if you run the nuthook's humour on  
    me; that is the very note of it.
By this hat, then, he in the red face had it; for
    though I cannot remember what I did when you made me
    drunk, yet I am not altogether an ass.
What say you, Scarlet and John?
Ay, you spake in Latin then too; but 'tis no matter;
    I'll ne'er be drunk whilst I live again, but in honest,
    civil, godly company, for this trick.
You hear all these matters deni'd, gentlemen; you
    hear it.
Mistress Ford, by my troth, you are very well
    met; by your leave, good mistress.
Where have you been?
You have not the Book of Riddles about you,
    have you?
Why, did you not lend it to Alice
    Shortcake upon Allhallowmas last, a fortnight afore
    Michaelmas?
Come, coz; come, coz; we stay for you.
A word
    with you, coz; marry, this, coz: there is, as 'twere, a
    tender, a kind of tender, made afar off by Sir Hugh here.
Do
    you understand me?
Ay, sir, you shall find me reasonable; if it be so, I
    shall do that that is reason.
Give ear to his motions: Master Slender, I will
    description the matter to you, if you be capacity of it.
Nay, I will do as my cousin Shallow says; I pray
    you pardon me; he's a justice of peace in his country,
    simple though I stand here.
But can you affection the oman?
Therefore,
    precisely, can you carry your good will to the maid?
Cousin Abraham Slender, can you love her?
you must speak possitable,
    if you can carry her your desires towards her.
That you must.
Will you, upon good dowry,
    marry her?
Nay, conceive me, conceive me, sweet coz; what
    I do is to pleasure you, coz.
Can you love the maid?
But if you say
    'marry her,' I will marry her; that I am freely dissolved,
    and dissolutely.
No, I thank you, forsooth, heartily; I am very
    well.
The dinner attends you, sir.
I am not a-hungry, I thank you, forsooth.
Go,
    sirrah, for all you are my man, go wait upon my cousin
  Shallow.
I may not go in without your worship; they will not
    sit till you come.
I' faith, I'll eat nothing; I thank you as much as
    though I did.
I pray you, sir, walk in.
I had rather walk here, I thank you.
You are afraid, if you see the
    bear loose, are you not?
I have seen
    Sackerson loose twenty times, and have taken him by the
    chain; but I warrant you, the women have so cried and
    shriek'd at it that it pass'd; but women, indeed, cannot
    abide 'em; they are very ill-favour'd rough things.
Come, gentle Master Slender, come; we stay for you.
I'll eat nothing, I thank you, sir.
By cock and pie, you shall not choose, sir!
Nay, pray you lead the way.
Not I, sir; pray you keep on.
I will not do
    you that wrong.
I pray you, sir.
I pray you
    be gone.
Which of you know Ford of this town?
My honest lads, I will tell you what I am about.
[To ROBIN]  Hold, sirrah; bear you these letters
    tightly;
    Sail like my pinnace to these golden shores.
Falstaff will learn the humour of the age;  
    French thrift, you rogues; myself, and skirted page.
I pray thee go to the casement
    and see if you can see my master, Master Doctor
    Caius, coming.
[Exit RUGBY]  An
    honest, willing, kind fellow, as ever servant shall come in
    house withal; and, I warrant you, no tell-tale nor no
    breed-bate; his worst fault is that he is given to prayer; he is
    something peevish that way; but nobody but has his fault;
    but let that pass.
Peter Simple you say your name is?
How say you?
Vat is you sing?
Pray you, go
    and vetch me in my closet un boitier vert-a box, a green-a
    box.
Ay, forsooth, I'll fetch it you.
You are John Rugby, and you are Jack Rugby.
I beseech you, be not so phlegmatic; hear the
    truth of it.
Peace, I pray you.
Sir Hugh send-a you?
Tarry you a little-a-while.
[Aside to SIMPLE]  I am glad he is so quiet; if he
    had been throughly moved, you should have heard him
    so loud and so melancholy.
But notwithstanding, man, I'll
    do you your master what good I can; and the very yea and
    the no is, the French doctor, my master-I may call him
    my master, look you, for I keep his house; and I wash,
    wring, brew, bake, scour, dress meat and drink, make the
    beds, and do all myself-
  SIMPLE.
[Aside to SIMPLE]  Are you avis'd o' that?
You  
    shall find it a great charge; and to be up early and down
    late; but notwithstanding-to tell you in your ear, I would
    have no words of it-my master himself is in love with
    Mistress Anne Page; but notwithstanding that, I know
    Anne's mind-that's neither here nor there.
You
    may be gone; it is not good you tarry here.
Do not you tell-a me dat I
    shall have Anne Page for myself?
Sir, the maid loves you, and all shall be well.
Come near the house, I pray
    you.
In truth, sir, and she is pretty, and honest, and
    gentle; and one that is your friend, I can tell you that by
    the way; I praise heaven for it.
Troth, sir, all is in His hands above; but
    notwithstanding, Master Fenton, I'll be sworn on a book
    she loves you.
But, indeed, she is
    given too much to allicholy and musing; but for you-well,
    go to.
[Reads]
    'Ask me no reason why I love you; for though Love use
    Reason for his precisian, he admits him not for his counsellor.
You love sack, and so do I; would you
    desire better sympathy?
And, trust me, I was coming to you.
Faith, but you do, in my mind.
Well, I do, then; yet, I say, I could show you to
    the contrary.
Did you ever hear the like?
Well,
    I will find you twenty lascivious turtles ere one chaste
    man.
'Boarding' call you it?
Whither go you, George?
Hark you.
Get you home;
    go.
Will you go, Mistress Page?
Have with you.
Go in with us and see; we have an hour's talk
    with you.
You heard what this knave told me, did you not?
Yes; and you heard what the other told me?
Do you think there is truth in them?
Master Page, will you go with
    us?
Good mine host o' th' Garter, a word with you.
[To PAGE] Will you go with us to behold it?
Hark, I will tell you
    what our sport shall be.
None, I protest; but I'll give you a pottle of burnt
    sack to give me recourse to him, and tell him my name is
    Brook-only for a jest.
Will you go, Mynheers?
Have with you, mine host.
Tut, sir, I could have told you more.
In these
    times you stand on distance, your passes, stoccadoes, and
    I know not what.
I have seen the time with my long sword I would
    have made you four tall fellows skip like rats.
Have with you.
I have been content, sir, you should
    lay my countenance to pawn.
I have grated upon my good
    friends for three reprieves for you and your coach-fellow,
    Nym; or else you had look'd through the grate, like a
    geminy of baboons.
I am damn'd in hell for swearing to
    gentlemen my friends you were good soldiers and tall fellows;
    and when Mistress Bridget lost the handle of her fan,
    I took 't upon mine honour thou hadst it not.
Reason, you rogue, reason.
At a word, hang no more about me,  
    I am no gibbet for you.
You'll not bear a letter
    for me, you rogue!
I, I, I myself
    sometimes, leaving the fear of God on the left hand, and hiding
    mine honour in my necessity, am fain to shuffle, to hedge,
    and to lurch; and yet you, rogue, will ensconce your rags,
    your cat-a-mountain looks, your red-lattice phrases, and
    your bold-beating oaths, under the shelter of your honour!
You will not do it, you!
Sir, here's a woman would speak with you.
Well, on: Mistress Ford, you say-
  QUICKLY.
Well, heaven forgive you, and all of
    us, I pray.
Marry, this is the short and the long of it: you
    have brought her into such a canaries as 'tis wonderful.
Yet
    there has been knights, and lords, and gentlemen, with
    their coaches; I warrant you, coach after coach, letter after
    letter, gift after gift; smelling so sweetly, all musk, and so
    rushling, I warrant you, in silk and gold; and in such alligant
    terms; and in such wine and sugar of the best and the
    fairest, that would have won any woman's heart; and I
    warrant you, they could never get an eye-wink of her.
I had myself twenty angels given me this morning; but I
    defy all angels, in any such sort, as they say, but in the
    way of honesty; and, I warrant you, they could never get
    her so much as sip on a cup with the proudest of them all;  
    and yet there has been earls, nay, which is more,
    pensioners; but, I warrant you, all is one with her.
Marry, she hath receiv'd your letter; for the
    which she thanks you a thousand times; and she gives you
    to notify that her husband will be absence from his house
    between ten and eleven.
Ay, forsooth; and then you may come and see
    the picture, she says, that you wot of.
Why, you say well.
Mistress Page hath her hearty commendations
    to you too; and let me tell you in your ear, she's as
    fartuous a civil modest wife, and one, I tell you, that will  
    not miss you morning nor evening prayer, as any is in
    Windsor, whoe'er be the other; and she bade me tell your
    worship that her husband is seldom from home, but she
    hopes there will come a time.
I never knew a woman so
    dote upon a man: surely I think you have charms, la!
But Mistress Page
    would desire you to send her your little page of all loves.
Nay, but do so then; and, look you, he may come
    and go between you both; and in any case have a
    nay-word, that you may know one another's mind, and the boy
    never need to understand any thing; for 'tis not good that
    children should know any wickedness.
Old folks, you
    know, have discretion, as they say, and know the world.
Sir John, there's one Master Brook below would
    fain speak with you, and be acquainted with you; and hath
    sent your worship a moming's draught of sack.
Mistress
    Ford and Mistress Page, have I encompass'd you?
Bless you, sir!
And you, sir!
Would you speak with me?
I make bold to press with so little preparation upon
    you.
Good Master Brook, I desire more acquaintance
    of you.
Good Sir John, I sue for yours-not to charge you; for I
    must let you understand I think myself in better plight for
    a lender than you are; the which hath something
    embold'ned me to this unseason'd intrusion; for they say, if
    money go before, all ways do lie open.
Troth, and I have a bag of money here troubles me; if
    you will help to bear it, Sir John, take all, or half, for easing
    me of the carriage.
I will tell you, sir, if you will give me the hearing.
Sir, I hear you are a scholar-I will be brief with you  
    -and you have been a man long known to me, though I
    had never so good means as desire to make myself acquainted
    with you.
I shall discover a thing to you, wherein
    I must very much lay open mine own imperfection; but,
    good Sir John, as you have one eye upon my follies, as you
    hear them unfolded, turn another into the register of your
    own, that I may pass with a reproof the easier, sith you
    yourself know how easy is it to be such an offender.
I have long lov'd her, and, I protest to you, bestowed
    much on her; followed her with a doting observance;
    engross'd opportunities to meet her; fee'd every slight occasion
    that could but niggardly give me sight of her; not
    only bought many presents to give her, but have given
    largely to many to know what she would have given;
    briefly, I have pursu'd her as love hath pursued me; which
    hath been on the wing of all occasions.
Have you receiv'd no promise of satisfaction at
    her hands?
Have you importun'd her to such a purpose?
To what purpose have you unfolded this to me?
When I have told you that, I have told you all.
Now, Sir John, here is the heart  
    of my purpose: you are a gentleman of excellent
    breeding, admirable discourse, of great admittance, authentic in
    your place and person, generally allow'd for your many
    war-like, courtlike, and learned preparations.
Believe it, for you know it.
There is money; spend it,
    spend it; spend more; spend all I have; only give me so
    much of your time in exchange of it as to lay an amiable
    siege to the honesty of this Ford's wife; use your art of
    wooing, win her to consent to you; if any man may, you
    may as soon as any.
Would it apply well to the vehemency of your
    affection, that I should win what you would enjoy?
Methinks you prescribe to yourself very preposterously.
What say you to't, Sir John?
Master Brook, I will first make bold with your
    money; next, give me your hand; and last, as I am a gentleman,
    you shall, if you will, enjoy Ford's wife.
I say you shall.
Want no money, Sir John; you shall want none.
Want no Mistress Ford, Master Brook; you shall
    want none.
I shall be with her, I may tell you, by her own
    appointment; even as you came in to me her assistant, or
    go-between, parted from me; I say I shall be with her between
    ten and eleven; for at that time the jealous rascally
    knave, her husband, will be forth.
Come you to me at
    night; you shall know how I speed.
Do you know Ford,
    Sir?
I would you knew Ford, sir, that you might avoid him
    if you saw him.
Take
    your rapier, Jack; I vill tell you how I vill kill him.
Save you, Master Doctor Caius!
Give you good morrow, sir.
Vat be all you, one, two, tree, four, come for?
I pray you, bear witness that me have stay six or
    seven, two tree hours for him, and he is no come.
He is the wiser man, Master Doctor: he is a curer  
    of souls, and you a curer of bodies; if you should fight,
    you go against the hair of your professions.
Master Shallow, you have yourself been a great fighter,
    though now a man of peace.
Master Doctor
  CAIUS, I come to fetch you home.
I am sworn of the peace;
    you have show'd yourself a wise physician, and Sir Hugh
    hath shown himself a wise and patient churchman.
Me tank you for dat.
And, moreover, bully-but first:  [Aside to the others]
    Master Guest, and Master Page, and eke Cavaleiro Slender,
    go you through the town to Frogmore.
By gar, me dank you vor dat; by gar, I love you; and
    I shall procure-a you de good guest, de earl, de knight, de
    lords, de gentlemen, my patients.
I pray you now, good Master Slender's serving-man,
    and friend Simple by your name, which way have you
    look'd for Master Caius, that calls himself Doctor of
    Physic?
I most fehemently desire you you will also look that
    way.
Pray you give me my gown; or else keep it in your
    arms.
Save you, good Sir Hugh!
Pless you from his mercy sake, all of you!
Do you study
    them both, Master Parson?
We are come to you to do a good office, Master
    Parson.
Yonder is a most reverend gentleman, who, belike having
    received wrong by some person, is at most odds with
    his own gravity and patience that ever you saw.
I think you know him: Master Doctor Caius, the
    renowned French physician.
I had as lief
    you would tell me of a mess of porridge.
He has no more knowledge in Hibocrates and
    Galen, and he is a knave besides-a cowardly knave as you
    would desires to be acquainted withal.
I warrant you, he's the man should fight with him.
So do you, good Master Doctor.
I pray you, let-a me speak a word with your ear.
Verefore will you not meet-a me?
[Aside to CAIUS]  Pray you use your patience; in
    good time.
By gar, you are de coward, de Jack dog, John ape.
[Aside to CAIUS]  Pray you, let us not be
    laughing-stocks to other men's humours; I desire you in
    friendship, and I will one way or other make you amends.
As I am a Christians soul, now, look you, this is the
    place appointed.
Boys of art, I have
    deceiv'd you both; I have directed you to wrong places;
    your hearts are mighty, your skins are whole, and let burnt
    sack be the issue.
Have you make-a de sot of us,
    ha, ha?
I
    desire you that we may be friends; and let us knog our prains
    together to be revenge on this same scall, scurvy, cogging  
    companion, the host of the Garter.
Pray you follow.
Nay, keep your way, little gallant; you were
    wont to be a follower, but now you are a leader.
Whether
    had you rather lead mine eyes, or eye your master's heels?
I had rather, forsooth, go before you like a man than
    follow him like a dwarf.
O, you are a flattering boy; now I see you'll be a
    courtier.
Whither go you?
I think, if your husbands were dead, you two
    would marry.
Where had you this pretty weathercock?
What do you call your knight's
    name, sirrah?
Trust me, a good knot; I have good cheer at home,
    and I pray you all go with me.
You have, Master Slender; I stand wholly for you.
But
    my wife, Master Doctor, is for you altogether.
What say you to young Master Fenton?
Not by my consent, I promise you.
I beseech you, heartily, some of you go home with me  
    to dinner: besides your cheer, you shall have sport; I will
    show you a monster.
Master Doctor, you shall go; so shall
    you, Master Page; and you, Sir Hugh.
Well, fare you well; we shall have the freer
    wooing at Master Page's.
Will you go, gentles?
Have with you to see this monster.
Marry, as I told you before, John and Robert, be
    ready here hard by in the brew-house; and when I suddenly
    call you, come forth, and, without any pause or
    staggering, take this basket on your shoulders.
Be gone, and come when you are call'd.
How now, my eyas-musket, what news with
    you?
You little Jack-a-Lent, have you been true to us?
My master knows not of your
    being here, and hath threat'ned to put me into everlasting
    liberty, if I tell you of it; for he swears he'll turn me away.
[Exit  
  ROBIN]  Mistress Page, remember you your cue.
Do not betray me, sir; I fear you love Mistress
    Page.
Well, heaven knows how I love you; and you
    shall one day find it.
Nay, I must tell you, so you do; or else I could
    not be in that mind.
here's
    Mistress Page at the door, sweating and blowing and looking
    wildly, and would needs speak with you presently.
Pray you, do so; she's a very tattling woman.
O Mistress Ford, what have you done?
Out upon you, how
    am I mistook in you!
Pray heaven it be not so that you have such a
    man here; but 'tis most certain your husband's coming,
    with half Windsor at his heels, to search for such a one.
I
    come before to tell you.
If you know yourself clear, why,
    I am glad of it; but if you have a friend here, convey,
    convey him out.
Be not amaz'd; call all your senses to you;
    defend your reputation, or bid farewell to your good life  
    for ever.
For shame, never stand 'you had rather' and 'you
    had rather'!
Your husband's here at hand; bethink you of
    some conveyance; in the house you cannot hide him.
O,
    how have you deceiv'd me!
Look how you drumble.
Pray you come near.
How now, whither bear you this?
Why, what have you to do whither they bear it?
I warrant you, buck; and of
    the season too, it shall appear.
[Exeunt SERVANTS with
    basket]  Gentlemen, I have dream'd to-night; I'll tell you my
    dream.
Good Master Ford, be contented; you wrong yourself
    too much.
Up, gentlemen, you shall see sport
    anon; follow me, gentlemen.
FORD]  Heard you that?
You use me well, Master Ford, do you?
Heaven make you better than your thoughts!
Fie, fie, Master Ford, are you not asham'd?
Well, I promis'd you a dinner.
I pray you pardon me; I will hereafter make
    known to you why I have done this.
Come, wife, come,
    Mistress Page; I pray you pardon me; pray heartly,
    pardon me.
I do invite you to-morrow morning to my house to breakfast;
    after, we'll a-birding together; I have a fine hawk for
    the bush.
Pray you go, Master Page.
I pray you now, remembrance to-morrow on the
    lousy knave, mine host.
May be he tells you true.
If opportunity and humblest suit
    Cannot attain it, why then-hark you hither.
Hark ye, Master Slender would speak a word
    with you.
Pray you, a
    word with you.
I had a father, Mistress Anne; my uncle can tell
    you good jests of him.
Pray you, uncle, tell Mistress Anne
    the jest how my father stole two geese out of a pen, good
    uncle.
Mistress Anne, my cousin loves you.
He will maintain you like a gentlewoman.
He will make you a hundred and fifty pounds
    jointure.
Marry, I thank you for it; I thank you for that
    good comfort.
She calls you, coz; I'll leave you.
I mean, Master Slender, what would you with me?
Truly, for mine own part I would little or nothing
    with you.
They
    can tell you how things go better than I can.
I told you, sir, my daughter is dispos'd of.
She is no match for you.
Sir, will you hear me?
Knowing my mind, you wrong me, Master Fenton.
I mean it not; I seek you a better husband.
Good Master
    Fenton,
    I will not be your friend, nor enemy;
    My daughter will I question how she loves you,
    And as I find her, so am I affected;
    Till then, farewell, sir; she must needs go in;
    Her father will be angry.
This is my doing now: 'Nay,' said I 'will you cast
    away your child on a fool, and a physician?
The rogues slighted me into the river with as little remorse
    as they would have drown'd a blind bitch's puppies, fifteen
    i' th' litter; and you may know by my size that I have
    a kind of alacrity in sinking; if the bottom were as deep as
    hell I should down.
Here's Mistress Quickly, sir, to speak with you
  FALSTAFF.
By your leave; I cry you mercy.
Her husband goes this morning
    a-birding; she desires you once more to come to her between
    eight and nine; I must carry her word quickly.
She'll make
    you amends, I warrant you.
Peace be with you, sir.
Bless you, sir!
Now, Master Brook, you come to know what
    hath pass'd between me and Ford's wife?
Master Brook, I will not lie to you; I was at her
    house the hour she appointed me.
And sped you, sir?
What, while you were there?
And did he search for you, and could not find you?
And how long lay you there?
Nay, you shall hear, Master Brook, what I have
    suffer'd to bring this woman to evil for your good.
In good sadness, sir, I am sorry that for my sake you
    have suffer'd all this.
My suit, then, is desperate;
    you'll undertake her no more.
Come to me at your convenient leisure, and you shall
    know how I speed; and the conclusion shall be crowned
    with your enjoying her.
You shall have her, Master
    Brook; Master Brook, you shall cuckold Ford.
Mistress Ford desires you to come suddenly.
Sir Hugh, my husband says my son profits
    nothing in the world at his book; I pray you ask him some
    questions in his accidence.
You are a very simplicity oman; I pray you, peace.
No, it is 'lapis'; I pray you remember in your prain.
Nominativo, hig, hag, hog; pray you, mark: genitivo,
    hujus.
I pray you, have your remembrance, child.
'Hang-hog' is Latin for bacon, I warrant you.
He
    teaches him to hick and to hack, which they'll do fast
    enough of themselves; and to call 'horum'; fie upon you!
It is qui, quae, quod; if you forget your qui's, your
    quae's, and your quod's, you must be preeches.
Exit SIR HUGH
    Get you home, boy.
I see you are obsequious in your love, and I
    profess requital to a hair's breadth; not only, Mistress Ford, in
    the simple office of love, but in all the accoutrement,
    complement, and ceremony of it.
But are you sure of your
    husband now?
Truly, I am so glad you have nobody here.
Why, then, you are utterly sham'd, and he's but
    a dead man.
What a woman are you!
Alas, three of Master Ford's brothers watch the
    door with pistols, that none shall issue out; otherwise you
    might slip away ere he came.
But what make you here?
There is no hiding you in the house.
If you go out in your own semblance, you die,
    Sir John.
Unless you go out disguis'd.
Quick, quick; we'll come dress you straight.
Go, sirs, take the basket again on your shoulders;
    your master is hard at door; if he bid you set it down, obey
    him; quickly, dispatch.
Ay, but if it prove true, Master Page, have you any
    way then to unfool me again?
O you panderly
    rascals, there's a knot, a ging, a pack, a conspiracy
    against me.
Come, come forth; behold what honest clothes you
    send forth to bleaching.
Why, this passes, Master Ford; you are not to go loose
    any longer; you must be pinion'd.
Heaven be my witness, you do, if you suspect
    me in any dishonesty.
Are you not asham'd?
I shall find you anon.
Will you take up your wife's
    clothes?
If you find a man there, he shall die a flea's
    death.
By my fidelity, this is not well, Master Ford; this
    wrongs you.
Master Ford, you must pray, and not follow the
    imaginations of your own heart; this is jealousies.
Come you and the old
    woman down; my husband will come into the chamber.
Come down, you
    witch, you hag you; come down, I say.
[Beating him]  Out of my door, you
    witch, you hag, you.
baggage, you polecat, you ronyon!
I'll conjure you, I'll fortune-tell you.
Are you not asham'd?
I think you have kill'd the
    poor woman.
'Tis a goodly credit for you.
Will you follow, gentlemen?
I beseech you follow;
    see but the issue of my jealousy; if I cry out thus upon no
    trail, never trust me when I open again.
What think you?
Ay, sir; I'll call them to you.
And did he send you both these letters at an instant?
Devise but how you'll use him when he comes,
    And let us two devise to bring him thither.
You have heard of such a spirit, and well you know
    The superstitious idle-headed eld
    Receiv'd, and did deliver to our age,  
    This tale of Heme the Hunter for a truth.
When you have brought him thither,
    What shall be done with him?
Fear not you that.
Pray you, sir, was't not the wise woman of
    Brainford?
What would you
    with her?
I tell you for
    good will, look you; you are wise, and full of gibes and
    vlouting-stogs, and 'tis not convenient you should be
    cozened.
Fare you well.
I cannot tell vat is dat; but it is tell-a me dat you
    make grand preparation for a Duke de Jamany.
By my
    trot, dere is no duke that the court is know to come; I
    tell you for good will.
whence come you?
Yes, I warrant;
    speciously one of them; Mistress Ford, good heart, is beaten
    black and blue, that you cannot see a white spot about her.
Sir, let me speak with you in your chamber; you
    shall hear how things go, and, I warrant, to your content.
Good hearts, what ado
    here is to bring you together!
Sure, one of you does not
    serve heaven well, that you are so cross'd.
I will hear you, Master Fenton; and I will, at the least,
    keep your counsel.
From time to time I have acquainted you
    With the dear love I bear to fair Anne Page;
    Who, mutually, hath answer'd my affection,
    So far forth as herself might be her chooser,
    Even to my wish.
I have a letter from her
    Of such contents as you will wonder at;
    The mirth whereof so larded with my matter
    That neither, singly, can be manifested
    Without the show of both.
The image of the jest
    I'll show you here at large.
And here it rests-that you'll procure the vicar
    To stay for me at church, 'twixt twelve and one,
    And in the lawful name of marrying,
    To give our hearts united ceremony.
Bring you the maid, you shall not lack a priest.
I'll provide you a chain, and I'll do what I can to
    get you a pair of horns.
Be you in the Park about
    midnight, at Herne's oak, and you shall see wonders.
Went you not to her yesterday, sir, as you told me
    you had appointed?
I went to her, Master Brook, as you see, like a
    poor old man; but I came from her, Master Brook, like a
    poor old woman.
I will tell you-he beat me grievously
    in the shape of a woman; for in the shape of man, Master
    Brook, I fear not Goliath with a weaver's beam; because
    I know also life is a shuttle.
tell you all, Master Brook.
I'll tell you strange things
    of this knave-Ford, on whom to-night I will be revenged,
    and I will deliver his wife into your hand.
Master Doctor, my daughter is in green; when
    you see your time, take her by the hand, away with her to
    the deanery, and dispatch it quickly.
Fare you well, sir.
Be pold, I pray you; follow me into the pit; and when I
    give the watch-ords, do as I pid you.
Elves, list your names; silence, you airy toys.
Go you, and where you find a maid  
    That, ere she sleep, has thrice her prayers said,
    Raise up the organs of her fantasy
    Sleep she as sound as careless infancy;
    But those as sleep and think not on their sins,
    Pinch them, arms, legs, backs, shoulders, sides, and shins.
The several chairs of order look you scour
    With juice of balm and every precious flower;
    Each fair instalment, coat, and sev'ral crest,
    With loyal blazon, evermore be blest!
And nightly, meadow-fairies, look you sing,
    Like to the Garter's compass, in a ring;
    Th' expressure that it bears, green let it be,
    More fertile-fresh than all the field to see;
    And 'Honi soit qui mal y pense' write  
    In em'rald tufts, flow'rs purple, blue and white;
    Like sapphire, pearl, and rich embroidery,
    Buckled below fair knighthood's bending knee.
Pray you, lock hand in hand; yourselves in order set;
    And twenty glow-worms shall our lanterns be,
    To guide our measure round about the tree.
About him, fairies; sing a scornful rhyme;
    And, as you trip, still pinch him to your time.
Nay, do not fly; I think we have watch'd you now.
I pray you, come, hold up the jest no higher.
Now, good Sir John, how like you Windsor wives?
See you these, husband?
I will never take you for my love again; but I will
    always count you my deer.
Sir John Falstaff, serve Got, and leave your desires,
    and fairies will not pinse you.
And leave you your jealousies too, I pray you.
Why, Sir John, do you think, though we would
    have thrust virtue out of our hearts by the head and
    shoulders, and have given ourselves without scruple to hell,
    that ever the devil could have made you our delight?
Well, I am your theme; you have the start of me;
    I am dejected; I am not able to answer the Welsh flannel;
    ignorance itself is a plummet o'er me; use me as you will.
Marry, sir, we'll bring you to Windsor, to one Master
    Brook, that you have cozen'd of money, to whom you
    should have been a pander.
Over and above that you have
    suffer'd, I think to repay that money will be a biting
    affliction.
Have you dispatch'd'?
Upon my life, then, you took the wrong.
What need you tell me that?
Did not I tell you how
    you should know my daughter by her garments?
Why, did you take her in green?
Now, Mistress, how chance you went not with Master
    Slender?
Why went you not with Master Doctor, maid?
I am glad, though you have ta'en a special stand
    to strike at me, that your arrow hath glanc'd.
Master Fenton,
    Heaven give you many, many merry days!
Sir John,
    To Master Brook you yet shall hold your word;
    For he, to-night, shall lie with Mistress Ford.
What say you, Hermia?
To you your father should be as a god;
    One that compos'd your beauties; yea, and one
    To whom you are but as a form in wax,
    By him imprinted, and within his power
    To leave the figure, or disfigure it.
Therefore, fair Hermia, question your desires,
    Know of your youth, examine well your blood,
    Whether, if you yield not to your father's choice,
    You can endure the livery of a nun,
    For aye to be shady cloister mew'd,  
    To live a barren sister all your life,
    Chanting faint hymns to the cold fruitless moon.
You have her father's love, Demetrius;
    Let me have Hermia's; do you marry him.
But, Demetrius, come;
    And come, Egeus; you shall go with me;
    I have some private schooling for you both.
For you, fair Hermia, look you arm yourself
    To fit your fancies to your father's will,
    Or else the law of Athens yields you up-
    Which by no means we may extenuate-
    To death, or to a vow of single life.
Demetrius, and Egeus, go along;
    I must employ you in some business
    Against our nuptial, and confer with you
    Of something nearly that concerns yourselves.
With duty and desire we follow you.
Call you me fair?
Were the world mine, Demetrius being bated,
    The rest I'd give to be to you translated.
O, teach me how you look, and with what art
    You sway the motion of Demetrius' heart!
Helen, to you our minds we will unfold:
    To-morrow night, when Phoebe doth behold
    Her silver visage in the wat'ry glass,
    Decking with liquid pearl the bladed grass,
    A time that lovers' flights doth still conceal,
    Through Athens' gates have we devis'd to steal.
And in the wood where often you and I
    Upon faint primrose beds were wont to lie,
    Emptying our bosoms of their counsel sweet,
    There my Lysander and myself shall meet;
    And thence from Athens turn away our eyes,
    To seek new friends and stranger companies.
[Exit HERMIA] Helena, adieu;
    As you on him, Demetrius dote on you.
A very good piece of work, I assure you, and a merry.
Answer, as I call you.
Flute, you must take Thisby on you.
That's all one; you shall play it in a mask, and you may
    speak as small as you will.
No, no, you must play Pyramus; and, Flute, you Thisby.
Robin Starveling, you must play Thisby's mother.
You, Pyramus' father; myself, Thisby's father; Snug, the  
    joiner, you, the lion's part.
Have you the lion's part written?
Pray you, if it be, give it
    me, for I am slow of study.
An you should do it too terribly, you would fright the
    Duchess and the ladies, that they would shriek; and that were
    enough to hang us all.
I grant you, friends, if you should fright the ladies out
    of their wits, they would have no more discretion but to hang us;
    but I will aggravate my voice so, that I will roar you as gently
    as any sucking dove; I will roar you an 'twere any nightingale.
You can play no part but Pyramus; for Pyramus is a
    sweet-fac'd man; a proper man, as one shall see in a summer's
    day; a most lovely gentleman-like man; therefore you must needs
    play Pyramus.
Why, what you will.
Some of your French crowns have no hair at all, and then
    you will play bare-fac'd.
But, masters, here are your parts; and
    I am to entreat you, request you, and desire you, to con them by
    to-morrow night; and meet me in the palace wood, a mile without
    the town, by moonlight; there will we rehearse; for if we meet in
    the city, we shall be dogg'd with company, and our devices known.
I pray you, fail me not.
whither wander you?
The cowslips tall her pensioners be;
              In their gold coats spots you see;
              Those be rubies, fairy favours,
              In those freckles live their savours.
Either I mistake your shape and making quite,
    Or else you are that shrewd and knavish sprite
    Call'd Robin Goodfellow.
Are not you he
    That frights the maidens of the villagery,
    Skim milk, and sometimes labour in the quern,  
    And bootless make the breathless housewife churn,
    And sometime make the drink to bear no barm,
    Mislead night-wanderers, laughing at their harm?
Those that Hobgoblin call you, and sweet Puck,
    You do their work, and they shall have good luck.
Are not you he?
Why art thou here,
    Come from the farthest steep of India,
    But that, forsooth, the bouncing Amazon,
    Your buskin'd mistress and your warrior love,  
    To Theseus must be wedded, and you come
    To give their bed joy and prosperity?
Do you amend it, then; it lies in you.
How long within this wood intend you stay?
If you will patiently dance in our round,
    And see our moonlight revels, go with us;
    If not, shun me, and I will spare your haunts.
You draw me, you hard-hearted adamant;
    But yet you draw not iron, for my heart
    Is true as steel.
Leave you your power to draw,
    And I shall have no power to follow you.
Do I entice you?
Do I speak you fair?
Or, rather, do I not in plainest truth
    Tell you I do not nor I cannot love you?
And even for that do I love you the more.
I am your spaniel; and, Demetrius,
    The more you beat me, I will fawn on you.
Use me but as your spaniel, spurn me, strike me,
    Neglect me, lose me; only give me leave,
    Unworthy as I am, to follow you.
What worser place can I beg in your love,
    And yet a place of high respect with me,
    Than to be used as you use your dog?
And I am sick when I look not on you.
You do impeach your modesty too much
    To leave the city and commit yourself
    Into the hands of one that loves you not;
    To trust the opportunity of night,
    And the ill counsel of a desert place,
    With the rich worth of your virginity.
Your virtue is my privilege for that:
    It is not night when I do see your face,
    Therefore I think I am not in the night;
    Nor doth this wood lack worlds of company,
    For you, in my respect, are all the world.
The wildest hath not such a heart as you.
Run when you will; the story shall be chang'd:
    Apollo flies, and Daphne holds the chase;
    The dove pursues the griffin; the mild hind
    Makes speed to catch the tiger- bootless speed,
    When cowardice pursues and valour flies.
Weaving spiders, come not here;
                 Hence, you long-legg'd spinners, hence.
Fair love, you faint with wand'ring in the wood;
    And, to speak troth, I have forgot our way;
    We'll rest us, Hermia, if you think it good,
    And tarry for the comfort of the day.
Be it so, Lysander: find you out a bed,
    For I upon this bank will rest my head.
Lysander, if you live, good sir, awake.
Yet Hermia still loves you; then be content.
The will of man is by his reason sway'd,
    And reason says you are the worthier maid.
Is't not enough, is't not enough, young man,
    That I did never, no, nor never can,
    Deserve a sweet look from Demetrius' eye,
    But you must flout my insufficiency?
Good troth, you do me wrong, good sooth, you do,
    In such disdainful manner me to woo.
But fare you well; perforce I must confess
    I thought you lord of more true gentleness.
Methought a serpent eat my heart away,
    And you sat smiling at his cruel prey.
Alack, where are you?
Speak, an if you hear;
    Speak, of all loves!
Then I well perceive you are not nigh.
Either death or you I'll find immediately.
How answer you that?
I fear it, I promise you.
Masters, you ought to consider with yourself to bring in-
    God shield us!
Nay, you must name his name, and half his face must be seen
    through the lion's neck; and he himself must speak through,
    saying thus, or to the same defect: 'Ladies,' or 'Fair ladies, I
    would wish you' or 'I would request you' or 'I would entreat you
    not to fear, not to tremble.
If you think I
    come hither as a lion, it were pity of my life.
But there is two hard things- that
    is, to bring the moonlight into a chamber; for, you know, Pyramus
    and Thisby meet by moonlight.
Why, then may you leave a casement of the great chamber
    window, where we play, open; and the moon may shine in at the
    casement.
What say you, Bottom?
Pyramus, you begin; when
    you have spoken your speech, enter into that brake; and so every
    one according to his cue.
Ay, marry, must you; for you must understand he goes but to
    see a noise that he heard, and is to come again.
Why, you must not speak that yet; that
    you answer to Pyramus.
I'll follow you; I'll lead you about a round,
    Through bog, through bush, through brake, through brier;  
    Sometime a horse I'll be, sometime a hound,
    A hog, a headless bear, sometime a fire;
    And neigh, and bark, and grunt, and roar, and burn,
    Like horse, hound, hog, bear, fire, at every turn.
What do you see?
You see an ass-head of your own, do you?
Methinks, mistress, you should have little reason for that.
I shall desire you of more acquaintance, good Master
    Cobweb.
If I cut my finger, I shall make bold with you.
I pray you, commend me to Mistress Squash, your mother, and
    to Master Peascod, your father.
Good Master Peaseblossom, I shall
    desire you of more acquaintance too.
Your name, I beseech you,
    sir?
I promise you your kindred hath made my eyes water
    ere now.
I desire you of more acquaintance, good Master
    Mustardseed.
O, why rebuke you him that loves you so?
So should the murdered look; and so should I,
    Pierc'd through the heart with your stern cruelty;
    Yet you, the murderer, look as bright, as clear,
    As yonder Venus in her glimmering sphere.
Why should you think that I should woo in scorn?
How can these things in me seem scorn to you,  
    Bearing the badge of faith, to prove them true?
Will you give her o'er?
Weigh oath with oath, and you will nothing weigh:
    Your vows to her and me, put in two scales,
    Will even weigh; and both as light as tales.
Nor none, in my mind, now you give her o'er.
Demetrius loves her, and he loves not you.
I see you all are bent
    To set against me for your merriment.
If you were civil and knew courtesy,
    You would not do me thus much injury.
Can you not hate me, as I know you do,
    But you must join in souls to mock me too?
If you were men, as men you are in show,
    You would not use a gentle lady so:
    To vow, and swear, and superpraise my parts,
    When I am sure you hate me with your hearts.
None of noble sort
    Would so offend a virgin, and extort
    A poor soul's patience, all to make you sport.
You are unkind, Demetrius; be not so;
    For you love Hermia.
This you know I know;
    And here, with all good will, with all my heart,
    In Hermia's love I yield you up my part;
    And yours of Helena to me bequeath,  
    Whom I do love and will do till my death.
You speak not as you think; it cannot be.
Have you conspir'd, have you with these contriv'd,
    To bait me with this foul derision?
And will you rent our ancient love asunder,
    To join with men in scorning your poor friend?
It is not friendly, 'tis not maidenly;
    Our sex, as well as I, may chide you for it,
    Though I alone do feel the injury.
I am amazed at your passionate words;
    I scorn you not; it seems that you scorn me.
Have you not set Lysander, as in scorn,  
    To follow me and praise my eyes and face?
What though I be not so in grace as you,
    So hung upon with love, so fortunate,
    But miserable most, to love unlov'd?
This you should pity rather than despise.
I understand not what you mean by this.
If you have any pity, grace, or manners,
    You would not make me such an argument.
Away, you Ethiope!
No, no, he will
    Seem to break loose- take on as you would follow,
    But yet come not.
Why are you grown so rude?
Do you not jest?
Yes, sooth; and so do you.
I would I had your bond; for I perceive
    A weak bond holds you; I'll not trust your word.
Can you do me greater harm than hate?
Are not you Lysander?
Since night you lov'd me; yet since night you left me.
Why then, you left me- O, the gods forbid!
you juggler!
you cankerblossom!
Have you come by night,
    And stol'n my love's heart from him?
Have you no modesty, no maiden shame,
    No touch of bashfulness?
Will you tear
    Impatient answers from my gentle tongue?
you counterfeit, you puppet you!
And are you grown so high in his esteem
    Because I am so dwarfish and so low?
I pray you, though you mock me, gentlemen,
    Let her not hurt me.
I evermore did love you, Hermia,
    Did ever keep your counsels, never wrong'd you;
    Save that, in love unto Demetrius,
    I told him of your stealth unto this wood.
He followed you; for love I followed him;
    But he hath chid me hence, and threat'ned me
    To strike me, spurn me, nay, to kill me too;
    And now, so you will let me quiet go,  
    To Athens will I bear my folly back,
    And follow you no further.
Why, get you gone!
Who is't that hinders you?
No, sir, she shall not, though you take her part.
Why will you suffer her to flout me thus?
Get you gone, you dwarf;
    You minimus, of hind'ring knot-grass made;
    You bead, you acorn.
You, mistress, all this coil is long of you.
I will not trust you, I;
    Nor longer stay in your curst company.
Did not you tell me I should know the man  
    By the Athenian garments he had on?
Mounsieur Cobweb; good mounsieur, get you your weapons in
    your hand and kill me a red-hipp'd humble-bee on the top of a
    thistle; and, good mounsieur, bring me the honey-bag.
Do not fret
    yourself too much in the action, mounsieur; and, good mounsieur,
    have a care the honey-bag break not; I would be loath to have you  
    overflown with a honey-bag, signior.
Pray you, leave
    your curtsy, good mounsieur.
But, I  
    pray you, let none of your people stir me; I have an exposition
    of sleep come upon me.
Now, my Titania; wake you, my sweet queen.
Go, one of you, find out the forester;
    For now our observation is perform'd,
    And since we have the vaward of the day,
    My love shall hear the music of my hounds.
Judge when you hear.
I pray you all, stand up.
I know you two are rival enemies;
    How comes this gentle concord in the world  
    That hatred is so far from jealousy
    To sleep by hate, and fear no enmity?
Enough, enough, my Lord; you have enough;
    I beg the law, the law upon his head.
They would have stol'n away, they would, Demetrius,
    Thereby to have defeated you and me:
    You of your wife, and me of my consent,
    Of my consent that she should be your wife.
Fair lovers, you are fortunately met;
    Of this discourse we more will hear anon.
Are you sure
    That we are awake?
Do not you think
    The Duke was here, and bid us follow him?
Have you sent to Bottom's house?
Masters, I am to discourse wonders; but ask me not what;
    for if I tell you, I am not true Athenian.
I will tell you
    everything, right as it fell out.
All that I will tell you is, that the
    Duke hath dined.
Say, what abridgment have you for this evening?
No, my noble lord,
    It is not for you.
I have heard it over,
    And it is nothing, nothing in the world;
    Unless you can find sport in their intents,
    Extremely stretch'd and conn'd with cruel pain,
    To do you service.
Why, gentle sweet, you shall see no such thing.
That you should think, we come not to offend,
    But with good will.
We do not come, as minding to content you,
    Our true intent is.
That you should here repent you,
    The actors are at band; and, by their show,
    You shall know all, that you are like to know,
  THESEUS.
Gentles, perchance you wonder at this show;
    But wonder on, till truth make all things plain.
This man is Pyramus, if you would know;
    This beauteous lady Thisby is certain.
This man, with lanthorn, dog, and bush of thorn,
    Presenteth Moonshine; for, if you will know,
    By moonshine did these lovers think no scorn
    To meet at Ninus' tomb, there, there to woo.
In this same interlude it doth befall
    That I, one Snout by name, present a wall;
    And such a wall as I would have you think  
    That had in it a crannied hole or chink,
    Through which the lovers, Pyramus and Thisby,
    Did whisper often very secretly.
Would you desire lime and hair to speak better?
You shall see it will fall pat as I told you; yonder she comes.
As Shafalus to Procrus, I to you.
You, ladies, you, whose gentle hearts do fear
    The smallest monstrous mouse that creeps on floor,
    May now, perchance, both quake and tremble here,
    When lion rough in wildest rage doth roar.
He dares not come there for the candle; for, you see, it
    is already in snuff.
All that I have to say is to tell you that the lanthorn is  
    the moon; I, the Man i' th' Moon; this thorn-bush, my thorn-bush;
    and this dog, my dog.
Eyes, do you see?
O Sisters Three,
               Come, come to me,
             With hands as pale as milk;
               Lay them in gore,
               Since you have shore
             With shears his thread of silk.
[Starting up] No, I assure you; the wall is down that
    parted their fathers.
Will it please you to see the Epilogue, or  
    to hear a Bergomask dance between two of our company?
No epilogue, I pray you; for your play needs no excuse.
If we shadows have offended,
             Think but this, and all is mended,
             That you have but slumb'red here
             While these visions did appear.
If you pardon, we will mend.
So, good night unto you all.
How many gentlemen have you lost in this action?
He hath indeed
    better bett'red expectation than you must expect of me to tell
    you how.
I pray you, is Signior Mountanto return'd from the wars or no?
What is he that you ask for, niece?
I pray
    you, how many hath he kill'd and eaten in these wars?
Faith, niece, you tax Signior Benedick too much; but he'll  
    be meet with you, I doubt it not.
But I pray you, who is
    his companion?
I will hold friends with you, lady.
Good Signior Leonato, are you come to meet your trouble?
The
    fashion of the world is to avoid cost, and you encounter it.
Never came trouble to my house in the likeness of your Grace;
    for trouble being gone, comfort should remain; but when you depart
    from me, sorrow abides and happiness takes his leave.
Were you in doubt, sir, that you ask'd her?
Signior Benedick, no; for then were you a child.
We may guess by this what you
    are, being a man.
Be happy, lady;
    for you are like an honourable father.
I wonder that you will still be talking, Signior Benedick.
Nobody marks you.
are you yet living?
Courtesy itself must convert  
    to disdain if you come in her presence.
But it is certain I am loved of
    all ladies, only you excepted; and I would I could find in my
    heart that I had not a hard heart, for truly I love none.
Well, you are a rare parrot-teacher.
I know you of old.
Signior Claudio and Signior
    Benedick, my dear friend Leonato hath invited you all.
If you swear, my lord, you shall not be forsworn.
[To Don
    John] Let me bid you welcome, my lord.
Being reconciled to the
    Prince your brother, I owe you all duty.
I thank you.
I am not of many words, but I thank you.
Do you question me, as an honest man should do, for my simple
    true judgment?
or would you have me speak after my custom, as
    being a professed tyrant to their sex?
Would you buy her, that you enquire after her?
But speak you this with a sad
    brow?
or do you play the flouting Jack, to tell us Cupid is a
    good hare-finder and Vulcan a rare carpenter?
Come, in what key
    shall a man take you to go in the song?
But I hope you have no intent to turn husband, have
    you?
Don Pedro is returned to seek you.
What secret hath held you here, that you followed not to
    Leonato's?
I can be secret as a dumb man, I
    would have you think so; but, on my allegiance--mark you this-on
    my allegiance!
Amen, if you love her; for the lady is very well worthy.
The savage bull may; but if ever the sensible Benedick bear
    it, pluck off the bull's horns and set them in my forehead, and
    let me be vilely painted, and in such great letters as they write
    'Here is good horse to hire,' let them signify under my sign
    'Here you may see Benedick the married man.
Well, you will temporize with the hours.
I have almost matter enough in me for such an embassage; and
    so I commit you--
  Claud.
Ere you flout old ends any further, examine
    your conscience.
And so I leave you.
O my lord,
    When you went onward on this ended action,
    I look'd upon her with a soldier's eye,
    That lik'd, but had a rougher task in hand
    Than to drive liking to the name of love;
    But now I am return'd and that war-thoughts
    Have left their places vacant, in their rooms
    Come thronging soft and delicate desires,
    All prompting me how fair young Hero is,
    Saying I lik'd her ere I went to wars.
How sweetly you do minister to love,
    That know love's grief by his complexion!
But, brother, I can tell you strange
    news that you yet dreamt not of.
The Prince and Count Claudio, walking in a
    thick-pleached alley in mine orchard, were thus much overheard by
    a man of mine: the Prince discovered to Claudio that he loved my
    niece your daughter and meant to acknowledge it this night in a
    dance, and if he found her accordant, he meant to take the
    present time by the top and instantly break with you of it.
Hath the fellow any wit that told you this?
Go you and
    tell her of it.
]

    [To the Son] Cousin, you know what you have to do.
--[To the Musician] O, I cry you mercy, friend.
Go you with me,
    and I will use your skill.
Why are you thus out of measure
    sad?
Yea, but you must not make the full show of this till you may
    do it without controlment.
You have of late stood out against
    your brother, and he hath ta'en you newly into his grace, where  
    it is impossible you should take true root but by the fair
    weather that you make yourself.
It is needful that you frame the
    season for your own harvest.
Can you make no use of your discontent?
The Prince your brother is
    royally entertain'd by Leonato, and I can give you intelligence  
    of an intended marriage.
How came you to this?
So, by being too curst, God will send you no horns.
Well then, go you into hell?
No; but to the gate, and there will the devil meet me like an
    old cuckold with horns on his head, and say 'Get you to heaven,
    Beatrice, get you to heaven.
Here's no place for you maids.
[to Hero] Well, niece, I trust you will be rul'd by your
    father.
It is my cousin's duty to make cursy and say,
    'Father, as it please you.
Well, niece, I hope to see you one day fitted with a husband.
Daughter, remember what I told you.
If the Prince do solicit
    you in that kind, you know your answer.
The fault will be in the music, cousin, if you be not wooed
    in good time.
Cousin, you apprehend passing shrewdly.
Lady, will you walk a bout with your friend?
So you walk softly and look sweetly and say nothing,
    I am yours for the walk; and especially when I walk away.
And when please you to say so?
Speak low if you speak love.
Well, I would you did like me.
I love you the better.
I know you well enough.
I know you by the waggling of your head.
To tell you true, I counterfeit him.
You could never do him so ill-well unless you were the very
    man.
You are he, you are he!
Come, come, do you think I do not know you by your excellent
    wit?
Go to, mum you are he.
Will you not tell me who told you so?
No, you shall pardon me.
Nor will you not tell me who you are?
I am sure you know him well enough.
Did he never make you laugh?
I pray you, what is he?
When I know the gentleman, I'll tell him what you say.
Are you not Signior Benedick?
Signior, you are very near my brother in his love.
I pray you dissuade him from her; she is no
    equal for his birth.
How know you he loves her?
Come, will you go with me?
What
    fashion will you wear the garland of?
But did you think the Prince would have served you
    thus?
I pray you leave me.
now you strike like the blind man!
'Twas the boy that
    stole your meat, and you'll beat the post.
If it will not be, I'll leave you.
Did you see him?
Yet it had not been amiss the rod had been made, and the
    garland too; for the garland he might have worn himself, and the
    rod he might have bestowed on you, who, as I take it, have stol'n
    his bird's nest.
If their singing answer your saying, by my faith you say
    honestly.
The Lady Beatrice hath a quarrel to you.
The gentleman that
    danc'd with her told her she is much wrong'd by you.
I
    will go on the slightest errand now to the Antipodes that you can
    devise to send me on; I will fetch you a toothpicker now from the  
    furthest inch of Asia; bring you the length of Prester John's
    foot; fetch you a hair off the great Cham's beard; do you any
    embassage to the Pygmies--rather than hold three words'
    conference with this harpy.
Come, lady, come; you have lost the heart of Signior
    Benedick.
You have put him down, lady; you have put him down.
I have brought Count Claudio, whom you sent
    me to seek.
Wherefore are you sad?
Lady, as you are mine, I am yours.
I give away myself for you and dote upon the exchange.
Speak, cousin; or, if you cannot, stop his mouth with a kiss
    and let not him speak neither.
In faith, lady, you have a merry heart.
Lady Beatrice, I will get you one.
Hath your
    Grace ne'er a brother like you?
Will you have me, lady?
Your silence most offends me, and to be merry best becomes
    you, for out o' question you were born in a merry hour.
Cousins, God give you joy!
Niece, will you look to those things I told you of?
I cry you mercy, uncle, By your Grace's pardon.
County Claudio, when mean you to go to church?
Come, you shake the head at so long a breathing;
    but I warrant thee, Claudio, the time shall not go dully by us.
I would fain have  
    it a match, and I doubt not but to fashion it if you three will
    but minister such assistance as I shall give you direction.
My lord, I am for you, though it cost me ten nights'
    watchings.
And you too, gentle Hero?
I will teach you how to humour
    your cousin, that she shall fall in love with Benedick; and I,
    [to Leonato and Claudio] with your two helps, will so practise on
    Benedick that, in despite of his quick wit and his queasy
    stomach, he shall fall in love with Beatrice.
Go in with me, and I will tell you my drift.
The poison of that lies in you to temper.
Go you to the  
    Prince your brother; spare not to tell him that he hath wronged
    his honour in marrying the renowned Claudio (whose estimation do
    you mightily hold up) to a contaminated stale, such a one as
    Hero.
Look you for any other issue?
Go then; find me a meet hour to draw Don Pedro and the Count
    Claudio alone; tell them that you know that Hero loves me; intend
    a kind of zeal both to the Prince and Claudio, as--in love of
    your brother's honour, who hath made this match, and his friend's
    reputation, who is thus like to be cozen'd with the semblance of
    a maid--that you have discover'd thus.
Be you constant in the accusation, and my cunning shall not
    shame me.
See you where Benedick hath hid himself?
Because you talk of wooing, I will sing,
    Since many a wooer doth commence his suit
    To her he thinks not worthy, yet he wooes,
    Yet will he swear he loves.
Then sigh not so,
            But let them go,
          And be you blithe and bonny,
        Converting all your sounds of woe  
          Into Hey nonny, nonny.
What was it you told me of to-day?
She will sit you--you heard my
    daughter tell you how.
How, how, I pray you?
Now you talk of a sheet of paper, I remember a pretty jest
    your daughter told us of.
I pray you
    tell Benedick of it and hear what 'a will say.
Were it good, think you?
If she should make tender of her love, 'tis
    very possible he'll scorn it; for the man (as you know all) hath
    a contemptible spirit.
As Hector, I assure you; and in the managing of quarrels you
    may say he is wise, for either he avoids them with great
    discretion, or undertakes them with a most Christianlike fear.
My lord, will you .
Fair Beatrice, I thank you for your pains.
I took no more pains for those thanks than you take pains to
    thank me.
Yea, just so much as you may take upon a knives point, and
    choke a daw withal.
Fare you well.
'Against my will I am sent to bid you come in to dinner.
'I took no more pains for those
    thanks than you took pains to thank me.
' That's as much as to
    say, 'Any pains that I take for you is as easy as thanks.
I'll make her come, I warrant you, presently.
Fear you not my part of the dialogue.
But are you sure
    That Benedick loves Beatrice so entirely?
And did they bid you tell her of it, madam?
Why did you so?
Why, you speak truth.
I pray you be not angry with me, madam,
    Speaking my fancy: Signior Benedick,
    For shape, for bearing, argument, and valour,
    Goes foremost in report through Italy.
When are you married, madam?
She's lim'd, I warrant you!
I'll bring you thither, my lord, if you'll vouchsafe me.
Methinks you are sadder.
Unless he have a fancy to this
    foolery, as it appears he hath, he is no fool for fancy, as you
    would have it appear he is.
Can you smell him out by
    that?
I have studied eight or nine wise words to speak
    to you, which these hobby-horses must not hear.
My lord and brother, God save you.
If your leisure serv'd, I would speak with you.
If it please you.
If there be any impediment, I pray you discover it.
You may think I love you not.
For my brother, I  
    think he holds you well and in dearness of heart hath holp to
    effect your ensuing marriage--surely suit ill spent and labour
    ill bestowed!
I came hither to tell you, and, circumstances short'ned (for
    she has been too long a-talking of), the lady is disloyal.
I could say
    she were worse; think you of a worse title, and I will fit her to
    it.
Go but with me to-night, you
    shall see her chamber window ent'red, even the night before her
    wedding day.
If you love her then, to-morrow wed her.
If you dare not trust that you see, confess not that you
    know.
If you will follow me, I will show you enough; and when you
    have seen more and heard more, proceed accordingly.
I will disparage her no farther till you are my witnesses.
So will you say when you have seen the Sequel.
Are you good men and true?
First, who think you the most desartless man to be constable?
God hath bless'd you with a
    good name.
Therefore
    bear you the lanthorn.
This is your charge: you shall comprehend
    all vagrom men; you are to bid any man stand, in the Prince's
    name.
Why then, take no note of him, but let him go, and presently
    call the rest of the watch together and thank God you are rid of
    a knave.
Why, you speak like an ancient and most quiet watchman, for I
    cannot see how sleeping should offend.
Well, you are to call at all the alehouses
    and bid those that are drunk get them to bed.
If they make you
    not then the better answer, You may say they are not the men you
    took them for.
If you meet a thief, you may suspect him, by virtue of your
    office, to be no true man; and for such kind of men, the less you
    meddle or make with them, why, the more your honesty.
Truly, by your office you may; but I think they that touch
    pitch will be defil'd.
The most peaceable way for you, if you do
    take a thief, is to let him show himself what he is, and steal
    out of your company.
If you hear a child cry in the night, you must call to the
    nurse and bid her still it.
This is the end of the charge: you, constable, are to present
    the Prince's own person.
If you meet the Prince in the night,
    you may stay him.
I pray you watch about
    Signior Leonato's door; for the wedding being there tomorrow,  
    there is a great coil to-night.
Be vigitant, I beseech
    you.
We charge you in the Prince's name stand!
You'll be made bring Deformed forth, I warrant you.
Never speak, we charge you.
Let us obey you to go with
    us.
A commodity in question, I warrant you.
Come, we'll obey you.
I think you would have me say, 'saving your reverence,
    a husband.
Do you speak in the sick tune?
Do
    you sing it, and I'll dance it.
then, if your husband
    have stables enough, you'll see he shall lack no barnes.
'Tis almost five o'clock, cousin; 'tis time you were ready.
Well, an you be not turn'd Turk, there's no more sailing by
    the star.
How long have you profess'd
    apprehension?
Ever since you left it.
Get you some of this distill'd carduus benedictus and lay it
    to your heart.
You may think perchance that I think you are
    in love.
Nay, by'r lady, I am not such a fool to think what I
    list; nor I list not to think what I can; nor indeed I cannot
    think, if I would think my heart out of thinking, that you are in
    love, or that you will be in love, or that you can be in love.
He
    swore he would never marry; and yet now in despite of his heart
    he eats his meat without grudging; and how you may be converted I
    know not, but methinks you look with your eyes as other women do.
The Prince, the Count, Signior Benedick, Don
    John, and all the gallants of the town are come to fetch you to
    church.
What would you with me, honest neighbour?
Marry, sir, I would have some confidence with you that decerns
    you nearly.
Brief, I pray you; for you see it is a busy time with me.
Neighbours, you are tedious.
I would fain know what you have to say.
Indeed, neighbour, he comes too short of you.
I must leave you.
I am now in
    great haste, as it may appear unto you.
Drink some wine ere you go.
Fare you well.
My lord, they stay for you to give your daughter to her
    husband.
Go, good partner, go get you to Francis Seacoal; bid him bring
    his pen and inkhorn to the jail.
We will spare for no wit, I warrant you.
Only to the plain form of
    marriage, and you shall recount their particular duties
    afterwards.
Friar, you come to marry her.
Lady, you come hither to be married to this count?
If either of you know any inward impediment why you should
    not be conjoined, I charge you on your souls to utter it.
Know you any, Hero?
Know you any, Count?
Father, by your leave:
    Will you with free and unconstrained soul
    Give me this maid your daughter?
And what have I to give you back whose worth
    May counterpoise this rich and precious gift?
Nothing, unless you render her again.
Sweet Prince, you learn me noble thankfulness.
Comes not that blood as modest evidence
    To witness simple virtue, Would you not swear,
    All you that see her, that she were a maid
    By these exterior shows?
What do you mean, my lord?
Dear my lord, if you, in your own proof,
    Have vanquish'd the resistance of her youth
    And made defeat of her virginity--
  Claud.
I know what you would say.
And seem'd I ever otherwise to you?
You seem to me as Dian in her orb,
    As chaste as is the bud ere it be blown;
    But you are more intemperate in your blood  
    Than Venus, or those pamp'red animals
    That rage in savage sensuality.
Sweet Prince, why speak not you?
Let me but move one question to your daughter,
    And by that fatherly and kindly power
    That you have in her, bid her answer truly.
What kind of catechising call you this?
To make you answer truly to your name.
What man was he talk'd with you yesternight,
    Out at your window betwixt twelve and one?
Now, if you are a maid, answer to this.
Why, then are you no maiden.
Leonato,
    I am sorry you must hear.
Wherefore sink you down?
Lady, were you her bedfellow last night?
Lady, what man is he you are accus'd of?
O my father,
    Prove you that any man with me convers'd
    At hours unmeet, or that I yesternight
    Maintain'd the change of words with any creature,
    Refuse me, hate me, torture me to death!
Pause awhile
    And let my counsel sway you in this case.
And if it sort not well, you may conceal her,
    As best befits her wounded reputation,
    In some reclusive and religious life,
    Out of all eyes, tongues, minds, and injuries.
Signior Leonato, let the friar advise you;
    And though you know my inwardness and love
    Is very much unto the Prince and Claudio,
    Yet, by mine honour, I will deal in this
    As secretly and justly as your soul  
    Should with your body.
Lady Beatrice, have you wept all this while?
I do love nothing in the world so well as you.
It were as possible for
    me to say I loved nothing so well as you.
I will swear by it that you love me, and I will make him eat
    it that says I love not you.
Will you not eat your word?
I was about to protest I
    loved you.
I love you with so much of my heart that none is left to
    protest.
There is no love in you.
Nay, I
    pray you let me go.
Think you in your soul the Count Claudio hath wrong'd Hero?
I will kiss your
    hand, and so I leave you.
As you hear of me, so think of me.
Masters, do you serve
    God?
Masters,
    it is proved already that you are little better than false
    knaves, and it will go near to be thought so shortly.
How answer
    you for yourselves?
A marvellous witty fellow, I assure you; but I will go about
    with him.
Come you hither, sirrah.
Sir, I say
    to you, it is thought you are false knaves.
Sir, I say to you we are none.
Have you writ down that they are none?
Master Constable, you go not the way to examine.
Masters, I charge you in the Prince's name accuse these men.
What heard you him say else?
And this is more, masters, than you can deny.
you are an ass, you are an ass.
If you go on thus, you will kill yourself,
    And 'tis not wisdom thus to second grief
    Against yourself.
Make those that do offend you suffer too.
Good day to both of you.
Hear you, my lords!
well, fare you well, my lord.
Are you so hasty now?
I will not have to do with you.
Sir boy, I'll whip you from your foining fence!
Hold you content.
Do not you meddle; let me deal in this.
I will not hear you.
I came to seek
    you both.
Sir, I shall meet your wit in the career an you charge it
    against me.
I pray you choose another subject.
I jest not; I will make
    it good how you dare, with what you dare, and when you dare.
You have kill'd a
    sweet lady, and her death shall fall heavy on you.
Let me hear
    from you.
Well, I will meet you, so I may have good cheer.
Fare you well, boy; you know my mind.
I will leave you now to
    your gossiplike humour.
My lord, for your many
    courtesies I thank you.
You have among you
    kill'd a sweet and innocent lady.
In most profound earnest; and, I'll warrant you, for the  
    love of Beatrice.
But, soft you, let me be!
Come you, sir.
If justice cannot tame you, she shall ne'er
    weigh more reasons in her balance.
Nay, an you be a cursing
    hypocrite once, you must be look'd to.
First, I ask thee what they have done; thirdly, I ask thee
    what's their offence; sixth and lastly, why they are committed;
    and to conclude, what you lay to their charge.
Who have you offended, masters, that you are thus bound to
    your answer?
Do you
    hear me, and let this Count kill me.
What your wisdoms could not discover, these shallow
    fools have brought to light, who in the night overheard me
    confessing to this man, how Don John your brother incensed me to
    slander the Lady Hero; how you were brought into the orchard and
    saw me court Margaret in Hero's garments; how you disgrac'd her
    when you should marry her.
If you would know your wronger, look on me.
I thank you princes for my daughter's death.
'Twas bravely done, if you bethink you of it.
I cannot bid you bid my daughter live-
    That were impossible; but I pray you both,
    Possess the people in Messina here
    How innocent she died; and if your love
    Can labour aught in sad invention,
    Hang her an epitaph upon her tomb,
    And sing it to her bones--sing it to-night.
To-morrow morning come you to my house,
    And since you could not be my son-in-law,
    Be yet my nephew.
Give her the right you should have giv'n her cousin,
    And so dies my revenge.
I beseech you let
    it be rememb'red in his punishment.
Pray you examine him upon
    that point.
Your worship speaks like a most thankful and reverent youth,
    and I praise God for you.
God restore you
    to health!
I humbly give you leave to depart; and if a merry
    meeting may be wish'd, God prohibit it!
We look for you to-morrow.
[to the Watch] Bring you these fellows on.
Will you then write me a sonnet in praise of my beauty?
If you use them, Margaret, you must put in the pikes with a
    vice, and they are dangerous weapons for maids.
Well, I will call Beatrice to you, who I think hath legs.
Yea, signior, and depart when you bid me.
Fare you well now.
And yet, ere I go, let
    me go with that I came for, which is, with knowing what hath
    pass'd between you and Claudio.
But for which of my good parts did you first suffer love
    for me?
If you
    spite it for my sake, I will spite it for yours, for I will never
    love that which my friend hates.
And how long is that, think you?
And how do you?
There will I leave you too, for
    here comes one in haste.
Madam, you must come to your uncle.
Will you come presently?
Will you go hear this news, signior?
Thanks to you all, and leave us.
Fare you well.
Did I not tell you she was innocent?
So are the Prince and Claudio, who accus'd her
    Upon the error that you heard debated.
Well, daughter, and you gentlewomen all,
    Withdraw into a chamber by yourselves,
    And when I send for you, come hither mask'd.
The sight whereof I think you had from me,
    From Claudio, and the Prince; but what's your will?
We here attend you.
Are you yet determin'd
    To-day to marry with my brother's daughter?
Why, what's the matter
    That you have such a February face,
    So full of frost, of storm, and cloudiness?
Bull Jove, sir, had an amiable low,
    And some such strange bull leap'd your father's cow
    And got a calf in that same noble feat  
    Much like to you, for you have just his bleat.
For this I owe you.
This same is she, and I do give you her.
No, that you shall not till you take her hand
    Before this friar and swear to marry her.
I am your husband if you like of me.
]
    And when you lov'd you were my other husband.
All this amazement can I qualify,
    When, after that the holy rites are ended,
    I'll tell you largely of fair Hero's death.
Do not you love me?
Why, then your uncle, and the Prince, and Claudio
    Have been deceived; for they swore you did.
Do not you love me?
Why, then my cousin, Margaret, and Ursula
    Are much deceiv'd; for they did swear you did.
They swore that you were almost sick for me.
They swore that you were well-nigh dead for me.
Then you do not love me?
Come, cousin, I am sure you love the gentleman.
I would not deny you; but, by this good day, I yield upon
    great persuasion, and partly to save your life, for I was told
    you were in a consumption.
'Sblood, but you will not hear me.
O, sir, content you.
For, sir,  
    It is as sure as you are Roderigo,
    Were I the Moor, I would not be Iago.
Wherefore ask you this?
'Zounds, sir, you're robb'd!
For shame, put on your gown;
    Your heart is burst, you have lost half your soul;
    Even now, now, very now, an old black ram
    Is tupping your white ewe.
Awake the snorting citizens with the bell,  
    Or else the devil will make a grandsire of you.
What, have you lost your wits?
Most reverend signior, do you know my voice?
What are you?
Most grave Brabantio,
    In simple and pure soul I come to you.
'Zounds, sir, you are one of those that will not serve God,
    if the devil bid you.
Because we come to do you service and you
    think we are ruffians, you'll have your daughter covered with a
    Barbary horse; you'll have your nephews neigh to you; you'll have
    coursers for cousins, and gennets for germans.
I am one, sir, that comes to tell you your daughter and the
    Moor are now making the beast with two backs.
But, I beseech you,
    If't be your pleasure and most wise consent,
    As partly I find it is, that your fair daughter,
    At this odd-even and dull watch o' the night,
    Transported with no worse nor better guard
    But with a knave of common hire, a gondolier,
    To the gross clasps of a lascivious Moor-  
    If this be known to you, and your allowance,
    We then have done you bold and saucy wrongs;
    But if you know not this, my manners tell me
    We have your wrong rebuke.
Your daughter, if you have not given her leave,
    I say again, hath made a gross revolt,
    Tying her duty, beauty, wit, and fortunes
    In an extravagant and wheeling stranger
    Of here and everywhere.
Straight satisfy yourself:
    If she be in her chamber or your house,
    Let loose on me the justice of the state
    For thus deluding you.
Farewell, for I must leave you.
That you shall surely find him,
    Lead to the Sagittary the raised search,
    And there will I be with him.
What said she to you?
Are they married, think you?
Fathers, from hence trust not your daughters' minds
    By what you see them act.
Have you not read, Roderigo,
    Of some such thing?
O, would you had had her!
Do you know
    Where we may apprehend her and the Moor?
I think I can discover him, if you please
    To get good guard and go along with me.
Pray you, lead on.
But I pray you, sir,
    Are you fast married?
He will divorce you,
    Or put upon you what restraint and grievance
    The law, with all his might to enforce it on,  
    Will give him cable.
The goodness of the night upon you, friends!
The Duke does greet you, general,
    And he requires your haste-post-haste appearance,
    Even on the instant.
What is the matter, think you?
You have been hotly call'd for,
    When, being not at your lodging to be found,
    The Senate hath sent about three several quests
    To search you out.
'Tis well I am found by you.
I will but spend a word here in the house  
    And go with you.
Marry, to- Come, captain, will you go?
Have with you.
Here comes another troop to seek for you.
Come, sir, I am for you.
Good signior, you shall more command with years
    Than with your weapons.
Hold your hands,
    Both you of my inclining and the rest.
Where will you that I go
    To answer this your charge?
How say you by this change?
How many, as you guess?
Signior Montano,
    Your trusty and most valiant servitor,
    With his free duty recommends you thus,
    And prays you to believe him.
Valiant Othello, we must straight employ you
    Against the general enemy Ottoman.
] I did not see you; welcome, gentle signior;
    We lack'd your counsel and your help tonight.
Whoe'er he be that in this foul proceeding
    Hath thus beguiled your daughter of herself
    And you of her, the bloody book of law
    You shall yourself read in the bitter letter
    After your own sense, yea, though our proper son
    Stood in your action.
] What in your own part can you say to this?
Did you by indirect and forced courses
    Subdue and poison this young maid's affections?
I do beseech you,
    Send for the lady to the Sagittary,
    And let her speak of me before her father.
If you do find me foul in her report,  
    The trust, the office I do hold of you,
    Not only take away, but let your sentence
    Even fall upon my life.
Ancient, conduct them; you best know the place.
I pray you, hear her speak.
Do you perceive in all this noble company
    Where most you owe obedience?
To you I am bound for life and education;
    My life and education both do learn me
    How to respect you; you are the lord of duty,
    I am hitherto your daughter.
But here's my husband,
    And so much duty as my mother show'd
    To you, preferring you before her father,
    So much I challenge that I may profess
    Due to the Moor, my lord.
God be with you!
I humbly beseech you, proceed to the affairs of state.
Othello, the fortitude of the place is best known to you; and
    though we have there a substitute of most allowed sufficiency,
    yet opinion, a sovereign mistress of effects, throws a more safer
    voice on you.
If you please,
    Be't at her father's.
What would you, Desdemona?
And heaven defend your good souls, that you think
    I will your serious and great business scant  
    For she is with me.
Be it as you shall privately determine,
    Either for her stay or going.
The affair cries haste,
    And speed must answer't: you must hence tonight.
Othello, leave some officer behind,
    And he shall our commission bring to you,
    With such things else of quality and respect
    As doth import you.
But we have reason to cool our raging motions, our carnal stings,
    our unbitted lusts; whereof I take this, that you call love, to
    be a sect or scion.
Do you hear, Roderigo?
What say you?
No more of drowning, do you hear?
What from the cape can you discern at sea?
Thanks, you the valiant of this warlike isle,
    That so approve the Moor!
I pray you, sir, go forth,
    And give us truth who 'tis that is arrived.
I thank you, valiant Cassio.
What tidings can you tell me of my lord?
O, but I fear- How lost you company?
Good ancient, you are welcome.
Sir, would she give you so much of her lips
    As of her tongue she oft bestows on me,
    You'ld have enough.
How say you, Cassio?
If such tricks as these
    strip you out of your lieutenantry, it had been better you had
    not kissed your three fingers so oft, which now again you are
    most apt to play the sir in.
It gives me wonder great as my content
    To see you here before me.
] O, you are well tuned now!
Honey, you shall be well desired in Cyprus;
    I have found great love amongst them.
But, sir, be you ruled by me.
I have brought you from
    Venice.
Watch you tonight; for the command, I'll lay't upon you.
Cassio knows you not.
I'll not be far from you.
Do you find some
    occasion to anger Cassio, either by speaking too loud, or
    tainting his discipline, or from what other course you please,
    which the time shall more favorably minister.
Sir, he is rash and very sudden in choler, and haply may
    strike at you.
So shall you have a shorter journey to your desires by the means
    I shall then have to prefer them, and the impediment most
    profitably removed, without the which there were no expectation
    of our prosperity.
Good Michael, look you to the guard tonight.
Tomorrow with your earliest
    Let me have speech with you.
Come, my dear love,
    The purchase made, the fruits are to ensue;
    That profit's yet to come 'tween me and you.
But one cup; I'll drink for you.
Here at the door; I pray you, call them in.
Why, he drinks you with facility your Dane dead drunk; he
    sweats not to overthrow your Almain; he gives your Hollander a
    vomit ere the next pottle can be filled.
I am for it, lieutenant, and I'll do you justice.
Will you hear't again?
Why, very well then; you must not think then that I am
    drunk.
I pray you, after the lieutenant; go.
Nay, good lieutenant; I pray you, sir, hold your hand.
Let me go, sir, or I'll knock you o'er the mazzard.
Come, come, you're drunk.
Lieutenant- sir- Montano- gentlemen-
    Have you forgot all place of sense and duty?
the general speaks to you!
How comes it, Michael, you are thus forgot?
I pray you, pardon me; I cannot speak.
Worthy Montano, you were wont be civil;
    The gravity and stillness of your youth
    The world hath noted, and your name is great
    In mouths of wisest censure.
What's the matter,
    That you unlace your reputation thus,
    And spend your rich opinion for the name
    Of a night-brawler?
Your officer, Iago, can inform you-
    While I spare speech, which something now offends me-
    Of all that I do know.
If I once stir,
    Or do but lift this arm, the best of you
    Shall sink in my rebuke.
When I came back-
    For this was brief- I found them close together,
    At blow and thrust, even as again they were
    When you yourself did part them.
What, are you hurt, lieutenant?
As I am an honest man, I thought you had received some bodily
    wound; there is more sense in that than in reputation.
You have lost no reputation at all,
    unless you repute yourself such a loser.
What was he that you followed with your sword?
What had he done to you?
Why, but you are now well enough.
How came you thus
     recovered?
Come, you are too severe a moraler.
And, good lieutenant, I
    think you think I love you.
I'll
    tell you what you shall do.
Confess yourself freely to her;
    importune her help to put you in your place again.
This
    broken joint between you and her husband entreat her to splinter;
    and, my fortunes against any lay worth naming, this crack of your  
    love shall grow stronger than it was before.
Are these, I pray you, wind instruments?
But,
    masters, here's money for you; and the general so likes your
    music, that he desires you, for love's sake, to make no more
    noise with it.
If you have any music that may not be heard, to't again;
    but, as they say, to hear music the general does not greatly
    care.
No, I hear not your honest friend; I hear you.
I'll send her to you presently;
    And I'll devise a mean to draw the Moor
    Out of the way, that your converse and business
    May be more free.
I humbly thank you for't.
The general and his wife are talking of it,
    And she speaks for you stoutly.
The Moor replies
    That he you hurt is of great fame in Cyprus  
    And great affinity and that in wholesome wisdom
    He might not but refuse you; but he protests he loves you
    And needs no other suitor but his likings
    To take the safest occasion by the front
    To bring you in again.
Yet, I beseech you,
    If you think fit, or that it may be done,
    Give me advantage of some brief discourse
    With Desdemona alone.
Pray you, come in.
I will bestow you where you shall have time
    To speak your bosom freely.
I am much bound to you.
Do not doubt, Cassio,
    But I will have my lord and you again
    As friendly as you were.
I know't: I thank you.
You do love my lord:
    You have known him long; and be you well assured
    He shall in strangeness stand no farther off
    Than in a politic distance.
No, sure, I cannot think it,
    That he would steal away so guilty-like,
    Seeing you coming.
Who is't you mean?
Good my lord,
    If I have any grace or power to move you,
    His present reconciliation take;
    For if he be not one that truly loves you,
    That errs in ignorance and not in cunning,
    I have no judgement in an honest face.
The sooner, sweet, for you.
I wonder in my soul,
    What you would ask me, that I should deny,
    Or stand so mammering on.
Michael Cassio,
    That came awooing with you, and so many a time
    When I have spoke of you dispraisingly
    Hath ta'en your part- to have so much to do
    To bring him in!
Why, this is not a boon;
    'Tis as I should entreat you wear your gloves,
    Or feed on nourishing dishes, or keep you warm,
    Or sue to you to do a peculiar profit
    To your own person.
Shall I deny you?
Be as your fancies teach you;
    Whate'er you be, I am obedient.
Did Michael Cassio, when you woo'd my lady,
    Know of your love?
My lord, you know I love you.
I do beseech you-
    Though I perchance am vicious in my guess,
    As, I confess, it is my nature's plague
    To spy into abuses, and oft my jealousy
    Shapes faults that are not- that your wisdom yet,
    From one that so imperfectly conceits,
    Would take no notice, nor build yourself a trouble
    Out of his scattering and unsure observance.
It were not for your quiet nor your good,
    Nor for my manhood, honesty, or wisdom,  
    To let you know my thoughts.
I am glad of it, for now I shall have reason
    To show the love and duty that I bear you
    With franker spirit.
She did deceive her father, marrying you;
    And when she seem'd to shake and fear your looks,
    She loved them most.
She that so young could give out such a seeming,
    To seel her father's eyes up close as oak-
    He thought 'twas witchcraft- but I am much to blame;
    I humbly do beseech you of your pardon
    For too much loving you.
I hope you will consider what is spoke
    Comes from my love.
But I do see you're moved;
    I am to pray you not to strain my speech
    To grosser issues nor to larger reach
    Than to suspicion.
Should you do so, my lord,
    My speech should fall into such vile success
    Which my thoughts aim not at.
Cassio's my worthy friend-
    My lord, I see you're moved.
and long live you to think so!
Ay, there's the point, as- to be bold with you-
    Not to affect many proposed matches
    Of her own clime, complexion, and degree,
    Whereto we see in all things nature tends-
    Foh, one may smell in such a will most rank,
    Foul disproportion, thoughts unnatural.
I do not in position
    Distinctly speak of her; though I may fear,
    Her will, recoiling to her better judgement,
    May fall to match you with her country forms,
    And happily repent.
Though it be fit that Cassio have his place,
    For sure he fills it up with great ability,
    Yet, if you please to hold him off awhile,
    You shall by that perceive him and his means.
Your dinner, and the generous islanders
    By you invited, do attend your presence.
Why do you speak so faintly?
Are you not well?
Come, I'll go in with you.
I am very sorry that you are not well.
How now, what do you here alone?
Do not you chide; I have a thing for you.
What will you give me now
    For that same handkerchief?
Why, that the Moor first gave to Desdemona,
    That which so often you did bid me steal.
What will you do with't, that you have been so earnest
    To have me filch it?
] Why, what is that to you?
And O you mortal engines, whose rude throats
    The immortal Jove's dread clamors counterfeit,
    Farewell!
Are you a man?
have you a soul or sense?
God be wi' you; take mine office.
I thank you for this profit, and from hence
    I'll love no friend sith love breeds such offense.
I see, sir, you are eaten up with passion;
    I do repent me that I put it to you.
Would you, the supervisor, grossly gape on?
It is impossible you should see this
    Were they as prime as goats, as hot as monkeys,
    As salt as wolves in pride, and fools as gross
    As ignorance made drunk.
But yet, I say,
    If imputation and strong circumstances,
    Which lead directly to the door of truth,
    Will give you satisfaction, you may have't.
Tell me but this;
    Have you not sometimes seen a handkerchief
    Spotted with strawberries in your wife's hand?
Witness, you ever-burning lights above,
    You elements that clip us round about,
    Witness that here Iago doth give up
    The execution of his wit, hands, heart,
    To wrong'd Othello's service!
Do you know, sirrah, where Lieutenant Cassio lies?
To tell you where he lodges, is to tell you where I lie.
Can you inquire him out and be edified by report?
How is't with you, my lord?
How do you, Desdemona?
I have sent to bid Cassio come speak with you.
That which I gave you.
Why do you speak so startingly and rash?
Say you?
Pray you, let Cassio be received again.
A man that all his time
    Hath founded his good fortunes on your love,
    Shared dangers with you-
  OTHELLO.
In sooth, you are to blame.
Look you!
What's the news with you?
Madam, my former suit: I do beseech you
    That by your virtuous means I may again
    Exist and be a member of his love
    Whom I with all the office of my heart
    Entirely honor.
So help me every spirit sanctified,
    As I have spoken for you all my best
    And stood within the blank of his displeasure
    For my free speech!
Let that suffice you.
Pray heaven it be state matters, as you think,
    And no conception nor no jealous toy
    Concerning you.
Save you, friend Cassio!
What make you from home?
How is it with you, my most fair Bianca?
Throw your vile guesses in the devil's teeth,
    From whence you have them.
Leave you!
Why, I pray you?
Not that I love you not.
But that you do not love me.
I pray you, bring me on the way a little,
    And say if I shall see you soon at night.
'Tis but a little way that I can bring you,
    For I attend here, but I'll see you soon.
Will you think so?
What,
    If I had said I had seen him do you wrong?
He hath, my lord; but be you well assured,
    No more than he'll unswear.
With her, on her, what you will.
Do you withdraw yourself a little while,
    He will recover straight.
When he is gone,
    I would on great occasion speak with you.
Have you not hurt your head?
I mock you?
Would you would bear your fortune like a man!
Good sir, be a man;
    Think every bearded fellow that's but yoked
    May draw with you.
Stand you awhile apart,
    Confine yourself but in a patient list.
Whilst you were here o'erwhelmed with your grief-
    A passion most unsuiting such a man-
    Cassio came hither.
Marry, patience,
    Or I shall say you are all in all in spleen,
    And nothing of a man.
Will you withdraw?
How do you now, lieutenant?
The worser that you give me the addition
    Whose want even kills me.
Ply Desdemona well, and you are sure on't.
Now, if this suit lay in Bianco's power,
    How quickly should you speed!
Do you hear, Cassio?
She gives it out that you shall marry her.
Do you intend it?
Do you triumph, Roman?
Do you triumph?
Faith, the cry goes that you shall marry her.
Have you scored me?
What do you mean by this haunting of me?
Let the devil and his dam haunt you!
What did you mean by
    that same handkerchief you gave me even now?
A likely piece of work that
    you should find it in your chamber and not know who left it
    there!
Wheresoever you had it, I'll take  
    out no work on't.
An you'll come to supper tonight, you may; an you will not,
    come when you are next prepared for.
Will you sup there?
Well, I may chance to see you, for I would very fain speak
    with you.
Prithee, come; will you?
Did you perceive how he laughed at his vice?
And did you see the handkerchief?
Nay, you must forget that.
If you are so fond over her iniquity, give her patent to
    offend, for, if it touch not you, it comes near nobody.
The Duke and Senators of Venice greet you.
I am very glad to see you, signior;
    Welcome to Cyprus.
I thank you.
Cousin, there's fall'n between him and my lord
    An unkind breech; but you shall make all well.
Are you sure of that?
] "This fail you not to do, as you will-"
  LODOVICO.
Are you wise?
I am glad to see you mad.
] I will not stay to offend you.
What would you with her, sir?
Ay, you did wish that I would make her turn.
Sir, she can turn and turn, and yet go on,
    And turn again; and she can weep, sir, weep;
    And she's obedient, as you say, obedient,
    Very obedient.
Proceed you in your tears.
Get you away;
    I'll send for you anon.
Yes, you have seen Cassio and she together.
Nor send you out o' the way?
If you think other,
    Remove your thought; it doth abuse your bosom.
Why do you weep?
If haply you my father do suspect
    An instrument of this your calling back,
    Lay not your blame on me.
If you have lost him,
    Why, I have lost him too.
By heaven, you do me wrong.
Are not you a strumpet?
I cry you mercy then;
    I took you for that cunning whore of Venice
    That married with Othello.
You, you, ay, you!
I pray you, turn the key, and keep our counsel.
How do you, madam?
How do you, my good lady?
How is't with you?
Some such squire he was
    That turn'd your wit the seamy side without,
    And made you to suspect me with the Moor.
I pray you, be content; 'tis but his humor:
    The business of the state does him offense,  
    And he does chide with you.
Will you hear me, Roderigo?
The jewels you have had from me to deliver to Desdemona
    would half have corrupted a votarist.
I tell you 'tis not very well.
If she will return me my jewels, I will give over
    my suit and repent my unlawful solicitation; if not, assure
    yourself I will seek satisfaction of you.
How do you mean, removing of him?
And that you would have me to do?
Ay, if you dare do yourself a profit and a right.
If you will watch his going
    thence, which his will fashion to fall out between twelve and
    one, you may take him at your pleasure; I will be near to second
    your attempt, and he shall fall between us.
Come, stand not
    amazed at it, but go along with me; I will show you such a
    necessity in his death that you shall think yourself bound to put
    it on him.
And you shall be satisfied.
I do beseech you, sir, trouble yourself no further.
Will you walk, sir?
Get you to bed on the instant; I will be returned
    forthwith.
He hath commanded me to go to bed,
    And bade me to dismiss you.
I would you had never seen him!
I have laid those sheets you bade me on the bed.
Come, come, you talk.
If I court moe women, you'll couch with moe men-"

    So get thee gone; good night.
Why, would not you?
Why, the wrong is but a wrong i' the world; and having the
    world for your labor, 'tis a wrong in your own world, and you
    might quickly make it right.
Did not you hear a cry?
What are you here that cry so grievously?
] What are you there?
What may you be?
Are you of good or evil?
As you shall prove us, praise us.
I cry you mercy.
Cassio, may you suspect
    Who they should be that have thus mangled you?
I am sorry to find you thus; I have been to seek you.
Did you know him?
I cry you gentle pardon;
    These bloody accidents must excuse my manners,
    That so neglected you.
I am glad to see you.
How do you, Cassio?
] For you, mistress,
    Save you your labor.
He that lies slain here, Cassio,
    Was my dear friend; what malice was between you?
] What, look you pale?
Stay you, good gentlemen.
Look you pale, mistress?
Do you perceive the gastness of her eye?
Nay, if you stare, we shall hear more anon.
Behold her well; I pray you, look upon her.
Do you see, gentlemen?
What, do you shake at that?
I charge you, go with me.
I am no strumpet, but of life as honest
    As you that thus abuse me.
Come, mistress, you must tell's another tale.
Emilia, run you to the citadel,
    And tell my lord and lady what hath happ'd!
Will you go on?
Let me not name it to you, you chaste stars!
Will you come to bed, my lord?
Have you pray'd tonight, Desdemona?
If you bethink yourself of any crime
    Unreconciled as yet to heaven and grace,
    Solicit for it straight.
Alas, my lord, what may you mean by that?
Talk you of killing?
If you say so, I hope you will not kill me.
And yet I fear you, for you are fatal then
    When your eyes roll so.
They are loves I bear to you.
Alas, why gnaw you so your nether lip?
And have you mercy too!
I never did
    Offend you in my life; never loved Cassio
    But with such general warranty of heaven
    As I might love.
Nay, if you strive-
  DESDEMONA.
] O, good my lord, I would speak a word with you!
] I do beseech you
    That I may speak with you, O, good my lord!
O, the more angel she,
    And you the blacker devil!
Peace, you were best.
O, are you come, Iago?
But did you ever tell him she was false?
Did you say with Cassio?
What, are you mad?
I charge you, get you home.
I scarce did know you, uncle; there lies your niece,
    Whose breath indeed these hands have newly stopp'd.
Be wise, and get you home.
Take you this weapon,
    Which I have here recover'd from the Moor.
Be not afraid, though you do see me weapon'd;
    Here is my journey's end, here is my butt
    And very sea-mark of my utmost sail.
Do you go back dismay'd?
Why, anything;
    An honorable murtherer, if you will,
    For nought did I in hate, but all in honor.
Did you and he consent in Cassio's death?
Dear general, I never gave you cause.
Will you, I pray, demand that demi-devil
    Why he hath thus ensnared my soul and body?
Demand me nothing; what you know, you know.
Sir, you shall understand what hath befall'n,
    Which, as I think, you know not.
How came you, Cassio, by that handkerchief
    That was my wife's?
Soft you; a word or two before you go.
I pray you, in your letters,
    When you shall these unlucky deeds relate,
    Speak of me as I am; nothing extenuate,
    Nor set down aught in malice.
Then must you speak
    Of one that loved not wisely but too well;
    Of one not easily jealous, but, being wrought,
    Perplex'd in the extreme; of one whose hand,
    Like the base Indian, threw a pearl away
    Richer than all his tribe; of one whose subdued eyes,
    Albeit unused to the melting mood,
    Drop tears as fast as the Arabian trees
    Their medicinal gum.
Set you down this;
    And say besides, that in Aleppo once,  
    Where a malignant and a turban'd Turk
    Beat a Venetian and traduced the state,
    I took by the throat the circumcised dog
    And smote him, thus.
Gratiano, keep the house,
    And seize upon the fortunes of the Moor,
    For they succeed on you.
To you, Lord Governor,
    Remains the censure of this hellish villain,
    The time, the place, the torture.
We thank you both; yet one but flatters us,
    As well appeareth by the cause you come;
    Namely, to appeal each other of high treason.
For you, my noble Lord of Lancaster,
    The honourable father to my foe,
    Once did I lay an ambush for your life,
    A trespass that doth vex my grieved soul;
    But ere I last receiv'd the sacrament
    I did confess it, and exactly begg'd
    Your Grace's pardon; and I hope I had it.
Good uncle, let this end where it begun;
    We'll calm the Duke of Norfolk, you your son.
Cousin, throw up your gage; do you begin.
We were not born to sue, but to command;
    Which since we cannot do to make you friends,
    Be ready, as your lives shall answer it,
    At Coventry, upon Saint Lambert's day.
There shall your swords and lances arbitrate
    The swelling difference of your settled hate;
    Since we can not atone you, we shall see
    Justice design the victor's chivalry.
My loving lord, I take my leave of you;
    Of you, my noble cousin, Lord Aumerle;
    Not sick, although I have to do with death,
    But lusty, young, and cheerly drawing breath.
For that our kingdom's earth should not be soil'd
    With that dear blood which it hath fostered;
    And for our eyes do hate the dire aspect
    Of civil wounds plough'd up with neighbours' sword;
    And for we think the eagle-winged pride
    Of sky-aspiring and ambitious thoughts,
    With rival-hating envy, set on you
    To wake our peace, which in our country's cradle
    Draws the sweet infant breath of gentle sleep;
    Which so rous'd up with boist'rous untun'd drums,
    With harsh-resounding trumpets' dreadful bray,
    And grating shock of wrathful iron arms,
    Might from our quiet confines fright fair peace
    And make us wade even in our kindred's blood-
    Therefore we banish you our territories.
This must my comfort be-
    That sun that warms you here shall shine on me,
    And those his golden beams to you here lent
    Shall point on me and gild my banishment.
Within my mouth you have engaol'd my tongue,
    Doubly portcullis'd with my teeth and lips;
    And dull, unfeeling, barren ignorance
    Is made my gaoler to attend on me.
Lay on our royal sword your banish'd hands;
    Swear by the duty that you owe to God,
    Our part therein we banish with yourselves,
    To keep the oath that we administer:  
    You never shall, so help you truth and God,
    Embrace each other's love in banishment;
    Nor never look upon each other's face;
    Nor never write, regreet, nor reconcile
    This louring tempest of your home-bred hate;
    Nor never by advised purpose meet
    To plot, contrive, or complot any ill,
    'Gainst us, our state, our subjects, or our land.
Alas, I look'd when some of you should say
    I was too strict to make mine own away;
    But you gave leave to my unwilling tongue
    Against my will to do myself this wrong.
Cousin, farewell; what presence must not know,
    From where you do remain let paper show.
I have too few to take my leave of you,
    When the tongue's office should be prodigal
    To breathe the abundant dolour of the heart.
Cousin Aumerle,
    How far brought you high Hereford on his way?
I brought high Hereford, if you call him so,
    But to the next high way, and there I left him.
What said our cousin when you parted with him?
He loves you, on my life, and holds you dear
    As Harry Duke of Hereford, were he here.
Right, you say true: as Hereford's love, so his;
    As theirs, so mine; and all be as it is.
O my liege,  
    Pardon me, if you please; if not, I, pleas'd
    Not to be pardoned, am content withal.
Seek you to seize and gripe into your hands
    The royalties and rights of banish'd Hereford?
-
    If you do wrongfully seize Hereford's rights,
    Call in the letters patents that he hath
    By his attorneys-general to sue
    His livery, and deny his off'red homage,
    You pluck a thousand dangers on your head,
    You lose a thousand well-disposed hearts,  
    And prick my tender patience to those thoughts
    Which honour and allegiance cannot think.
Think what you will, we seize into our hands
    His plate, his goods, his money, and his lands.
No good at all that I can do for him;
    Unless you call it good to pity him,
    Bereft and gelded of his patrimony.
If then we shall shake off our slavish yoke,
    Imp out our drooping country's broken wing,
    Redeem from broking pawn the blemish'd crown,
    Wipe off the dust that hides our sceptre's gilt,
    And make high majesty look like itself,
    Away with me in post to Ravenspurgh;
    But if you faint, as fearing to do so,
    Stay and be secret, and myself will go.
You promis'd, when you parted with the King,
    To lay aside life-harming heaviness
    And entertain a cheerful disposition.
Why have you not proclaim'd Northumberland
    And all the rest revolted faction traitors?
My lord, I had forgot to tell your lordship,
    To-day, as I came by, I called there-
    But I shall grieve you to report the rest.
Exit SERVINGMAN
    Gentlemen, will you go muster men?
-Come, cousin,
    I'll dispose of you.
Thither will I with you; for little office
    Will the hateful commons perform for us,
    Except Eke curs to tear us all to pieces.
Will you go along with us?
I had thought, my lord, to have learn'd his health of you.
Have you forgot the Duke of Hereford, boy?
My gracious lord, I tender you my service,
    Such as it is, being tender, raw, and young;
    Which elder days shall ripen, and confirm
    To more approved service and desert.
My Lord of Hereford, my message is to you.
My lord, my answer is-'to Lancaster';
    And I am come to seek that name in England;
    And I must find that title in your tongue
    Before I make reply to aught you say.
To you, my lord, I come-what lord you will-
    From the most gracious regent of this land,
    The Duke of York, to know what pricks you on
    To take advantage of the absent time,
    And fright our native peace with self-borne arms.
I shall not need transport my words by you;
    Here comes his Grace in person.
You are my father, for methinks in you
    I see old Gaunt alive.
O, then, my father,
    Will you permit that I shall stand condemn'd
    A wandering vagabond; my rights and royalties
    Pluck'd from my arms perforce, and given away
    To upstart unthrifts?
You have a son, Aumerle, my noble cousin;
    Had you first died, and he been thus trod down,
    He should have found his uncle Gaunt a father
    To rouse his wrongs and chase them to the bay.
What would you have me do?
My lords of England, let me tell you this:
    I have had feeling of my cousin's wrongs,
    And labour'd all I could to do him right;
    But in this kind to come, in braving arms,  
    Be his own carver and cut out his way,
    To find out right with wrong-it may not be;
    And you that do abet him in this kind
    Cherish rebellion, and are rebels all.
I cannot mend it, I must needs confess,
    Because my power is weak and all ill left;
    But if I could, by Him that gave me life,
    I would attach you all and make you stoop
    Unto the sovereign mercy of the King;
    But since I cannot, be it known unto you
    I do remain as neuter.
So, fare you well;
    Unless you please to enter in the castle,
    And there repose you for this night.
It may be I will go with you; but yet I'll pause,
    For I am loath to break our country's laws.
Nor friends nor foes, to me welcome you are.
Bushy and Green, I will not vex your souls-
    Since presently your souls must part your bodies-
    With too much urging your pernicious lives,
    For 'twere no charity; yet, to wash your blood
    From off my hands, here in the view of men
    I will unfold some causes of your deaths:
    You have misled a prince, a royal king,
    A happy gentleman in blood and lineaments,
    By you unhappied and disfigured clean;
    You have in manner with your sinful hours
    Made a divorce betwixt his queen and him;
    Broke the possession of a royal bed,
    And stain'd the beauty of a fair queen's cheeks
    With tears drawn from her eyes by your foul wrongs;
    Myself-a prince by fortune of my birth,  
    Near to the King in blood, and near in love
    Till you did make him misinterpret me-
    Have stoop'd my neck under your injuries
    And sigh'd my English breath in foreign clouds,
    Eating the bitter bread of banishment,
    Whilst you have fed upon my signories,
    Dispark'd my parks and fell'd my forest woods,
    From my own windows torn my household coat,
    Raz'd out my imprese, leaving me no sign
    Save men's opinions and my living blood
    To show the world I am a gentleman.
This and much more, much more than twice all this,
    Condemns you to the death.
Exeunt NORTHUMBERLAND, and others, with the prisoners  
    Uncle, you say the Queen is at your house;
    For God's sake, fairly let her be entreated.
Fear not, my lord; that Power that made you king
    Hath power to keep you king in spite of all.
Comfort, my liege; remember who you are.
Again uncurse their souls; their peace is made
    With heads, and not with hands; those whom you curse
    Have felt the worst of death's destroying wound
    And lie full low, grav'd in the hollow ground.
Cover your heads, and mock not flesh and blood
    With solemn reverence; throw away respect,
    Tradition, form, and ceremonious duty;
    For you have but mistook me all this while.
I live with bread like you, feel want,
    Taste grief, need friends: subjected thus,
    How can you say to me I am a king?
Men judge by the complexion of the sky
    The state in inclination of the day;
    So may you by my dull and heavy eye,
    My tongue hath but a heavier tale to say.
What say you now?
The time hath been,
    Would you have been so brief with him, he would
    Have been so brief with you to shorten you,
    For taking so the head, your whole head's length.
Mistake not, uncle, further than you should.
Take not, good cousin, further than you should,
    Lest you mistake.
And though you think that all, as you have done,
    Have torn their souls by turning them from us,
    And we are barren and bereft of friends,  
    Yet know-my master, God omnipotent,
    Is mustering in his clouds on our behalf
    Armies of pestilence; and they shall strike
    Your children yet unborn and unbegot,
    That lift your vassal hands against my head
    And threat the glory of my precious crown.
Well, well, I see
    I talk but idly, and you laugh at me.
My lord, in the base court he doth attend
    To speak with you; may it please you to come down?
Fair cousin, you debase your princely knee
    To make the base earth proud with kissing it.
Well you deserve.
Cousin, I am too young to be your father,
    Though you are old enough to be my heir.
What you will have, I'll give, and willing too;
    For do we must what force will have us do.
I could weep, madam, would it do you good.
What, think you the King shall be deposed?
Post you to London, and you will find it so;
    I speak no more than every one doth know.
In that dead time when Gloucester's death was plotted
    I heard you say 'Is not my arm of length,
    That reacheth from the restful English Court
    As far as Calais, to mine uncle's head?
'
    Amongst much other talk that very time  
    I heard you say that you had rather refuse
    The offer of an hundred thousand crowns
    Than Bolingbroke's return to England;
    Adding withal, how blest this land would be
    In this your cousin's death.
I have a thousand spirits in one breast
    To answer twenty thousand such as you.
My Lord Fitzwater, I do remember well
    The very time Aumerle and you did talk.
'Tis very true; you were in presence then,
    And you can witness with me this is true.
Lords appellants,
    Your differences shall all rest under gage
    Till we assign you to your days of trial

                 Enter YORK, attended

  YORK.
My Lord of Hereford here, whom you call king,
    Is a foul traitor to proud Hereford's king;
    And if you crown him, let me prophesy-
    The blood of English shall manure the ground,
    And future ages groan for this foul act;
    Peace shall go sleep with Turks and infidels,
    And in this seat of peace tumultuous wars
    Shall kin with kin and kind with kind confound;
    Disorder, horror, fear, and mutiny,
    Shall here inhabit, and this land be call'd
    The field of Golgotha and dead men's skulls.
O, if you raise this house against this house,
    It will the woefullest division prove
    That ever fell upon this cursed earth.
Prevent it, resist it, let it not be so,
    Lest child, child's children, cry against you woe.
Well have you argued, sir; and, for your pains,
    Of capital treason we arrest you here.
May it please you, lords, to grant the commons' suit?
Lords, you that here are under our arrest,
    Procure your sureties for your days of answer.
That bucket down and fun of tears am I,
    Drinking my griefs, whilst you mount up on high.
I thought you had been willing to resign.
Part of your cares you give me with your crown.
Are you contented to resign the crown?
No more; but that you read
    These accusations, and these grievous crimes  
    Committed by your person and your followers
    Against the state and profit of this land;
    That, by confessing them, the souls of men
    May deem that you are worthily depos'd.
Nay, all of you that stand and look upon me
    Whilst that my wretchedness doth bait myself,
    Though some of you, with Pilate, wash your hands,
    Showing an outward pity-yet you Pilates
    Have here deliver'd me to my sour cross,
    And water cannot wash away your sin.
Go some of you and fetch a looking-glass.
I'll beg one boon,
    And then be gone and trouble you no more.
Whither you will, so I were from your sights.
Go, some of you convey him to the Tower.
Conveyers are you all,
    That rise thus nimbly by a true king's fall.
Yet look up, behold,
    That you in pity may dissolve to dew,
    And wash him fresh again with true-love tears.
And, madam, there is order ta'en for you:
    With all swift speed you must away to France.
Take leave, and part; for you must part forthwith.
Bad men, you violate  
    A twofold marriage-'twixt my crown and me,
    And then betwixt me and my married wife.
My Lord, you told me you would tell the rest,
    When weeping made you break the story off,
    Of our two cousins' coming into London.
'
    Whilst he, from the one side to the other turning,
    Bareheaded, lower than his proud steed's neck,
    Bespake them thus, 'I thank you, countrymen.
Aumerle that was
    But that is lost for being Richard's friend,
    And madam, you must call him Rudand now.
Well, bear you well in this new spring of time,
    Lest you be cropp'd before you come to prime.
What should you fear?
I do beseech you, pardon me; I may not show it.
Uncle, farewell; and, cousin, adieu;
    Your mother well hath pray'd, and prove you true.
My lord, will't please you to fall to?
O, belike his Majesty hath some intent
    That you should be new-christ'ned in the Tower.
Why, this it is when men are rul'd by women:
    'Tis not the King that sends you to the Tower;
    My Lady Grey his wife, Clarence, 'tis she
    That tempers him to this extremity.
Heard you not what an humble suppliant
    Lord Hastings was, for her delivery?
I'll tell you what-I think it is our way,
    If we will keep in favour with the King,
    To be her men and wear her livery:
    The jealous o'er-worn widow, and herself,
    Since that our brother dubb'd them gentlewomen,
    Are mighty gossips in our monarchy.
How say you, sir?
Can you deny all this?
Brother, farewell; I will unto the King;
    And whatsoe'er you will employ me in-
    Were it to call King Edward's widow sister-  
    I will perform it to enfranchise you.
Meantime, this deep disgrace in brotherhood
    Touches me deeper than you can imagine.
Well, your imprisonment shall not be long;
    I will deliver or else lie for you.
Well are you welcome to the open air.
No doubt, no doubt; and so shall Clarence too;
    For they that were your enemies are his,
    And have prevail'd as much on him as you.
Go you before, and I will follow you.
Come, now towards Chertsey with your holy load,
    Taken from Paul's to be interred there;
    And still as you are weary of this weight
    Rest you, whiles I lament King Henry's corse.
Stay, you that bear the corse, and set it down.
What, do you tremble?
Are you all afraid?
Alas, I blame you not, for you are mortal,
    And mortal eyes cannot endure the devil.
Lady, you know no rules of charity,
    Which renders good for bad, blessings for curses.
Yes, one place else, if you will hear me name it.
So will it, madam, till I lie with you.
That it may please you leave these sad designs
    To him that hath most cause to be a mourner,
    And presently repair to Crosby House;
    Where-after I have solemnly interr'd  
    At Chertsey monast'ry this noble king,
    And wet his grave with my repentant tears-
    I will with all expedient duty see you.
For divers unknown reasons, I beseech you,
    Grant me this boon.
With all my heart; and much it joys me too
    To see you are become so penitent.
'Tis more than you deserve;
    But since you teach me how to flatter you,
    Imagine I have said farewell already.
In that you brook it ill, it makes him worse;
    Therefore, for God's sake, entertain good comfort,
    And cheer his Grace with quick and merry eyes.
The heavens have bless'd you with a goodly son
    To be your comforter when he is gone.
Ah, he is young; and his minority
    Is put unto the trust of Richard Gloucester,
    A man that loves not me, nor none of you.
God make your Majesty joyful as you have been.
Yet, Derby, notwithstanding she's your wife
    And loves not me, be you, good lord, assur'd
    I hate not you for her proud arrogance.
I do beseech you, either not believe
    The envious slanders of her false accusers;
    Or, if she be accus'd on true report,
    Bear with her weakness, which I think proceeds
    From wayward sickness and no grounded malice.
Saw you the King to-day, my Lord of  
    Derby?
Did you confer
    with him?
A plague upon you all!
His royal Grace-
    Whom God preserve better than you would wish!
-
    Cannot be quiet searce a breathing while
    But you must trouble him with lewd complaints.
Brother of Gloucester, you mistake the  
    matter.
Come, come, we know your meaning,
    brother Gloucester:
    You envy my advancement and my friends';
    God grant we never may have need of you!
Meantime, God grants that I have need of you.
My lord, you do me shameful injury
    Falsely to draw me in these vile suspects.
You may deny that you were not the mean
    Of my Lord Hastings' late imprisonment.
She may do more, sir, than denying that:
    She may help you to many fair preferments
    And then deny her aiding hand therein,
    And lay those honours on your high desert.
Threat you me with telling of the
    King?
Ere you were queen, ay, or your husband
    King,
    I was a pack-horse in his great affairs,
    A weeder-out of his proud adversaries,
    A liberal rewarder of his friends;
    To royalize his blood I spent mine own.
In all which time you and your husband Grey
    Were factious for the house of Lancaster;
    And, Rivers, so were you.
Let me put in your minds, if you forget,
    What you have been ere this, and what you are;
    Withal, what I have been, and what I am.
My Lord of Gloucester, in those busy days
    Which here you urge to prove us enemies,
    We follow'd then our lord, our sovereign king.
So should we you, if you should be our king.
As little joy, my lord, as you suppose
    You should enjoy were you this country's king,
    As little joy you may suppose in me
    That I enjoy, being the Queen thereof.
[Advancing]
    Hear me, you wrangling pirates, that fall out
    In sharing that which you have pill'd from me.
Which of you trembles not that looks on me?
If not that, I am Queen, you bow like subjects,
    Yet that, by you depos'd, you quake like rebels?
A husband and a son thou ow'st to me;
    And thou a kingdom; all of you allegiance.
This sorrow that I have by right is yours;
    And all the pleasures you usurp are mine.
What, were you snarling all before I came,
    Ready to catch each other by the throat,
    And turn you all your hatred now on me?
Rivers and Dorset, you were standers by,
    And so wast thou, Lord Hastings, when my son
    Was stabb'd with bloody daggers.
God, I pray him,
    That none of you may live his natural age,
    But by some unlook'd accident cut off!
Thus have you breath'd your curse
    against yourself.
Foul shame upon you!
you have all
    mov'd mine.
Were you well serv'd, you would be taught your
      duty.
To serve me well you all should do me
    duty,
    Teach me to be your queen and you my subjects.
Peace, Master Marquis, you are malapert;
    Your fire-new stamp of honour is scarce current.
It touches you, my lord, as much as me.
Uncharitably with me have you dealt,
    And shamefully my hopes by you are butcher'd.
Live each of you the subjects to his hate,
    And he to yours, and all of you to God's!
Yet you have all the vantage of her wrong.
Madam, his Majesty doth can for you,
    And for your Grace, and you, my gracious lords.
Lords, will you go
    with me?
Are you now going to dispatch this thing?
[Gives the warrant]
    When you have done, repair to Crosby Place.
But, sirs, be sudden in the execution,
    Withal obdurate, do not hear him plead;
    For Clarence is well-spoken, and perhaps
    May move your hearts to pity, if you mark him.
I like you, lads; about your business straight;
    Go, go, dispatch.
I pray you
    tell me.
Had you such leisure in the time of death
    To gaze upon these secrets of the deep?
Awak'd you not in this sore agony?
No marvel, lord, though it affrighted you;
    I am afraid, methinks, to hear you tell it.
I'll to the King and signify to him
    That thus I have resign'd to you my charge.
Fare
    you well.
A man, as you are.
Nor you as we are, loyal.
Why look you pale?
Who sent you hither?
Wherefore do you come?
Wherein, my friends, have I offended you?
Offended us you have not, but the King.
Are you drawn forth among a world of men
    To slay the innocent?
I charge you, as you hope to have redemption
    By Christ's dear blood shed for our grievous sins,
    That you depart and lay no hands on me.
The deed you undertake is damnable.
Will you then
    Spurn at his edict and fulfil a man's?
He sends you not to murder me for this,
    For in that sin he is as deep as I.
If God will be avenged for the deed,
    O, know you yet He doth it publicly.
If you do love my brother, hate not me;
    I am his brother, and I love him well.
If you are hir'd for meed, go back again,
    And I will send you to my brother Gloucester,
    Who shall reward you better for my life
    Than Edward will for tidings of my death.
You are deceiv'd: your brother Gloucester
    hates you.
Go you to him from me.
Come, you
    deceive yourself:
    'Tis he that sends us to destroy you here.
Why, so he doth, when he delivers you
    From this earth's thraldom to the joys of heaven.
Make peace with God, for you must die,
    my lord.
Have you that holy feeling in your souls
    To counsel me to make my peace with God,
    And are you yet to your own souls so blind
    That you will war with God by murd'ring me?
O, sirs, consider: they that set you on
    To do this deed will hate you for the deed.
Which of you, if you were a prince's son,
    Being pent from liberty as I am now,
    If two such murderers as yourselves came to you,
    Would not entreat for life?
My friend, I spy some pity in thy looks;
    O, if thine eye be not a flatterer,
    Come thou on my side and entreat for me-
    As you would beg were you in my distress.
Look behind you, my lord.
If all
    this will not do,
    I'll drown you in the malmsey-butt within.
By heavens, the Duke shall know how slack you have
    been!
Take heed you dally not before your king;
    Lest He that is the supreme King of kings
    Confound your hidden falsehood and award  
    Either of you to be the other's end.
Madam, yourself is not exempt from this;
    Nor you, son Dorset; Buckingham, nor you:
    You have been factious one against the other.
Wife, love Lord Hastings, let him kiss your hand;
    And what you do, do it unfeignedly.
[To the QUEEN]  Whenever Buckingham
    doth turn his hate
    Upon your Grace, but with all duteous love
    Doth cherish you and yours, God punish me
    With hate in those where I expect most love!
This do I beg of God
    When I am cold in love to you or yours.
First, madam, I entreat true peace of you,
    Which I will purchase with my duteous service;
    Of you, my noble cousin Buckingham,  
    If ever any grudge were lodg'd between us;
    Of you, and you, Lord Rivers, and of Dorset,
    That all without desert have frown'd on me;
    Of you, Lord Woodville, and, Lord Scales, of you;
    Dukes, earls, lords, gentlemen-indeed, of all.
All this from my remembrance brutish wrath  
    Sinfully pluck'd, and not a man of you
    Had so much race to put it in my mind.
But when your carters or your waiting-vassals
    Have done a drunken slaughter and defac'd
    The precious image of our dear Redeemer,
    You straight are on your knees for pardon, pardon;
    And I, unjustly too, must grant it you.
The proudest of you all
    Have been beholding to him in his life;
    Yet none of you would once beg for his life.
O God, I fear thy justice will take hold
    On me, and you, and mine, and yours, for this!
Mark'd you not
    How that the guilty kindred of the Queen
    Look'd pale when they did hear of Clarence' death?
Come, lords, will you go
    To comfort Edward with our company?
Why do you weep so oft, and beat your breast,
    And cry 'O Clarence, my unhappy son!
Why do you look on us, and shake your head,
    And call us orphans, wretches, castaways,
    If that our noble father were alive?
My pretty cousins, you mistake me both;
    I do lament the sickness of the King,
    As loath to lose him, not your father's death;
    It were lost sorrow to wail one that's lost.
Then you conclude, my grandam, he is dead.
The King doth love you
    well.
Think you my uncle did dissemble, grandam?
If you will live, lament; if die, be brief,
    That our swift-winged souls may catch the King's,
    Or like obedient subjects follow him
    To his new kingdom of ne'er-changing night.
Ah, aunt, you wept not for our father's death!
How can we aid you with our kindred tears?
Alas, you three on me, threefold distress'd,
    Pour all your tears!
God is much displeas'd  
    That you take with unthankfulness his doing.
In common worldly things 'tis called ungrateful
    With dull unwillingness to repay a debt
    Which with a bounteous hand was kindly lent;
    Much more to be thus opposite with heaven,
    For it requires the royal debt it lent you.
Madam, bethink you, like a careful mother,
    Of the young prince your son.
Madam, my mother, I do cry you mercy;
    I did not see your Grace.
Madam, and you, my sister, will you go
    To give your censures in this business?
I promise you, I scarcely know myself.
Hear you the news abroad?
Give you good morrow, sir.
And so was I; I'll bear you company.
Go to, you are too
    shrewd.
Accursed and unquiet wrangling days,
    How many of you have mine eyes beheld!
Stay, I will go with you.
For my part, I'll resign unto your Grace
    The seal I keep; and so betide to me
    As well I tender you and all of yours!
Go, I'll conduct you to the sanctuary.
The weary way hath made you melancholy.
Sweet Prince, the untainted virtue of your
    years
    Hath not yet div'd into the world's deceit;
    Nor more can you distinguish of a man
    Than of his outward show; which, God He knows,
    Seldom or never jumpeth with the heart.
Those uncles which you want were dangerous;
    Your Grace attended to their sug'red words  
    But look'd not on the poison of their hearts.
God keep you from them and from such false friends!
My lord, the Mayor of London comes to greet
    you.
I thank you, good my lord, and thank you all.
My lord, you shall o'errule my mind for once.
Come on, Lord Hastings, will you go with me?
Good lords, make all the speedy haste you may.
If I may counsel you, some day or two
    Your Highness shall repose you at the Tower,
    Then where you please and shall be thought most fit
    For your best health and recreation.
What say you, uncle?
I'll tell you what, my cousin Buckingham-
  BUCKINGHAM.
Well, my dread lord; so must I can you now.
I thank you, gentle uncle.
Then he is more beholding to you than I.
He may command me as my sovereign;
    But you have power in me as in a kinsman.
I pray you, uncle, give me this dagger.
O, then, I see you will part but with light gifts:
    In weightier things you'll say a beggar nay.
What, would you have my weapon, little
    Lord?
I would, that I might thank you as you call me.
Uncle, my brother mocks both you and me;
    Because that I am little, like an ape,
    He thinks that you should bear me on your shoulders.
My lord, will't please you pass along?
Myself and my good cousin Buckingham
    Will to your mother, to entreat of her
    To meet you at the Tower and welcome you.
What, will you go unto the Tower, my lord?
Why, what should you fear?
Think you, my lord, this little prating York
    Was not incensed by his subtle mother
    To taunt and scorn you thus opprobriously?
Shall we hear from you, Catesby, ere we sleep?
At Crosby House, there shall you find us both.
Besides, he says there are two councils kept,
    And that may be determin'd at the one  
    Which may make you and him to rue at th' other.
Therefore he sends to know your lordship's pleasure-
    If you will presently take horse with him
    And with all speed post with him toward the north
    To shun the danger that his soul divines.
I'll go, my lord, and tell him what you say.
Good morrow, Catesby; you are early stirring.
Ay, on my life; and hopes to find you forward
    Upon his party for the gain thereof;  
    And thereupon he sends you this good news,
    That this same very day your enemies,
    The kindred of the Queen, must die at Pomfret.
The Princes both make high account of you-
    [Aside]  For they account his head upon the bridge.
Fear you the boar, and go so unprovided?
Think you, but that I know our state secure,
    I would be so triumphant as I am?
The lords at Pomfret, when they rode from
    London,
    Were jocund and suppos'd their states were sure,  
    And they indeed had no cause to mistrust;
    But yet you see how soon the day o'ercast.
Come, come, have with you.
Wot you what, my
    Lord?
To-day the lords you talk'd of are beheaded.
I am in your debt for your last exercise;
    Come the next Sabbath, and I will content you.
Good faith, and when I met this holy man,
    The men you talk of came into my mind.
What, go you toward the Tower?
-
    Come, will you go?
God bless the Prince from all the pack of you!
A knot you are of damned blood-suckers.
Now Margaret's curse is fall'n upon our heads,
    When she exclaim'd on Hastings, you, and I,  
    For standing by when Richard stabb'd her son.
We know each other's faces; for our hearts,
    He knows no more of mine than I of yours;
    Or I of his, my lord, than you of mine.
Lord Hastings, you and he are near in love.
But you, my honourable lords, may name the time;
    And in the Duke's behalf I'll give my voice,
    Which, I presume, he'll take in gentle part.
Had you not come upon your cue, my lord,
  WILLIAM Lord Hastings had pronounc'd your part-
    I mean, your voice for crowning of the King.
I do beseech you send for some of them.
Cousin of Buckingham, a word with you.
Withdraw yourself awhile; I'll go with you.
I think there's never a man in Christendom
    Can lesser hide his love or hate than he;
    For by his face straight shall you know his heart.
What of his heart perceive you in his face
    By any livelihood he show'd to-day?
I pray you all, tell me what they deserve
    That do conspire my death with devilish plots  
    Of damned witchcraft, and that have prevail'd
    Upon my body with their hellish charms?
Would you imagine, or almost believe-
    Were't not that by great preservation
    We live to tell it-that the subtle traitor
    This day had plotted, in the council-house,
    To murder me and my good Lord of Gloucester.
think you we are Turks or Infidels?
Now, fair befall you!
Yet had we not determin'd he should die
    Until your lordship came to see his end-
    Which now the loving haste of these our friends,
    Something against our meanings, have prevented-
    Because, my lord, I would have had you heard
    The traitor speak, and timorously confess
    The manner and the purpose of his treasons:
    That you might well have signified the same
    Unto the citizens, who haply may
    Misconster us in him and wail his death.
Which since you come too late of our intent,
    Yet witness what you hear we did intend.
Yet touch this sparingly, as 'twere far off;
    Because, my lord, you know my mother lives.
If you thrive well, bring them to Baynard's
    Castle;
    Where you shall find me well accompanied
    With reverend fathers and well learned bishops.
Touch'd you the bastardy of Edward's
    children?
Intend some fear;
    Be not you spoke with but by mighty suit;
    And look you get a prayer-book in your hand,
    And stand between two churchmen, good my lord;
    For on that ground I'll make a holy descant;
    And be not easily won to our requests.
I go; and if you plead as well for them
    As I can say nay to thee for myself,
    No doubt we bring it to a happy issue.
My lord,
    He wonders to what end you have assembled
    Such troops of citizens to come to him.
His Grace not being warn'd thereof before,
    He fears, my lord, you mean no good to him.
I do suspect I have done some offence
    That seems disgracious in the city's eye,
    And that you come to reprehend my ignorance.
Know then, it is your fault that you resign
    The supreme seat, the throne majestical,
    The scept'red office of your ancestors,  
    Your state of fortune and your due of birth,
    The lineal glory of your royal house,
    To the corruption of a blemish'd stock;
    Whiles in the mildness of your sleepy thoughts,
    Which here we waken to our country's good,
    The noble isle doth want her proper limbs;
    Her face defac'd with scars of infamy,
    Her royal stock graft with ignoble plants,
    And almost should'red in the swallowing gulf
    Of dark forgetfulness and deep oblivion.
Which to recure, we heartily solicit
    Your gracious self to take on you the charge
    And kingly government of this your land-
    Not as protector, steward, substitute,
    Or lowly factor for another's gain;
    But as successively, from blood to blood,
    Your right of birth, your empery, your own.
If not to answer, you might haply think
    Tongue-tied ambition, not replying, yielded
    To bear the golden yoke of sovereignty,
    Which fondly you would here impose on me;
    If to reprove you for this suit of yours,
    So season'd with your faithful love to me,
    Then, on the other side, I check'd my friends.
Therefore-to speak, and to avoid the first,
    And then, in speaking, not to incur the last-
    Definitively thus I answer you:
    Your love deserves my thanks, but my desert
    Unmeritable shuns your high request.
But, God be thank'd, there is no need of me-
    And much I need to help you, were there need.
On him I lay that you would lay on me-
    The right and fortune of his happy stars,
    Which God defend that I should wring from him.
Do, good my lord; your citizens entreat you.
Alas, why would you heap this care on me?
I do beseech you, take it not amiss:
    I cannot nor I will not yield to you.
If you refuse it-as, in love and zeal,
    Loath to depose the child, your brother's son;
    As well we know your tenderness of heart
    And gentle, kind, effeminate remorse,
    Which we have noted in you to your kindred
    And egally indeed to all estates-
    Yet know, whe'er you accept our suit or no,
    Your brother's son shall never reign our king;
    But we will plant some other in the throne
    To the disgrace and downfall of your house;
    And in this resolution here we leave you.
If you deny them, all the land will rue it.
Will you enforce me to a world of cares?
Re-enter BUCKINGHAM and the rest

    Cousin of Buckingham, and sage grave men,
    Since you will buckle fortune on my back,
    To bear her burden, whe'er I will or no,
    I must have patience to endure the load;
    But if black scandal or foul-fac'd reproach
    Attend the sequel of your imposition,
    Your mere enforcement shall acquittance me
    From all the impure blots and stains thereof;  
    For God doth know, and you may partly see,
    How far I am from the desire of this.
In saying so, you shall but say the truth.
Then I salute you with this royal title-
    Long live King Richard, England's worthy King!
To-morrow may it please you to be crown'd?
Even when you please, for you will have it so.
As much to you, good sister!
Master Lieutenant, pray you, by your leave,
    How doth the Prince, and my young son of York?
By your patience,
    I may not suffer you to visit them.
Let me but meet you, ladies, one hour hence,
    And I'll salute your Grace of York as mother
    And reverend looker-on of two fair queens.
[To ANNE]  Come, madam, you must straight to
    Westminster,
    There to be crowned Richard's royal queen.
Take all the swift advantage of the hours;
    You shall have letters from me to my son
    In your behalf, to meet you on the way.
Pity, you ancient stones, those tender babes
    Whom envy hath immur'd within your walls,
    Rough cradle for such little pretty ones.
Why, so you are, my thrice-renowned lord.
I will resolve you herein presently.
Please you;
    But I had rather kill two enemies.
Let me have open means to come to them,
    And soon I'll rid you from the fear of them.
My lord, I have consider'd in my mind
    The late request that you did sound me in.
My lord, I claim the gift, my due by promise,
    For which your honour and your faith is pawn'd:
    Th' earldom of Hereford and the movables
    Which you have promised I shall possess.
Stanley, look to your wife; if she convey  
    Letters to Richmond, you shall answer it.
I am thus bold to put your Grace in mind
    Of what you promis'd me.
May it please you to resolve me in my suit.
If to have done the thing you gave in charge
    Beget your happiness, be happy then,
    For it is done.
And came I not at last to comfort you?
If I be so disgracious in your eye,
    Let me march on and not offend you, madam.
Stay, madam, I must talk a word with you.
Madam, so thrive I in my enterprise
    And dangerous success of bloody wars,
    As I intend more good to you and yours
    Than ever you or yours by me were harm'd!
What do you think?
How think you of it?
That would I learn of you,
    As one being best acquainted with her humour.
A grandam's name is little less in love
    Than is the doating title of a mother;
    They are as children but one step below,
    Even of your metal, of your very blood;
    Of all one pain, save for a night of groans
    Endur'd of her, for whom you bid like sorrow.
The loss you have is but a son being King,
    And by that loss your daughter is made Queen.
I cannot make you what amends I would,
    Therefore accept such kindness as I can.
The King, that calls your beauteous daughter wife,
    Familiarly shall call thy Dorset brother;
    Again shall you be mother to a king,
    And all the ruins of distressful times
    Repair'd with double riches of content.
The liquid drops of tears that you have shed
    Shall come again, transform'd to orient pearl,
    Advantaging their loan with interest
    Of ten times double gain of happiness.
Therefore, dear mother-I must call you so-
    Be the attorney of my love to her;
    Plead what I will be, not what I have been;
    Not my deserts, but what I will deserve.
Ay, if the devil tempt you to do good.
Write to me very shortly,
    And you shall understand from me her mind.
What, may it please you, shall I do at Salisbury?
Enter LORD STANLEY

  STANLEY, what news with you?
None good, my liege, to please you with  
    the hearing;
    Nor none so bad but well may be reported.
Well, as you guess?
So deal with him as I prove true to you.
Out on you, owls!
My Lord of Surrey, why look you so sad?
Sir William Brandon, you shall bear my standard.
My Lord of Oxford-you, Sir William Brandon-  
    And you, Sir Walter Herbert-stay with me.
Yet one thing more, good Captain, do for me-
    Where is Lord Stanley quarter'd, do you know?
Upon my life, my lord, I'll undertake it;
    And so, God give you quiet rest to-night!
I warrant you, my lord.
Cry mercy, lords and watchful gentlemen,
    That you have ta'en a tardy sluggard here.
How have you slept, my lord?
I promise you my soul is very jocund
    In the remembrance of so fair a dream.
Then if you fight against God's enemy,
    God will in justice ward you as his soldiers;
    If you do sweat to put a tyrant down,
    You sleep in peace, the tyrant being slain;
    If you do fight against your country's foes,
    Your country's foes shall pay your pains the hire;
    If you do fight in safeguard of your wives,
    Your wives shall welcome home the conquerors;
    If you do free your children from the sword,
    Your children's children quits it in your age.
For me, the ransom of my bold attempt
    Shall be this cold corpse on the earth's cold face;
    But if I thrive, the gain of my attempt
    The least of you shall share his part thereof.
Remember whom you are to cope withal-
    A sort of vagabonds, rascals, and runaways,
    A scum of Britaines, and base lackey peasants,
    Whom their o'er-cloyed country vomits forth
    To desperate adventures and assur'd destruction.
You sleeping safe, they bring to you unrest;
    You having lands, and bless'd with beauteous wives,
    They would restrain the one, distain the other.
I'll help you to a horse.
He is, my lord, and safe in Leicester town,
    Whither, if it please you, we may now withdraw us.
The fearful passage of their death-mark'd love,
    And the continuance of their parents' rage,
    Which, but their children's end, naught could remove,
    Is now the two hours' traffic of our stage;
    The which if you with patient ears attend,
    What here shall miss, our toil shall strive to mend.
Ay, while you live, draw your neck out of collar.
Do you bite your thumb at us, sir?
Do you bite your thumb at us, sir?
No, sir, I do not bite my thumb at you, sir; but I bite my
    thumb, sir.
Do you quarrel, sir?
But if you do, sir, am for you.
I serve as good a man as you.
Draw, if you be men.
You know not what you do.
Why call you for a sword?
you men, you beasts,  
    That quench the fire of your pernicious rage
    With purple fountains issuing from your veins!
If ever you disturb our streets again,
    Your lives shall pay the forfeit of the peace.
You, Capulet, shall go along with me;
    And, Montague, come you this afternoon,
    To know our farther pleasure in this case,
    To old Freetown, our common judgment place.
Speak, nephew, were you by when it began?
Saw you him to-day?
My noble uncle, do you know the cause?
Have you importun'd him by any means?
So please you step aside,
    I'll know his grievance, or be much denied.
An if you leave me so, you do me wrong.
Tell me in sadness, who is that you love?
I aim'd so near when I suppos'd you lov'd.
Well, in that hit you miss.
Of honourable reckoning are you both,
    And pity 'tis you liv'd at odds so long.
But now, my lord, what say you to my suit?
This night I hold an old accustom'd feast,
    Whereto I have invited many a guest,
    Such as I love; and you among the store,
    One more, most welcome, makes my number more.
Such comfort as do lusty young men feel
    When well apparell'd April on the heel
    Of limping Winter treads, even such delight
    Among fresh female buds shall you this night
    Inherit at my house.
I pray, sir, can you read?
Perhaps you have learned it without book.
But I pray, can you
    read anything you see?
Rest you merry!
Indeed I should have ask'd you that before.
Now I'll tell you without asking.
My master is the great rich
    Capulet; and if you be not of the house of Montagues, I pray come
    and crush a cup of wine.
Rest you merry!
you saw her fair, none else being by,
    Herself pois'd with herself in either eye;
    But in that crystal scales let there be weigh'd
    Your lady's love against some other maid
    That I will show you shining at this feast,
    And she shall scant show well that now seems best.
My lord and you were then at Mantua.
Younger than you,
    Here in Verona, ladies of esteem,
    Are made already mothers.
By my count,  
    I was your mother much upon these years
    That you are now a maid.
Thus then in brief:
    The valiant Paris seeks you for his love.
What say you?
Can you love the gentleman?
This night you shall behold him at our feast.
That book in many's eyes doth share the glory,  
    That in gold clasps locks in the golden story;
    So shall you share all that he doth possess,
    By having him making yourself no less.
Speak briefly, can you like of Paris' love?
Madam, the guests are come, supper serv'd up, you call'd, my
    young lady ask'd for, the nurse curs'd in the pantry, and
    everything in extremity.
I beseech you
    follow straight.
Nay, gentle Romeo, we must have you dance.
And, to sink in it, should you burthen love-
    Too great oppression for a tender thing.
If love be rough with you, be rough with love.
Prick love for pricking, and you beat love down.
O, then I see Queen Mab hath been with you.
This wind you talk of blows us from ourselves.
Ladies that have their toes
    Unplagu'd with corns will have a bout with you.
which of you all
    Will now deny to dance?
More light, you knaves!
Nay, sit, nay, sit, good cousin Capulet,
    For you and I are past our dancing days.
Will you tell me that?
Wherefore storm you so?
Am I the master here, or you?
you'll be the man!
This trick may chance to scathe you.
I'll make you quiet; what!
Good pilgrim, you do wrong your hand too much,
    Which mannerly devotion shows in this;
    For saints have hands that pilgrims' hands do touch,
    And palm to palm is holy palmers' kiss.
Madam, your mother craves a word with you.
I nurs'd her daughter that you talk'd withal.
I tell you, he that can lay hold of her
    Shall have the chinks.
Why then, I thank you all.
I thank you, honest gentlemen.
More than Prince of Cats, I can tell you.
He fights as you sing
    pricksong-keeps time, distance, and proportion; rests me his
    minim rest, one, two, and the third in your bosom!
Good morrow to you both.
What counterfeit did I give you?
Can you not conceive?
Was I with you there for the goose?
Out upon you!
What a man are you!
Gentlemen, can any of you tell me where I may find the young
    Romeo?
I can tell you; but young Romeo will be older when you have
    found him than he was when you sought him.
If you be he, sir, I desire some confidence with you.
Romeo, will you come to your father's?
I will follow you.
I Pray you, Sir, what saucy merchant was
    this that was so full of his ropery?
I saw no man use you at his pleasure.
If I had, my weapon
    should quickly have been out, I warrant you.
Pray you, sir, a word; and, as I told you,
    my young lady bid me enquire you out.
What she bid me say, I will
    keep to myself; but first let me tell ye, if ye should lead her
    into a fool's paradise, as they say, it were a very gross kind of
    behaviour, as they say; for the gentlewoman is young; and
    therefore, if you should deal double with her, truly it were an
    ill thing to be off'red to any gentlewoman, and very weak dealing.
I will tell her, sir, that you do protest, which, as I take
    it, is a gentlemanlike offer.
I say you shall.
Hark you, sir.
Did you ne'er hear say,
    Two may keep counsel, putting one away?
I anger
    her sometimes, and tell her that Paris is the properer man; but
    I'll warrant you, when I say so, she looks as pale as any clout
    in the versal world.
R is for the- No; I know
    it begins with some other letter; and she hath the prettiest
    sententious of it, of you and rosemary, that it would do you good
    to hear it.
Can you not stay awhile?
Do you not see that I am out of breath?
Well, you have made a simple choice; you know not how to
    choose a man.
What, have you din'd at home?
Are you so hot?
Have you got leave to go to shrift to-day?
Then hie you hence to Friar Laurence' cell;
    There stays a husband to make you a wife.
Hie you to church; I must another way,
    To fetch a ladder, by the which your love  
    Must climb a bird's nest soon when it is dark.
I am the drudge, and toil in your delight;
    But you shall bear the burthen soon at night.
Go; I'll to dinner; hie you to the cell.
Come, come with me, and we will make short work;
    For, by your leaves, you shall not stay alone
    Till Holy Church incorporate two in one.
A word with one of you.
You shall find me apt enough to that, sir, an you will give me
    occasion.
Could you not take some occasion without giving
  Tyb.
Here's my
    fiddlestick; here's that shall make you dance.
Well, peace be with you, sir.
]
    Tybalt, you ratcatcher, will you walk?
That I
    mean to make bold withal, and, as you shall use me hereafter,  
    dry-beat the rest of the eight.
Will you pluck your sword out of
    his pitcher by the ears?
I am for you.
Ask for me to-morrow, and you
    shall find me a grave man.
Why the devil
    came you between us?
I have an interest in your hate's proceeding,
    My blood for your rude brawls doth lie a-bleeding;
    But I'll amerce you with so strong a fine
    That you shall all repent the loss of mine.
Gallop apace, you fiery-footed steeds,
    Towards Phoebus' lodging!
Such a wagoner
    As Phaeton would whip you to the West
    And bring in cloudy night immediately.
Will you speak well of him that kill'd your cousin?
Your tributary drops belong to woe,
    Which you, mistaking, offer up to joy.
Will you go to them?
I will bring you thither.
Poor ropes, you are beguil'd,
    Both you and I, for Romeo is exil'd.
He made you for a highway to my bed;
    But I, a maid, die maiden-widowed.
I'll find Romeo
    To comfort you.
Whence come you?
[within] Let me come in, and you shall know my errand.
Stand, an you be a man.
Why should you fall into so deep an O?
My lord, I'll tell my lady you will come.
Here is a ring she bid me give you, sir.
Hie you, make haste, for it grows very late.
I'll find out your man,
    And he shall signify from time to time
    Every good hap to you that chances here.
Look you, she lov'd her kinsman Tybalt dearly,
    And so did I.
I promise you, but for your company,
    I would have been abed an hour ago.
Wife, go you to her ere you go to bed;
    Acquaint her here of my son Paris' love
    And bid her (mark you me?
Will you be ready?
Do you like this haste?
We'll keep no great ado- a friend or two;
    For hark you, Tybalt being slain so late,
    It may be thought we held him carelessly,
    Being our kinsman, if we revel much.
But what say you to Thursday?
Well, get you gone.
Go you to Juliet ere you go to bed;
    Prepare her, wife, against this wedding day.
And trust me, love, in my eye so do you.
are you up?
So shall you feel the loss, but not the friend
    Which you weep for.
Madam, if you could find out but a man
    To bear a poison, I would temper it;
    That Romeo should, upon receipt thereof,
    Soon sleep in quiet.
I pray you tell my lord and father, madam,
    I will not marry yet; and when I do, I swear
    It shall be Romeo, whom you know I hate,
    Rather than Paris.
Have you delivered to her our decree?
Ay, sir; but she will none, she gives you thanks.
take me with you, take me with you, wife.
Not proud you have, but thankful that you have.
'Proud'- and 'I thank you'- and 'I thank you not'-
    And yet 'not proud'?
Mistress minion you,
    Thank me no thankings, nor proud me no prouds,
    But fettle your fine joints 'gainst Thursday next
    To go with Paris to Saint Peter's Church,
    Or I will drag thee on a hurdle thither.
Out, you green-sickness carrion I out, you baggage!
what, are you mad?
Good father, I beseech you on my knees,
    Hear me with patience but to speak a word.
Peace, you mumbling fool!
Day, night, late, early,  
    At home, abroad, alone, in company,
    Waking or sleeping, still my care hath been
    To have her match'd; and having now provided
    A gentleman of princely parentage,
    Of fair demesnes, youthful, and nobly train'd,
    Stuff'd, as they say, with honourable parts,
    Proportion'd as one's thought would wish a man-
    And then to have a wretched puling fool,
    A whining mammet, in her fortune's tender,
    To answer 'I'll not wed, I cannot love;
    I am too young, I pray you pardon me'!
But, an you will not wed, I'll pardon you.
Graze where you will, you shall not house with me.
Thursday is near; lay hand on heart, advise:
    An you be mine, I'll give you to my friend;
    An you be not, hang, beg, starve, die in the streets,
    For, by my soul, I'll ne'er acknowledge thee,
    Nor what is mine shall never do thee good.
Bethink you.
Delay this marriage for a month, a week;
    Or if you do not, make the bridal bed
    In that dim monument where Tybalt lies.
Romeo is banish'd; and all the world to nothing
    That he dares ne'er come back to challenge you;  
    Or if he do, it needs must be by stealth.
Then, since the case so stands as now it doth,
    I think it best you married with the County.
Beshrew my very heart,
    I think you are happy in this second match,
    For it excels your first; or if it did not,
    Your first is dead- or 'twere as good he were
    As living here and you no use of him.
You say you do not know the lady's mind.
Now do you know the reason of this haste.
Come you to make confession to this father?
To answer that, I should confess to you.
Do not deny to him that you love me.
I will confess to you that I love him.
So will ye, I am sure, that you love me.
Are you at leisure, holy father, now,
    Or shall I come to you at evening mass
  Friar.
Get you gone, be strong and prosperous
    In this resolve.
Where have you been gadding?
Where I have learnt me to repent the sin
    Of disobedient opposition
    To you and your behests, and am enjoin'd
    By holy Laurence to fall prostrate here
    To beg your pardon.
Pardon, I beseech you!
Henceforward I am ever rul'd by you.
Nurse, will you go with me into my closet
    To help me sort such needful ornaments
    As you think fit to furnish me to-morrow?
What, are you busy, ho?
Need you my help?
So please you, let me now be left alone,
    And let the nurse this night sit up with you;
    For I am sure you have your hands full all
    In this so sudden business.
Go, you cot-quean, go,
    Get you to bed!
Faith, you'll be sick to-morrow
    For this night's watching.
Ay, you have been a mouse-hunt in your time;
    But I will watch you from such watching now.
Fie, you slug-abed!
Sleep for a week; for the next night, I warrant,
    The County Paris hath set up his rest
    That you shall rest but little.
Ay, let the County take you in your bed!
He'll fright you up, i' faith.
I must needs wake you.
Your part in her you could not keep from death,
    But heaven keeps his part in eternal life.
The most you sought was her promotion,
    For 'twas your heaven she should be advanc'd;
    And weep ye now, seeing she is advanc'd
    Above the clouds, as high as heaven itself?
O, in this love, you love your child so ill
    That you run mad, seeing that she is well.
Sir, go you in; and, madam, go with him;
    And go, Sir Paris.
The heavens do low'r upon you for some ill;
    Move them no more by crossing their high will.
For well you know this is a pitiful case.
O, an you will have me live, play 'Heart's ease.
I will then give it you soundly.
What will you give us?
I will give you the
     minstrel.
Then will I give you the serving-creature.
I'll re you, I'll fa you.
Do you note
    me?
An you re us and fa us, you note us.
Pray you put up your dagger, and put out your wit.
Then have at you with my wit!
I will dry-beat you with an iron
    wit, and put up my iron dagger.
What say you, Simon Catling?
What say you, James Soundpost?
O, I cry you mercy!
you are the singer.
I will say for you.
I saw her laid low in her kindred's vault
    And presently took post to tell it you.
O, pardon me for bringing these ill news,
    Since you did leave it for my office, sir.
Then I defy you, stars!
I do beseech you, sir, have patience.
Put this in any liquid thing you will
    And drink it off, and if you had the strength
    Of twenty men, it would dispatch you straight.
I will be gone, sir, and not trouble you.
and, lips, O you
    The doors of breath, seal with a righteous kiss
    A dateless bargain to engrossing death!
Here's one, a friend, and one that knows you well.
Bliss be upon you!
It doth so, holy sir; and there's my master,
    One that you love.
Go, some of you; whoe'er you find attach.
Seal up the mouth of outrage for a while,
    Till we can clear these ambiguities  
    And know their spring, their head, their true descent;
    And then will I be general of your woes
    And lead you even to death.
And I, for winking at you, discords too,
    Have lost a brace of kinsmen.
I'll pheeze you, in faith.
A pair of stocks, you rogue!
You will not pay for the glasses you have burst?
What think you, if he were convey'd to bed,
    Wrapp'd in sweet clothes, rings put upon his fingers,
    A most delicious banquet by his bed,
    And brave attendants near him when he wakes,
    Would not the beggar then forget himself?
My lord, I warrant you we will play our part
    As he shall think by our true diligence
    He is no less than what we say he is.
Enter PLAYERS

    Now, fellows, you are welcome.
Do you intend to stay with me to-night?
This fellow I remember
    Since once he play'd a farmer's eldest son;
    'Twas where you woo'd the gentlewoman so well.
Well, you are come to me in happy time,
    The rather for I have some sport in hand
    Wherein your cunning can assist me much.
There is a lord will hear you play to-night;
    But I am doubtful of your modesties,
    Lest, over-eying of his odd behaviour,
    For yet his honour never heard a play,
    You break into some merry passion
    And so offend him; for I tell you, sirs,
    If you should smile, he grows impatient.
Exit one with the PLAYERS  
    Sirrah, go you to Bartholomew my page,
    And see him dress'd in all suits like a lady;
    That done, conduct him to the drunkard's chamber,
    And call him 'madam,' do him obeisance.
' I
    ne'er drank sack in my life; and if you give me any conserves,
    give me conserves of beef.
What, would you make me mad?
O, that once more you knew but what you are!
These fifteen years you have been in a dream;
    Or, when you wak'd, so wak'd as if you slept.
O, yes, my lord, but very idle words;
    For though you lay here in this goodly chamber,
    Yet would you say ye were beaten out of door;
    And rail upon the hostess of the house,
    And say you would present her at the leet,
    Because she brought stone jugs and no seal'd quarts.
Sometimes you would call out for Cicely Hacket.
Why, sir, you know no house nor no such maid,
    Nor no such men as you have reckon'd up,
    As Stephen Sly, and old John Naps of Greece,
    And Peter Turph, and Henry Pimpernell;
    And twenty more such names and men as these,
    Which never were, nor no man ever saw.
Are you my wife, and will not call me husband?
Exeunt SERVANTS
    Madam, undress you, and come now to bed.
Thrice noble lord, let me entreat of you
    To pardon me yet for a night or two;
    Or, if not so, until the sun be set.
Therefore they thought it good you hear a play
    And frame your mind to mirth and merriment,
    Which bars a thousand harms and lengthens life.
Mi perdonato, gentle master mine;
    I am in all affected as yourself;
    Glad that you thus continue your resolve
    To suck the sweets of sweet philosophy.
Balk logic with acquaintance that you have,
    And practise rhetoric in your common talk;
    Music and poesy use to quicken you;
    The mathematics and the metaphysics,  
    Fall to them as you find your stomach serves you.
No profit grows where is no pleasure ta'en;
    In brief, sir, study what you most affect.
Gentlemen, importune me no farther,
    For how I firmly am resolv'd you know;
    That is, not to bestow my youngest daughter
    Before I have a husband for the elder.
If either of you both love Katherina,  
    Because I know you well and love you well,
    Leave shall you have to court her at your pleasure.
There, there, Hortensio, will you any wife?
[To BAPTISTA]  I pray you, sir, is it your will
    To make a stale of me amongst these mates?
How mean you that?
No mates for you,
    Unless you were of gentler, milder mould.
I' faith, sir, you shall never need to fear;
    Iwis it is not halfway to her heart;
    But if it were, doubt not her care should be
    To comb your noddle with a three-legg'd stool,
    And paint your face, and use you like a fool.
Gentlemen, that I may soon make good
    What I have said- Bianca, get you in;
    And let it not displease thee, good Bianca,
    For I will love thee ne'er the less, my girl.
Sister, content you in my discontent.
Signior Baptista, will you be so strange?
Why will you mew her up,
    Signior Baptista, for this fiend of hell,
    And make her bear the penance of her tongue?
If you, Hortensio,
    Or, Signior Gremio, you, know any such,
    Prefer them hither; for to cunning men
    I will be very kind, and liberal
    To mine own children in good bringing-up;
    And so, farewell.
Katherina, you may stay;
    For I have more to commune with Bianca.
You may go to the devil's dam; your gifts are so good
    here's none will hold you.
Faith, as you say, there's small choice in rotten
    apples.
How say you,
    Signior Gremio?
Master, it is no time to chide you now;
    Affection is not rated from the heart;
    If love have touch'd you, nought remains but so:
    'Redime te captum quam queas minimo.
Master, you look'd so longly on the maid.
Perhaps you mark'd not what's the pith of all.
Saw you no more?
Mark'd you not how her sister
    Began to scold and raise up such a storm
    That mortal ears might hardly endure the din?
If you love the maid,
    Bend thoughts and wits to achieve her.
So had you need.
Sirrah, where have you been?
where are you?
Or you stol'n his?
Wait you on him, I charge you, as becomes,
    While I make way from hence to save my life.
My lord, you nod; you do not mind the play.
Knock you here, sir?
Why, sir, what am I, sir, that I
    should knock you here, sir?
I should knock you first,
    And then I know after who comes by the worst.
Faith, sirrah, an you'll not knock I'll ring it;
    I'll try how you can sol-fa, and sing it.
Now knock when I bid you, sirrah villain!
How do you all at Verona?
Signior Hortensio, come you to part the fray?
If this
    be not a lawful cause for me to leave his service- look you, sir:
    he bid me knock him and rap him soundly, sir.
Spake you not these words
    plain: 'Sirrah knock me here, rap me here, knock me well, and
    knock me soundly'?
And come you now with 'knocking at the gate'?
Sirrah, be gone, or talk not, I advise you.
Petruchio, patience; I am Grumio's pledge;
    Why, this's a heavy chance 'twixt him and you,
    Your ancient, trusty, pleasant servant Grumio.
And tell me now, sweet friend, what happy gale
    Blows you to Padua here from old Verona?
Nay, look you, sir, he tells you flatly what his mind is.
I will not sleep, Hortensio, till I see her;
    And therefore let me be thus bold with you
    To give you over at this first encounter,
    Unless you will accompany me thither.
I pray you, sir, let him go while the humour lasts.
I'll tell you what, sir: an she stand
    him but a little, he will throw a figure in her face, and so
    disfigure her with it that she shall have no more eyes to see
    withal than a cat.
Master, master, look about
    you.
Hark you, sir; I'll have them very fairly bound-
    All books of love, see that at any hand;
    And see you read no other lectures to her.
What will you read to her?
Whate'er I read to her, I'll plead for you
    As for my patron, stand you so assur'd,
    As firmly as yourself were still in place;
    Yea, and perhaps with more successful words  
    Than you, unless you were a scholar, sir.
[Coming forward]
    God save you, Signior Gremio!
And you are well met, Signior Hortensio.
Trow you whither I am going?
Listen to me, and if you speak me fair
    I'll tell you news indifferent good for either.
Hortensio, have you told him all her faults?
But if you have a stomach, to't a God's name;
    You shall have me assisting you in all.
But will you woo this wild-cat?
Think you a little din can daunt mine ears?
And do you tell me of a woman's tongue,
    That gives not half so great a blow to hear
    As will a chestnut in a fariner's fire?
Gentlemen, God save you!
If I may be bold,
    Tell me, I beseech you, which is the readiest way
    To the house of Signior Baptista Minola?
He that has the two fair daughters; is't he you mean?
Hark you, sir, you mean not her to-
  TRANIO.
Perhaps him and her, sir; what have you to do?
Sir, a word ere you go.
Are you a suitor to the maid you talk of, yea or no?
No; if without more words you will get you hence.
Why, sir, I pray, are not the streets as free
    For me as for you?
For what reason, I beseech you?
For this reason, if you'll know,
    That she's the choice love of Signior Gremio.
If you be gentlemen,
    Do me this right- hear me with patience.
Sir, let me be so bold as ask you,
    Did you yet ever see Baptista's daughter?
Sir, understand you this of me, in sooth:
    The youngest daughter, whom you hearken for,
    Her father keeps from all access of suitors,
    And will not promise her to any man
    Until the elder sister first be wed.
If it be so, sir, that you are the man
    Must stead us all, and me amongst the rest;
    And if you break the ice, and do this feat,
    Achieve the elder, set the younger free
    For our access- whose hap shall be to have her  
    Will not so graceless be to be ingrate.
Sir, you say well, and well you do conceive;
    And since you do profess to be a suitor,
    You must, as we do, gratify this gentleman,
    To whom we all rest generally beholding.
Good sister, wrong me not, nor wrong yourself,
    To make a bondmaid and a slave of me-
    That I disdain; but for these other gawds,
    Unbind my hands, I'll pull them off myself,
    Yea, all my raiment, to my petticoat;
    Or what you will command me will I do,
    So well I know my duty to my elders.
If you affect him, sister, here I swear
    I'll plead for you myself but you shall have him.
O then, belike, you fancy riches more:
    You will have Gremio to keep you fair.
Is it for him you do envy me so?
Nay, then you jest; and now I well perceive
    You have but jested with me all this while.
What, will you not suffer me?
God save you, gentlemen!
And you, good sir!
Pray, have you not a daughter
    Call'd Katherina, fair and virtuous?
And, for an entrance to my entertainment,
    I do present you with a man of mine,
                                          [Presenting HORTENSIO]
    Cunning in music and the mathematics,
    To instruct her fully in those sciences,
    Whereof I know she is not ignorant.
Accept of him, or else you do me wrong-
    His name is Licio, born in Mantua.
I see you do not mean to part with her;
    Or else you like not of my company.
Whence are you, sir?
I know him well; you are welcome for his sake.
you are marvellous forward.
I doubt it not, sir; but you will curse your wooing.
To
    express the like kindness, myself, that have been more kindly
    beholding to you than any, freely give unto you this young
    scholar  [Presenting LUCENTIO]  that hath been long studying at
    Rheims; as cunning in Greek, Latin, and other languages, as the
    other in music and mathematics.
[To TRANIO]  But, gentle sir, methinks you walk like a stranger.
If you accept them, then their worth is great.
Take you the lute, and you the set of books;
    You shall go see your pupils presently.
You are passing welcome,
    And so I pray you all to think yourselves.
Why, that is nothing; for I tell you, father,
    I am as peremptory as she proud-minded;
    And where two raging fires meet together,
    They do consume the thing that feeds their fury.
For fear, I promise you, if I look pale.
I did but tell her she mistook her frets,
    And bow'd her hand to teach her fingering,
    When, with a most impatient devilish spirit,
    'Frets, call you these?
Signior Petruchio, will you go with us,
    Or shall I send my daughter Kate to you?
I pray you do.
Well have you heard, but something hard of hearing:
    They call me Katherine that do talk of me.
You lie, in faith, for you are call'd plain Kate,
    And bonny Kate, and sometimes Kate the curst;
    But, Kate, the prettiest Kate in Christendom,
    Kate of Kate Hall, my super-dainty Kate,
    For dainties are all Kates, and therefore, Kate,
    Take this of me, Kate of my consolation-
    Hearing thy mildness prais'd in every town,
    Thy virtues spoke of, and thy beauty sounded,  
    Yet not so deeply as to thee belongs,
    Myself am mov'd to woo thee for my wife.
Let him that mov'd you hither
    Remove you hence.
I knew you at the first
    You were a moveable.
Asses are made to bear, and so are you.
Women are made to bear, and so are you.
No such jade as you, if me you mean.
Too light for such a swain as you to catch;
    And yet as heavy as my weight should be.
Come, come, you wasp; i' faith, you are too angry.
Yours, if you talk of tales; and so farewell.
I swear I'll cuff you, if you strike again.
So may you lose your arms.
If you strike me, you are no gentleman;
    And if no gentleman, why then no arms.
No cock of mine: you crow too like a craven.
Nay, come, Kate, come; you must not look so sour.
What, you mean my face?
Now, by Saint George, I am too young for you.
Yet you are wither'd.
Nay, hear you, Kate- in sooth, you scape not so.
I chafe you, if I tarry; let me go.
No, not a whit; I find you passing gentle.
'Twas told me you were rough, and coy, and sullen,
    And now I find report a very liar;
    For thou art pleasant, gamesome, passing courteous,
    But slow in speech, yet sweet as springtime flowers.
Where did you study all this goodly speech?
Yes, keep you warm.
And therefore, setting all this chat aside,  
    Thus in plain terms: your father hath consented
    That you shall be my wife your dowry greed on;
    And will you, nill you, I will marry you.
Now, Kate, I am a husband for your turn;
    For, by this light, whereby I see thy beauty,
    Thy beauty that doth make me like thee well,
    Thou must be married to no man but me;
    For I am he am born to tame you, Kate,
    And bring you from a wild Kate to a Kate
    Conformable as other household Kates.
Now, Signior Petruchio, how speed you with my daughter?
Call you me daughter?
Now I promise you  
    You have show'd a tender fatherly regard
    To wish me wed to one half lunatic,
    A mad-cap ruffian and a swearing Jack,
    That thinks with oaths to face the matter out.
I choose her for myself;
    If she and I be pleas'd, what's that to you?
I tell you 'tis incredible to believe.
O, you are novices!
God send you joy, Petruchio!
'Twas a commodity lay fretting by you;
    'Twill bring you gain, or perish on the seas.
Content you, gentlemen; I will compound this strife.
Say, Signior Gremio, what can you assure her?
First, as you know, my house within the city
    Is richly furnished with plate and gold,
    Basins and ewers to lave her dainty hands;
    My hangings all of Tyrian tapestry;
    In ivory coffers I have stuff'd my crowns;
    In cypress chests my arras counterpoints,
    Costly apparel, tents, and canopies,
    Fine linen, Turkey cushions boss'd with pearl,
    Valance of Venice gold in needle-work;
    Pewter and brass, and all things that belongs
    To house or housekeeping.
What, have I pinch'd you, Signior Gremio?
What, have I chok'd you with an argosy?
Nay, I have off'red all; I have no more;
    And she can have no more than all I have;
    If you like me, she shall have me and mine.
Else, you must pardon me;
    If you should die before him, where's her dower?
Well, gentlemen,
    I am thus resolv'd: on Sunday next you know
    My daughter Katherine is to be married;
    Now, on the Sunday following shall Bianca
    Be bride to you, if you make this assurance;
    If not, to Signior Gremio.
And so I take my leave, and thank you both.
Fiddler, forbear; you grow too forward, sir.
Have you so soon forgot the entertainment
    Her sister Katherine welcome'd you withal?
Why, gentlemen, you do me double wrong
    To strive for that which resteth in my choice.
And to cut off all strife: here sit we down;
    Take you your instrument, play you the whiles!
His lecture will be done ere you have tun'd.
'Hic ibat' as I told you before- 'Simois' I am Lucentio-
    'hic est' son unto Vincentio of Pisa- 'Sigeia tellus' disguised
    thus to get your love- 'Hic steterat' and that Lucentio that
    comes a-wooing- 'Priami' is my man Tranio- 'regia' bearing my
    port- 'celsa senis' that we might beguile the old pantaloon.
Now let me see if I can construe it: 'Hic ibat Simois' I
    know you not- 'hic est Sigeia tellus' I trust you not- 'Hic
    steterat Priami' take heed he hear us not- 'regia' presume not-
   'celsa senis' despair not.
Pedascule, I'll watch you better yet.
I must believe my master; else, I promise you,
    I should be arguing still upon that doubt;
    But let it rest.
Now, Licio, to you.
Good master, take it not unkindly, pray,
    That I have been thus pleasant with you both.
Are you so formal, sir?
Madam, before you touch the instrument
    To learn the order of my fingering,
    I must begin with rudiments of art,
    To teach you gamut in a briefer sort,
    More pleasant, pithy, and effectual,
    Than hath been taught by any of my trade;
    And there it is in writing fairly drawn.
'
    Call you this gamut?
Mistress, your father prays you leave your books
    And help to dress your sister's chamber up.
I told you, I, he was a frantic fool,
    Hiding his bitter jests in blunt behaviour;
    And, to be noted for a merry man,
    He'll woo a thousand, 'point the day of marriage,
    Make friends invited, and proclaim the banns;  
    Yet never means to wed where he hath woo'd.
News, and such old news as you never heard of!
When he stands where I am and sees you there.
Nay, by Saint Jamy,
             I hold you a penny,
             A horse and a man
             Is more than one,
             And yet not many.
And yet you halt not.
Not so well apparell'd
    As I wish you were.
Gentles, methinks you frown;
    And wherefore gaze this goodly company
    As if they saw some wondrous monument,
    Some comet or unusual prodigy?
Why, sir, you know this is your wedding-day.
First were we sad, fearing you would not come;
    Now sadder, that you come so unprovided.
And tell us what occasion of import
    Hath all so long detain'd you from your wife,
    And sent you hither so unlike yourself?
Tedious it were to tell, and harsh to hear;
    Sufficeth I am come to keep my word,
    Though in some part enforced to digress,
    Which at more leisure I will so excuse
    As you shall well be satisfied withal.
But thus, I trust, you will not marry her.
But what a fool am I to chat with you,
    When I should bid good-morrow to my bride
    And seal the title with a lovely kiss!
So shall you quietly enjoy your hope
    And marry sweet Bianca with consent.
Re-enter GREMIO

    Signior Gremio, came you from the church?
A bridegroom, say you?
I'll tell you, Sir Lucentio: when the priest
    Should ask if Katherine should be his wife,
    'Ay, by gogs-wouns' quoth he, and swore so loud
    That, all amaz'd, the priest let fall the book;
    And as he stoop'd again to take it up,
    This mad-brain'd bridegroom took him such a cuff
    That down fell priest and book, and book and priest.
Gentlemen and friends, I thank you for your pains.
I know you think to dine with me to-day,
    And have prepar'd great store of wedding cheer
    But so it is- my haste doth call me hence,  
    And therefore here I mean to take my leave.
Is't possible you will away to-night?
Make it no wonder; if you knew my business,
    You would entreat me rather go than stay.
And, honest company, I thank you all
    That have beheld me give away myself
    To this most patient, sweet, and virtuous wife.
For I must hence; and farewell to you all.
Let us entreat you stay till after dinner.
Let me entreat you.
Let me entreat you.
Are you content to stay?
I am content you shall entreat me stay;
    But yet not stay, entreat me how you can.
Now, if you love me, stay.
'Tis like you'll prove a jolly surly groom
    That take it on you at the first so roundly.
Obey the bride, you that attend on her;
    Go to the feast, revel and domineer,  
    Carouse full measure to her maidenhead;
    Be mad and merry, or go hang yourselves.
Lucentio, you shall supply the bridegroom's place;
    And let Bianca take her sister's room.
Away, you three-inch fool!
Come, you are so full of cony-catching!
Ay, and that thou and the proudest of you all shall find
    when he comes home.
Do you hear, ho?
Welcome, you!
- how now, you!
- what, you!
- fellow, you!
you whoreson malt-horse drudge!
Nathaniel's coat, sir, was not fully made,  
    And Gabriel's pumps were all unpink'd i' th' heel;
    There was no link to colour Peter's hat,
    And Walter's dagger was not come from sheathing;
    There were none fine but Adam, Ralph, and Gregory;
    The rest were ragged, old, and beggarly;
    Yet, as they are, here are they come to meet you.
Off with my boots, you rogues!
you villains, when?
[Sings]  It was the friar of orders grey,  
             As he forth walked on his way-

    Out, you rogue!
you pluck my foot awry;
    Take that, and mend the plucking off the other.
Sirrah, get you hence,
    And bid my cousin Ferdinand come hither:
                                                 Exit SERVINGMAN
    One, Kate, that you must kiss and be acquainted with.
will you let it fall?
Patience, I pray you; 'twas a fault unwilling.
Come, Kate, sit down; I know you have a stomach.
Will you give thanks, sweet Kate, or else shall I?
How durst you villains bring it from the dresser
    And serve it thus to me that love it not?
There, take it to you, trenchers, cups, and all;
                                [Throws the meat, etc.
What, do you grumble?
I'll be with you straight.
I pray you, husband, be not so disquiet;
    The meat was well, if you were so contented.
I tell you, sir, she bears me fair in hand.
Sir, to satisfy you in what I have said,
    Stand by and mark the manner of his teaching.
Now, mistress, profit you in what you read?
What, master, read you, First resolve me that.
And may you prove, sir, master of your art!
While you, sweet dear, prove mistress of my heart.
Signior Hortensio, I have often heard
    Of your entire affection to Bianca;
    And since mine eyes are witness of her lightness,
    I will with you, if you be so contented,
    Forswear Bianca and her love for ever.
Mistress Bianca, bless you with such grace
    As 'longeth to a lover's blessed case!
Nay, I have ta'en you napping, gentle love,
    And have forsworn you with Hortensio.
Tranio, you jest; but have you both forsworn me?
God save you, sir!
And you, sir; you are welcome.
Travel you far on, or are you at the farthest?
Know you not the cause?
'Tis marvel- but that you are but newly come,
    You might have heard it else proclaim'd about.
Well, sir, to do you courtesy,
    This will I do, and this I will advise you-
    First, tell me, have you ever been at Pisa?
Among them know you one Vincentio?
He is my father, sir; and, sooth to say,
    In count'nance somewhat doth resemble you.
To save your life in this extremity,
    This favour will I do you for his sake;
    And think it not the worst of all your fortunes
    That you are like to Sir Vincentio.
His name and credit shall you undertake,
    And in my house you shall be friendly lodg'd;
    Look that you take upon you as you should.
So shall you stay
    Till you have done your business in the city.
O, sir, I do; and will repute you ever
    The patron of my life and liberty.
This, by the way, I let you understand:
    My father is here look'd for every day
    To pass assurance of a dow'r in marriage
    'Twixt me and one Baptista's daughter here.
In all these circumstances I'll instruct you.
Go with me to clothe you as becomes you.
What say you to a neat's foot?
How say you to a fat tripe finely broil'd?
What say you to a piece of beef and mustard?
Nay, then I will not; you shall have the mustard,
    Or else you get no beef of Grumio.
Sorrow on thee and all the pack of you
    That triumph thus upon my misery!
I pray you, let it stand.
The poorest service is repaid with thanks;
    And so shall mine, before you touch the meat.
I thank you, sir.
you are to blame.
Come, Mistress Kate, I'll bear you company.
Enter HABERDASHER

    What news with you, sir?
When you are gentle, you shall have one too,
    And not till then.
Your betters have endur'd me say my mind,
    And if you cannot, best you stop your ears.
Marry, and did; but if you be rememb'red,
    I did not bid you mar it to the time.
Go, hop me over every kennel home,
    For you shall hop without my custom, sir.
I never saw a better fashion'd gown,
    More quaint, more pleasing, nor more commendable;
    Belike you mean to make a puppet of me.
But how did you desire it should be made?
But did you not request to have it cut?
O, sir, the conceit is deeper than you think for.
I dare assure you, sir, 'tis almost two,
    And 'twill be supper-time ere you come there.
Sir, this is the house; please it you that I call?
I warrant you.
Fear you not him.
Sirrah Biondello,
    Now do your duty throughly, I advise you.
I told him that your father was at Venice,
    And that you look'd for him this day in Padua.
Enter BAPTISTA, and LUCENTIO as CAMBIO

    Signior Baptista, you are happily met.
[To To the PEDANT] Sir, this is the gentleman I told you of;
    I pray you stand good father to me now;
    Give me Bianca for my patrimony.
Sir, by your leave: having come to Padua
    To gather in some debts, my son Lucentio
    Made me acquainted with a weighty cause
    Of love between your daughter and himself;
    And- for the good report I hear of you,
    And for the love he beareth to your daughter,
    And she to him- to stay him not too long,  
    I am content, in a good father's care,
    To have him match'd; and, if you please to like
    No worse than I, upon some agreement
    Me shall you find ready and willing
    With one consent to have her so bestow'd;
    For curious I cannot be with you,
    Signior Baptista, of whom I hear so well.
Right true it is your son Lucentio here
    Doth love my daughter, and she loveth him,
    Or both dissemble deeply their affections;
    And therefore, if you say no more than this,
    That like a father you will deal with him,
    And pass my daughter a sufficient dower,
    The match is made, and all is done-
    Your son shall have my daughter with consent.
I thank you, sir.
Where then do you know best
    We be affied, and such assurance ta'en
    As shall with either part's agreement stand?
Not in my house, Lucentio, for you know
    Pitchers have ears, and I have many servants;
    Besides, old Gremio is heark'ning still,
    And happily we might be interrupted.
Then at my lodging, an it like you.
Cambio, hie you home,
    And bid Bianca make her ready straight;
    And, if you will, tell what hath happened-
    Lucentio's father is arriv'd in Padua,
    And how she's like to be Lucentio's wife.
I follow you.
You saw my master wink and laugh upon you?
His daughter is to be brought by you to the supper.
If this be not that you look for, I have more to say,
    But bid Bianca farewell for ever and a day.
I knew a wench married in an afternoon
    as she went to the garden for parsley to stuff a rabbit; and so
    may you, sir; and so adieu, sir.
My master hath appointed me to
    go to Saint Luke's to bid the priest be ready to come against you
    come with your appendix.
Forward, I pray, since we have come so far,
    And be it moon, or sun, or what you please;
    And if you please to call it a rush-candle,
    Henceforth I vow it shall be so for me.
Nay, then you lie; it is the blessed sun.
Then, God be bless'd, it is the blessed sun;
    But sun it is not, when you say it is not;
    And the moon changes even as your mind.
What you will have it nam'd, even that it is,
    And so it shall be so for Katherine.
Fair sir, and you my merry mistress,
    That with your strange encounter much amaz'd me,  
    My name is call'd Vincentio, my dwelling Pisa,
    And bound I am to Padua, there to visit
    A son of mine, which long I have not seen.
But is this true; or is it else your pleasure,
    Like pleasant travellers, to break a jest
    Upon the company you overtake?
Sir, here's the door; this is Lucentio's house;
    My father's bears more toward the market-place;
    Thither must I, and here I leave you, sir.
You shall not choose but drink before you go;
    I think I shall command your welcome here,  
    And by all likelihood some cheer is toward.
They're busy within; you were best knock louder.
Nay, I told you your son was well beloved in Padua.
Do
    you hear, sir?
To leave frivolous circumstances, I pray you tell
    Signior Lucentio that his father is come from Pisa, and is here
    at the door to speak with him.
Why, this is flat knavery to take upon you another man's name.
Come hither, you rogue.
What, have you forgot me?
Forgot you!
I could not forget you, for I never
    saw you before in all my life.
What, you notorious villain, didst thou never see thy
    master's father, Vincentio?
Sir, what are you that offer to beat my servant?
Nay, what are you, sir?
Sir, you seem a sober ancient gentleman by your habit, but
    your words show you a madman.
Why, sir, what 'cerns it you if I
    wear pearl and gold?
You mistake, sir; you mistake, sir.
Pray, what do you  
    think is his name?
Lay hold on
    him, I charge you, in the Duke's name.
Father Baptista, I charge you
    see that he be forthcoming.
Take heed, Signior Baptista, lest you be cony-catch'd in
    this business; I dare swear this is the right Vincentio.
[To LUCENTIO]  But do you hear, sir?
Have you married my
    daughter without asking my good will?
Fear not, Baptista; we will content you, go to; but I
    will in to be revenged for this villainy.
Pray you, sit down;
    For now we sit to chat as well as eat.
YOU are very sensible, and yet you miss my sense:
    I mean Hortensio is afeard of you.
Mistress, how mean you that?
'
    I pray you tell me what you meant by that.
Your husband, being troubled with a shrew,
    Measures my husband's sorrow by his woe;
    And now you know my meaning.
Right, I mean you.
And I am mean, indeed, respecting you.
Ay, mistress bride, hath that awakened you?
Nay, that you shall not; since you have begun,
    Have at you for a bitter jest or two.
I mean to shift my bush,
    And then pursue me as you draw your bow.
Here, Signior Tranio,
    This bird you aim'd at, though you hit her not;  
    Therefore a health to all that shot and miss'd.
'Tis well, sir, that you hunted for yourself;
    'Tis thought your deer does hold you at a bay.
Tranio hits you now.
Confess, confess; hath he not hit you here?
'A has a little gall'd me, I confess;
    And, as the jest did glance away from me,
    'Tis ten to one it maim'd you two outright.
Sir, my mistress sends you word
    That she is busy and she cannot come.
Pray God, sir, your wife send you not a worse.
I am afraid, sir,
    Do what you can, yours will not be entreated.
She says you have some goodly jest in hand:
    She will not come; she bids you come to her.
What is your sir, that you send for me?
Here is a wonder, if you talk of a wonder.
Katherine, that cap of yours becomes you not:
    Off with that bauble, throw it underfoot.
what a foolish duty call you this?
The more fool you for laying on my duty.
Come, come, you're mocking; we will have no telling.
Come, come, you froward and unable worins!
We three are married, but you two are sped.
[To LUCENTIO]  'Twas I won the wager, though you hit the white;  
    And being a winner, God give you good night!
Do you not hear him?
You mar our labour;
    keep your cabins; you do assist the storm.
You are
    counsellor; if you can command these elements to
    silence, and work the peace of the present, we will not
    hand a rope more.
Use your authority; if you cannot, give
    thanks you have liv'd so long, and make yourself ready
    in your cabin for the mischance of the hour, if it so
    hap.
What do you here?
Have you a mind to sink?
A pox o' your throat, you bawling, blasphemous,
    incharitable dog!
Work you, then.
Hang, cur; hang, you whoreson, insolent noisemaker;  
    we are less afraid to be drown'd than thou art.
If by your art, my dearest father, you have
    Put the wild waters in this roar, allay them.
Sir, are not you my father?
O, my heart bleeds
    To think o' th' teen that I have turn'd you to,
    Which is from my remembrance.
Please you, farther.
Alack, what trouble  
    Was I then to you!
Heavens thank you for't!
And now, I pray you,
      sir,
    For still 'tis beating in my mind, your reason
    For raising this sea-storm?
As wicked dew as e'er my mother brush'd
    With raven's feather from unwholesome fen
    Drop on you both!
A south-west blow on ye
    And blister you all o'er!
All the charms
    Of Sycorax, toads, beetles, bats, light on you!
For I am all the subjects that you have,
    Which first was mine own king; and here you sty me
    In this hard rock, whiles you do keep from me  
    The rest o' th' island.
The red plague rid you
    For learning me your language!
Come unto these yellow sands,
              And then take hands;
            Curtsied when you have and kiss'd,
              The wild waves whist,
            Foot it featly here and there,
            And, sweet sprites, the burden bear.
Vouchsafe my pray'r
    May know if you remain upon this island;
    And that you will some good instruction give  
    How I may bear me here.
My prime request,
    Which I do last pronounce, is, O you wonder!
If you be maid or no?
[To FERDINAND]  A word, good
    sir;
    I fear you have done yourself some wrong; a word.
O, if a virgin,
    And your affection not gone forth, I'll make you
    The Queen of Naples.
Speak not you for him; he's a traitor.
Beseech you, father!
Beseech you, sir, be merry; you have cause,
    So have we all, of joy; for our escape
    Is much beyond our loss.
Dolour comes to him, indeed; you have spoken
    truer than you purpos'd.
You have taken it wiselier than I meant you
    should.
So, you're paid.
Good Lord, how you take it!
'Widow Dido' said you?
I assure you, Carthage.
Bate, I beseech you, widow Dido.
Sir, you may thank yourself for this great loss,
    That would not bless our Europe with your daughter,
    But rather lose her to an African;
    Where she, at least, is banish'd from your eye,
    Who hath cause to wet the grief on't.
My lord Sebastian,
    The truth you speak doth lack some gentleness,
    And time to speak it in; you rub the sore,
    When you should bring the plaster.
It is foul weather in us all, good sir,
    When you are cloudy.
And-do you mark me, sir?
'Twas you we laugh'd at.
Who in this kind of merry fooling am nothing to
    you; so you may continue, and laugh at nothing still.
You are gentlemen of brave mettle; you would
    lift the moon out of her sphere, if she would continue
    in it five weeks without changing.
No, I warrant you; I will not adventure my
    discretion so weakly.
Will you laugh me asleep, for I am
    very heavy?
Please you, sir,
    Do not omit the heavy offer of it:
    It seldom visits sorrow; when it doth,
    It is a comforter.
We two, my lord,
    Will guard your person while you take your rest,
    And watch your safety.
Thank you-wondrous heavy!
Do you not hear me speak?
I am more serious than my custom; you
    Must be so too, if heed me; which to do
    Trebles thee o'er.
I'll teach you how to flow.
O,
    If you but knew how you the purpose cherish,
    Whiles thus you mock it!
O, out of that 'no hope'
    What great hope have you!
Will you grant with me
    That Ferdinand is drown'd?
How say you?
O, that you bore
    The mind that I do!
Do you understand me?
Here lies your brother,
    No better than the earth he lies upon,
    If he were that which now he's like-that's dead;
    Whom I with this obedient steel, three inches of it,
    Can lay to bed for ever; whiles you, doing thus,
    To the perpetual wink for aye might put
    This ancient morsel, this Sir Prudence, who
    Should not upbraid our course.
Draw together;
    And when I rear my hand, do you the like,
    To fall it on Gonzalo.
My master through his art foresees the danger
    That you, his friend, are in; and sends me forth-
    For else his project dies-to keep them living.
[Sings in GONZALO'S ear]
    While you here do snoring lie,
    Open-ey'd conspiracy
    His time doth take.
If of life you keep a care,
    Shake off slumber, and beware.
-Why are you drawn?
Whiles we stood here securing your repose,
    Even now, we heard a hollow burst of bellowing
    Like bulls, or rather lions; did't not wake you?
Heard you this, Gonzalo?
Upon mine honour, sir, I heard a humming,
    And that a strange one too, which did awake me;
    I shak'd you, sir, and cried; as mine eyes open'd,
    I saw their weapons drawn-there was a noise,
    That's verily.
Do you
    put tricks upon 's with savages and men of Ind?
Come on your ways; open your mouth; here is
    that which will give language to you, cat.
Open your
    mouth; this will shake your shaking, I can tell you, and
    that soundly; you cannot tell who's your friend.
Alas, now; pray you,
    Work not so hard; I would the lightning had
    Burnt up those logs that you are enjoin'd to pile.
Pray, set it down and rest you; when this burns,
    'Twill weep for having wearied you.
If you'll sit down,
    I'll bear your logs the while; pray give me that;
    I'll carry it to the pile.
No, precious creature;
    I had rather crack my sinews, break my back,
    Than you should such dishonour undergo,
    While I sit lazy by.
It would become me  
    As well as it does you; and I should do it
    With much more ease; for my good will is to it,
    And yours it is against.
No, noble mistress; 'tis fresh morning with me
    When you are by at night.
I do beseech you,
    Chiefly that I might set it in my prayers,
    What is your name?
Full many a lady
    I have ey'd with best regard; and many a time
    Th' harmony of their tongues hath into bondage
    Brought my too diligent ear; for several virtues
    Have I lik'd several women, never any
    With so full soul, but some defect in her
    Did quarrel with the noblest grace she ow'd,  
    And put it to the foil; but you, O you,
    So perfect and so peerless, are created
    Of every creature's best!
I do not know
    One of my sex; no woman's face remember,
    Save, from my glass, mine own; nor have I seen
    More that I may call men than you, good friend,
    And my dear father.
How features are abroad,
    I am skilless of; but, by my modesty,
    The jewel in my dower, I would not wish
    Any companion in the world but you;
    Nor can imagination form a shape,
    Besides yourself, to like of.
Hear my soul speak:  
    The very instant that I saw you, did
    My heart fly to your service; there resides
    To make me slave to it; and for your sake
    Am I this patient log-man.
Do you love me?
I,
    Beyond all limit of what else i' th' world,
    Do love, prize, honour you.
Wherefore weep you?
I am your wife, if you will marry me;
    If not, I'll die your maid.
To be your fellow
    You may deny me; but I'll be your servant,
    Whether you will or no.
Your lieutenant, if you list; he's no standard.
Nor go neither; but you'll lie like dogs, and
    yet say nothing neither.
Trinculo, keep a good tongue in your head; if
    you prove a mutineer-the next tree!
Trinculo, if you trouble him any more in's tale,
    by this hand, I will supplant some of your teeth.
[Beats him]  As you like
    this, give me the lie another time.
Let us be jocund; will you troll the catch
    You taught me but while-ere?
Do not, for one repulse, forgo the purpose
    That you resolv'd t' effect.
If I should say, I saw such islanders,
    For certes these are people of the island,
    Who though they are of monstrous shape yet, note,
    Their manners are more gentle-kind than of
    Our human generation you shall find
    Many, nay, almost any.
[Aside]  Honest lord,
    Thou hast said well; for some of you there present
    Are worse than devils.
Will't please you taste of what is here?
Faith, sir, you need not fear.
You are three men of sin, whom Destiny,
    That hath to instrument this lower world
    And what is in't, the never-surfeited sea
    Hath caus'd to belch up you; and on this island
    Where man doth not inhabit-you 'mongst men
    Being most unfit to live.
I have made you mad;
    And even with such-like valour men hang and drown
    Their proper selves.
If you could hurt,
    Your swords are now too massy for your strengths
    And will not be uplifted.
But remember-
    For that's my business to you-that you three  
    From Milan did supplant good Prospero;
    Expos'd unto the sea, which hath requit it,
    Him, and his innocent child; for which foul deed
    The pow'rs, delaying, not forgetting, have
    Incens'd the seas and shores, yea, all the creatures,
    Against your peace.
Thee of thy son, Alonso,
    They have bereft; and do pronounce by me
    Ling'ring perdition, worse than any death
    Can be at once, shall step by step attend
    You and your ways; whose wraths to guard you from-
    Which here, in this most desolate isle, else falls
    Upon your heads-is nothing but heart's sorrow,
    And a clear life ensuing.
I' th' name of something holy, sir, why stand you
    In this strange stare?
I do beseech you,
    That are of suppler joints, follow them swiftly,
    And hinder them from what this ecstasy
    May now provoke them to.
Follow, I pray you.
If I have too austerely punish'd you,
    Your compensation makes amends; for
    Have given you here a third of mine own life,
    Or that for which I live; who once again
    I tender to thy hand.
But
    If thou dost break her virgin-knot before
    All sanctimonious ceremonies may  
    With full and holy rite be minist'red,
    No sweet aspersion shall the heavens let fall
    To make this contract grow; but barren hate,
    Sour-ey'd disdain, and discord, shall bestrew
    The union of your bed with weeds so loathly
    That you shall hate it both.
Therefore take heed,
    As Hymen's lamps shall light you.
Thou and thy meaner fellows your last service
    Did worthily perform; and I must use you
    In such another trick.
Before you can say 'come' and 'go,'
    And breathe twice, and cry 'so, so,'
    Each one, tripping on his toe,
    Will be here with mop and mow.
Do you love me, master?
I warrant you, sir,
    The white cold virgin snow upon my heart
    Abates the ardour of my liver.
Honour, riches, marriage-blessing,
    Long continuance, and increasing,
    Hourly joys be still upon you!
Juno sings her blessings on you.
Earth's increase, foison plenty,
    Barns and gamers never empty;
    Vines with clust'ring bunches growing,
    Plants with goodly burden bowing;
    Spring come to you at the farthest,
    In the very end of harvest!
Scarcity and want shall shun you,
    Ceres' blessing so is on you.
You do look, my son, in a mov'd sort,
    As if you were dismay'd; be cheerful, sir.
These our actors,
    As I foretold you, were all spirits, and
    Are melted into air, into thin air;
    And, like the baseless fabric of this vision,
    The cloud-capp'd towers, the gorgeous palaces,
    The solemn temples, the great globe itself,
    Yea, all which it inherit, shall dissolve,
    And, like this insubstantial pageant faded,
    Leave not a rack behind.
If you be pleas'd, retire into my cell  
    And there repose; a turn or two I'll walk
    To still my beating mind.
I told you, sir, they were red-hot with drinking;
    So full of valour that they smote the air
    For breathing in their faces; beat the ground
    For kissing of their feet; yet always bending
    Towards their project.
Pray you, tread softly, that the blind mole may not
    Hear a foot fall; we now are near his cell.
Monster, your fairy, which you say is a harmless
    fairy, has done little better than play'd the Jack with us.
Do you hear, monster?
If I should
    take a displeasure against you, look you-
  TRINCULO.
What do you mean
    To dote thus on such luggage?
Be you quiet, monster.
Now is the jerkin under the line; now,
    jerkin, you are like to lose your hair, and prove a bald
    jerkin.
Monster, lay-to your fingers; help to bear this
    away where my hogshead of wine is, or I'll turn you out
    of my kingdom.
Confin'd together
    In the same fashion as you gave in charge;
    Just as you left them; all prisoners, sir,
    In the line-grove which weather-fends your cell;
    They cannot budge till your release.
The King,
    His brother, and yours, abide all three distracted,
    And the remainder mourning over them,
    Brim full of sorrow and dismay; but chiefly
    Him you term'd, sir, 'the good old lord, Gonzalo';  
    His tears run down his beard, like winter's drops
    From eaves of reeds.
Your charm so strongly works 'em
    That if you now beheld them your affections
    Would become tender.
Ye elves of hills, brooks, standing lakes, and
    groves;
    And ye that on the sands with printless foot
    Do chase the ebbing Neptune, and do fly him
    When he comes back; you demi-puppets that
    By moonshine do the green sour ringlets make,
    Whereof the ewe not bites; and you whose pastime
    Is to make midnight mushrooms, that rejoice
    To hear the solemn curfew; by whose aid-
    Weak masters though ye be-I have be-dimm'd
    The noontide sun, call'd forth the mutinous winds,
    And 'twixt the green sea and the azur'd vault
    Set roaring war.
There stand,
    For you are spell-stopp'd.
You do yet taste
    Some subtleties o' th' isle, that will not let you
    Believe things certain.
[Aside to SEBASTIAN and ANTONIO]  But you, my brace of
      lords, were I so minded,
    I here could pluck his Highness' frown upon you,
    And justify you traitors; at this time
    I will tell no tales.
For you, most wicked sir, whom to call brother
    Would even infect my mouth, I do forgive  
    Thy rankest fault-all of them; and require
    My dukedom of thee, which perforce I know
    Thou must restore.
As great to me as late; and, supportable
    To make the dear loss, have I means much weaker
    Than you may call to comfort you, for I  
    Have lost my daughter.
When did you lose your daughter?
I perceive these lords
    At this encounter do so much admire
    That they devour their reason, and scarce think
    Their eyes do offices of truth, their words
    Are natural breath; but, howsoe'er you have
    Been justled from your senses, know for certain
    That I am Prospero, and that very duke
    Which was thrust forth of Milan; who most strangely
    Upon this shore, where you were wrecked, was landed
    To be the lord on't.
Welcome, sir;
    This cell's my court; here have I few attendants,  
    And subjects none abroad; pray you, look in.
My dukedom since you have given me again,
    I will requite you with as good a thing;
    At least bring forth a wonder, to content ye
    As much as me my dukedom.
Sweet lord, you play me false.
Yes, for a score of kingdoms you should wrangle
    And I would call it fair play.
Look down, you gods,
    And on this couple drop a blessed crown;
    For it is you that have chalk'd forth the way
    Which brought us hither.
Let grief and sorrow still embrace his heart
    That doth not wish you joy.
Say, how came you hither?
If I did think, sir, I were well awake,
    I'd strive to tell you.
On a trice, so please you,
    Even in a dream, were we divided from them,
    And were brought moping hither.
Sir, my liege,
    Do not infest your mind with beating on
    The strangeness of this business; at pick'd leisure,
    Which shall be shortly, single I'll resolve you,
    Which to you shall seem probable, of every
    These happen'd accidents; till when, be cheerful
    And think of each thing well.
There are yet missing of your company
    Some few odd lads that you remember not.
Two of these fellows you
    Must know and own; this thing of darkness I
    Acknowledge mine.
I have been in such a pickle since I saw you
    last that, I fear me, will never out of my bones.
Go, sirrah, to my cell;
    Take with you your companions; as you look
    To have my pardon, trim it handsomely.
Hence, and bestow your luggage where you found it.
Sir, I invite your Highness and your train
    To my poor cell, where you shall take your rest
    For this one night; which, part of it, I'll waste
    With such discourse as, I not doubt, shall make it
    Go quick away-the story of my life,
    And the particular accidents gone by
    Since I came to this isle.
And in the morn
    I'll bring you to your ship, and so to Naples,  
    Where I have hope to see the nuptial
    Of these our dear-belov'd solemnized,
    And thence retire me to my Milan, where
    Every third thought shall be my grave.
I'll deliver all;
    And promise you calm seas, auspicious gales,
    And sail so expeditious that shall catch
    Your royal fleet far off.
-Please you, draw near.
Now 'tis true,
          I must be here confin'd by you,
          Or sent to Naples.
As you from crimes would pardon'd be,  
          Let your indulgence set me free.
I have not seen you long; how goes the world?
What have you there?
How shall I understand you?
I will unbolt to you.
Yet you do well
    To show Lord Timon that mean eyes have seen
    The foot above the head.
Imprison'd is he, say you?
Fare you well.
Love you the maid?
Give him thy daughter:
    What you bestow, in him I'll counterpoise,
    And make him weigh with her.
Never may
    That state or fortune fall into my keeping
    Which is not owed to you!
I thank you; you shall hear from me anon;
    Go not away.
What have you there, my friend?
I like your work,
    And you shall find I like it; wait attendance
    Till you hear further from me.
Well fare you, gentleman.
A mere satiety of commendations;
    If I should pay you for't as 'tis extoll'd,
    It would unclew me quite.
My lord, 'tis rated
    As those which sell would give; but you well know
    Things of like value, differing in the owners,
    Are prized by their masters.
Look who comes here; will you be chid?
Go not you hence
    Till I have thank'd you.
Sir, you have sav'd my longing, and I feed
    Most hungerly on your sight.
Pray you, let us in.
I'll keep you company.
Hang'd it, have you not?
O, Apemantus, you are welcome.
O you gods, what a number of men eats Timon, and he
    sees 'em not!
Might we but have that happiness, my lord, that you
    would once use our hearts, whereby we might express some part of
    our zeals, we should think ourselves for ever perfect.
O, no doubt, my good friends, but the gods themselves have
    provided that I shall have much help from you.
How had you been
    my friends else?
Why have you that charitable title from
    thousands, did not you chiefly belong to my heart?
I have told
    more of you to myself than you can with modesty speak in your own
    behalf; and thus far I confirm you.
O you gods, think I, what
    need we have any friends if we should ne'er have need of 'em?
Why, I have
    often wish'd myself poorer, that I might come nearer to you.
To forget their
    faults, I drink to you.
I promise you, my lord, you mov'd me much.
Please you, my lord, there are certain ladies most  
    desirous of admittance.
You have done our pleasures much grace, fair ladies,
    Set a fair fashion on our entertainment,
    Which was not half so beautiful and kind;
    You have added worth unto't and lustre,
    And entertain'd me with mine own device;
    I am to thank you for't.
My lord, you take us even at the best.
Ladies, there is an idle banquet attends you;
    Please you to dispose yourselves.
O my friends,
    I have one word to say to you.
Look you, my good lord,
    I must entreat you honour me so much
    As to advance this jewel; accept it and wear it,
    Kind my lord.
My lord, there are certain nobles of the Senate newly
    alighted and come to visit you.
I beseech your honour, vouchsafe me a word; it does
    concern you near.
May it please vour honour, Lord Lucius, out of his
    free love, hath presented to you four milk-white horses, trapp'd
    in silver.
Please you, my lord, that honourable gentleman, Lord
    Lucullus, entreats your company to-morrow to hunt with him and  
    has sent your honour two brace of greyhounds.
And now I remember, my lord, you gave good words the other
    day of a bay courser I rode on.
'Tis yours because you lik'd it.
O, I beseech you pardon me, my lord, in that.
I'll tell you true; I'll call to you.
And so am I to you.
All to you.
The best of happiness, honour, and fortunes, keep with
    you, Lord Timon!
Nay, an you begin to rail on society once, I am sworn not to
    give regard to you.
Get on your cloak and haste you to Lord Timon;
    Importune him for my moneys; be not ceas'd
    With slight denial, nor then silenc'd when
    'Commend me to your master' and the cap
    Plays in the right hand, thus; but tell him
    My uses cry to me, I must serve my turn
    Out of mine own; his days and times are past,
    And my reliances on his fracted dates
    Have smit my credit.
Get you gone;
    Put on a most importunate aspect,
    A visage of demand; for I do fear,
    When every feather sticks in his own wing,
    Lord Timon will be left a naked gull,
    Which flashes now a phoenix.
Get you gone.
Take the bonds along with you,
    And have the dates in compt.
What, you come for money?
Whence are you?
My master is awak'd by great occasion
    To call upon his own, and humbly prays you
    That with your other noble parts you'll suit
    In giving him his right.
If you did know, my lord, my master's wants-
  VARRO'S SERVANT.
I do beseech you, good my lords, keep on;
    I'll wait upon you instantly.
Pray you,
    How goes the world that I am thus encount'red
    With clamorous demands of date-broke bonds
    And the detention of long-since-due debts,
    Against my honour?
Please you, gentlemen,
    The time is unagreeable to this business.
Your importunacy cease till after dinner,
    That I may make his lordship understand
    Wherefore you are not paid.
That you ask me what you are, and do not know
    yourselves.
How do you, gentlemen?
She's e'en setting on water to scald such chickens as you
    are.
Would we could see you at Corinth!
Look you, here comes my mistress' page.
What do you in this wise
    company?
Fool, I will go with you to Lord Timon's.
Will you leave me there?
Are you three usurers' men?
Pray you walk near; I'll speak with you anon.
You make me marvel wherefore ere this time
    Had you not fully laid my state before me,
    That I might so have rated my expense
    As I had leave of means.
Go to;
    Perchance some single vantages you took
    When my indisposition put you back,
    And that unaptness made your minister
    Thus to excuse yourself.
O my good lord,
    At many times I brought in my accounts,  
    Laid them before you; you would throw them off
    And say you found them in mine honesty.
When, for some trifling present, you have bid me
    Return so much, I have shook my head and wept;
    Yea, 'gainst th' authority of manners, pray'd you
    To hold your hand more close.
I did endure
    Not seldom, nor no slight checks, when I have
    Prompted you in the ebb of your estate
    And your great flow of debts.
My lov'd lord,
    Though you hear now- too late!
If you suspect my husbandry or falsehood,
    Call me before th' exactest auditors
    And set me on the proof.
You shall perceive how you
    Mistake my fortunes; I am wealthy in my friends.
I will dispatch you severally- you to Lord Lucius; to Lord
    Lucullus you; I hunted with his honour to-day.
As you have said, my lord.
Go you, sir, to the senators,
    Of whom, even to the state's best health, I have
    Deserv'd this hearing.
They answer, in a joint and corporate voice,
    That now they are at fall, want treasure, cannot  
    Do what they would, are sorry- you are honourable-
    But yet they could have wish'd- they know not-
    Something hath been amiss- a noble nature
    May catch a wrench- would all were well!
I have told my lord of you; he is coming down to you.
I thank you, sir.
Why,
    this hits right; I dreamt of a silver basin and ewer to-night-
    Flaminius, honest Flaminius, you are very respectively welcome,
    sir.
[To SERVANT] Get you gone, sirrah.
O you gods,
    I feel my master's passion!
But I can tell you one thing, my lord, and
    which I hear from common rumours: now Lord Timon's happy hours
    are done and past, and his estate shrinks from him.
But believe you this, my lord, that not long ago
     one of his men was with the Lord Lucullus to borrow so many
    talents; nay, urg'd extremely for't, and showed what necessity
    belong'd to't, and yet was denied.
I tell you, denied, my lord.
Good Servilius, will you befriend me so far
    as to use mine own words to him?
I'll look you out a good turn, Servilius.
Exit SERVILIUS  
    True, as you said, Timon is shrunk indeed;
    And he that's once denied will hardly speed.
Do you observe this, Hostilius?
The like to you, kind Varro.
welcome, good brother, what do you think the hour?
I'll show you how t' observe a strange event.
I need not tell him that; he knows you are to diligent.
Do you hear, sir?
Why then preferr'd you not your sums and bills
    When your false masters eat of my lord's meat?
If 'twill not serve, 'tis not so base as you,
    For you serve knaves.
If I might beseech you, gentlemen, to repair some other
    hour, I should derive much from't; for take't of my soul, my lord
    leans wondrously to discontent.
Tear me, take me, and the gods fall upon you!
My lord, you have my voice to't: the fault's bloody.
O my lords,
    As you are great, be pitifully good.
My lords, if not for any parts in him-
    Though his right arm might purchase his own time,
    And be in debt to none- yet, more to move you,
    Take my deserts to his, and join 'em both;
    And, for I know your reverend ages love
    Security, I'll pawn my victories, all
    My honours to you, upon his good returns.
My lords,
    I do beseech you, know me.
My wounds ache at you.
Do you dare our anger?
Now the gods keep you old enough that you may live
    Only in bone, that none may look on you!
The good time of day to you, sir.
I also wish it to you.
What would he have borrowed of
    you?
What of you?
And how fare you?
I hope it remains not unkindly with your lordship that
    I return'd you an empty messenger.
O sir, let it not trouble you.
If you had sent but two hours before-
  TIMON.
Royal cheer, I warrant you.
How do you?
Hear you of it?
I pray you, upon what?
My worthy friends, will you draw near?
I'll tell you more anon.
The rest of
    your foes, O gods, the senators of Athens, together with the
    common lag of people, what is amiss in them, you gods, make
    suitable for destruction.
May you a better feast never behold,
    You knot of mouth-friends!
Of man and beast the infinite malady
    Crust you quite o'er!
Know you the quality of Lord Timon's fury?
Did you see my cap?
Did you see my jewel?
Did you see my cap?
The gods confound- hear me, you good gods all-  
    The Athenians both within and out that wall!
Hear you, Master Steward, where's our master?
Alack, my fellows, what should I say to you?
Let me be recorded by the righteous gods,
    I am as poor as you.
Good fellows all,
    The latest of my wealth I'll share amongst you.
Roots, you clear heavens!
Ha, you gods!
What, this, you gods?
Hold up, you sluts,
    Your aprons mountant; you are not oathable,
    Although I know you'll swear, terribly swear,
    Into strong shudders and to heavenly agues,
    Th' immortal gods that hear you.
Be whores still;
    And he whose pious breath seeks to convert you-  
    Be strong in whore, allure him, burn him up;
    Let your close fire predominate his smoke,
    And be no turncoats.
Make curl'd-pate ruffians bald,  
    And let the unscarr'd braggarts of the war
    Derive some pain from you.
Do you damn others, and let this damn you,
    And ditches grave you all!
More whore, more mischief first; I have given you earnest.
Your greatest want is, you want much of meat.
Why should you want?
Behold, the earth hath roots;
    Within this mile break forth a hundred springs;
    The oaks bear mast, the briars scarlet hips;
    The bounteous housewife Nature on each bush
    Lays her full mess before you.
Yet thanks I must you con
    That you are thieves profess'd, that you work not
    In holier shapes; for there is boundless theft
    In limited professions.
Trust not the physician;
    His antidotes are poison, and he slays
    Moe than you rob.
Take wealth and lives together;
    Do villainy, do, since you protest to do't,
    Like workmen.
I'll example you with thievery:
    The sun's a thief, and with his great attraction
    Robs the vast sea; the moon's an arrant thief,
    And her pale fire she snatches from the sun;
    The sea's a thief, whose liquid surge resolves
    The moon into salt tears; the earth's a thief,
    That feeds and breeds by a composture stol'n  
    From gen'ral excrement- each thing's a thief.
Cut throats;
    All that you meet are thieves.
To Athens go,
    Break open shops; nothing can you steal
    But thieves do lose it.
Steal not less for this
    I give you; and gold confound you howsoe'er!
O you gods!
Have you forgot me, sir?
The gods are witness,
    Nev'r did poor steward wear a truer grief
    For his undone lord than mine eyes for you.
I beg of you to know me, good my lord,
    T' accept my grief, and whilst this poor wealth lasts
    To entertain me as your steward still.
You should have fear'd false times when you did feast:
    Suspect still comes where an estate is least.
That which I show, heaven knows, is merely love,  
    Duty, and zeal, to your unmatched mind,
    Care of your food and living; and believe it,
    My most honour'd lord,
    For any benefit that points to me,
    Either in hope or present, I'd exchange
    For this one wish, that you had power and wealth
    To requite me by making rich yourself.
O, let me stay
    And comfort you, my master.
What have you now to present unto him?
[Aside] I'll meet you at the turn.
Sir,  
    Having often of your open bounty tasted,
    Hearing you were retir'd, your friends fall'n off,
    Whose thankless natures- O abhorred spirits!
to you,
    Whose star-like nobleness gave life and influence
    To their whole being!
You that are honest, by being what you are,
    Make them best seen and known.
Ay, you are honest men.
We are hither come to offer you our service.
Why, how shall I requite you?
Can you eat roots, and drink cold water- No?
What we can do, we'll do, to do you service.
Y'have heard that I have gold;
    I am sure you have.
But for all this, my honest-natur'd friends,
    I must needs say you have a little fault.
Marry, 'tis not monstrous in you; neither wish I
    You take much pains to mend.
Will you indeed?
There's never a one of you but trusts a knave
    That mightily deceives you.
Ay, and you hear him cog, see him dissemble,
    Know his gross patchery, love him, feed him,
    Keep in your bosom; yet remain assur'd
    That he's a made-up villain.
Look you, I love you well; I'll give you gold,
    Rid me these villains from your companies.
Hang them or stab them, drown them in a draught,
    Confound them by some course, and come to me,
    I'll give you gold enough.
You that way, and you this- but two in company;
    Each man apart, all single and alone,
    Yet an arch-villain keeps him company.
there's gold; you came for gold, ye slaves.
It is vain that you would speak with Timon;
    For he is set so only to himself
    That nothing but himself which looks like man
    Is friendly with him.
Of none but such as you, and you of Timon.
But if he sack fair Athens,
    And take our goodly aged men by th' beards,
    Giving our holy virgins to the stain
    Of contumelious, beastly, mad-brain'd war,  
    Then let him know- and tell him Timon speaks it
    In pity of our aged and our youth-
    I cannot choose but tell him that I care not,
    And let him take't at worst; for their knives care not,
    While you have throats to answer.
So I leave you
    To the protection of the prosperous gods,
    As thieves to keepers.
Go, live still;
    Be Alcibiades your plague, you his,
    And last so long enough!
I pray you do my greeting.
Trouble him no further; thus you still shall find him.
The SENATORS appear upon the walls

    Till now you have gone on and fill'd the time
    With all licentious measure, making your wills
    The scope of justice; till now, myself, and such
    As slept within the shadow of your power,
    Have wander'd with our travers'd arms, and breath'd
    Our sufferance vainly.
Nor are they living
    Who were the motives that you first went out;
    Shame, that they wanted cunning, in excess
    Hath broke their hearts.
Those enemies of Timon's and mine own,
    Whom you yourselves shall set out for reproof,
    Fall, and no more.
A plague consume you wicked caitiffs left!
Let us entreat, by honour of his name
    Whom worthily you would have now succeed,
    And in the Capitol and Senate's right,
    Whom you pretend to honour and adore,
    That you withdraw you and abate your strength,
    Dismiss your followers, and, as suitors should,
    Plead your deserts in peace and humbleness.
Friends, that have been thus forward in my right,
    I thank you all and here dismiss you all,
    And to the love and favour of my country
    Commit myself, my person, and the cause.
I give him you- the noblest that survives,
    The eldest son of this distressed queen.
[Sound trumpets and lay the coffin in the tomb]
    In peace and honour rest you here, my sons;
    Rome's readiest champions, repose you here in rest,
    Secure from worldly chances and mishaps!
In peace and honour rest you here, my sons!
And welcome, nephews, from successful wars,
    You that survive and you that sleep in fame.
What should I don this robe and trouble you?
Be chosen with proclamations to-day,
    To-morrow yield up rule, resign my life,
    And set abroad new business for you all?
Tribunes, I thank you; and this suit I make,
    That you create our Emperor's eldest son,
    Lord Saturnine; whose virtues will, I hope,
    Reflect on Rome as Titan's rays on earth,
    And ripen justice in this commonweal.
Then, if you will elect by my advice,
    Crown him, and say 'Long live our Emperor!
[To TAMORA]  Now, madam, are you prisoner to an emperor;
    To him that for your honour and your state
    Will use you nobly and your followers.
Madam, he comforts you
    Can make you greater than the Queen of Goths.
Lavinia, you are not displeas'd with this?
Are you in earnest then, my lord?
My lord, you pass not here.
My lord, you are unjust, and more than so:
    In wrongful quarrel you have slain your son.
Dead, if you will; but not to be his wife,
    That is another's lawful promis'd love.
Bury him where you can, he comes not here.
My lord, this is impiety in you.
What, would you bury him in my despite?
My foes I do repute you every one;
    So trouble me no more, but get you gone.
So, Bassianus, you have play'd your prize:
    God give you joy, sir, of your gallant bride!
And you of yours, my lord!
Rape, call you it, my lord, to seize my own,
    My true betrothed love, and now my wife?
You are very short with us;
    But if we live we'll be as sharp with you.
Only thus much I give your Grace to know:
    By all the duties that I owe to Rome,
    This noble gentleman, Lord Titus here,
    Is in opinion and in honour wrong'd,
    That, in the rescue of Lavinia,
    With his own hand did slay his youngest son,
    In zeal to you, and highly mov'd to wrath
    To be controll'd in that he frankly gave.
Not so, my lord; the gods of Rome forfend
    I should be author to dishonour you!
You are but newly planted in your throne;
    Lest, then, the people, and patricians too,
    Upon a just survey take Titus' part,
    And so supplant you for ingratitude,  
    Which Rome reputes to be a heinous sin,
    Yield at entreats, and then let me alone:
    I'll find a day to massacre them all,
    And raze their faction and their family,
    The cruel father and his traitorous sons,
    To whom I sued for my dear son's life;
    And make them know what 'tis to let a queen
    Kneel in the streets and beg for grace in vain.
This day all quarrels die, Andronicus;
    And let it be mine honour, good my lord,
    That I have reconcil'd your friends and you.
For you, Prince Bassianus, I have pass'd
    My word and promise to the Emperor
    That you will be more mild and tractable.
And fear not, lords- and you, Lavinia.
Lavinia, though you left me like a churl,
    I found a friend; and sure as death I swore  
    I would not part a bachelor from the priest.
Why, boy, although our mother, unadvis'd,
    Gave you a dancing rapier by your side,
    Are you so desperate grown to threat your friends?
Go to; have your lath glued within your sheath
    Till you know better how to handle it.
Why, lords, and think you not how dangerous
    It is to jet upon a prince's right?
I tell you, lords, you do but plot your deaths
    By this device.
Would you had hit it too!
and are you such fools
    To square for this?
Would it offend you, then,
    That both should speed?
For shame, be friends, and join for that you jar.
'Tis policy and stratagem must do
    That you affect; and so must you resolve
    That what you cannot as you would achieve,  
    You must perforce accomplish as you may.
Single you thither then this dainty doe,
    And strike her home by force if not by words.
This way, or not at all, stand you in hope.
Come, come, our Empress, with her sacred wit
    To villainy and vengeance consecrate,
    Will we acquaint with all what we intend;
    And she shall file our engines with advice
    That will not suffer you to square yourselves,
    But to your wishes' height advance you both.
Madam, to you as many and as good!
And you have rung it lustily, my lords-
    Somewhat too early for new-married ladies.
Lavinia, how say you?
Under your patience, gentle Emperess,
    'Tis thought you have a goodly gift in horning,
    And to be doubted that your Moor and you
    Are singled forth to try thy experiments.
Why are you sequest'red from all your train,
    Dismounted from your snow-white goodly steed,
    And wand'red hither to an obscure plot,
    Accompanied but with a barbarous Moor,
    If foul desire had not conducted you?
I pray you let us hence,
    And let her joy her raven-coloured love;
    This valley fits the purpose passing well.
Have I not reason, think you, to look pale?
A barren detested vale you see it is:
    The trees, though summer, yet forlorn and lean,
    Overcome with moss and baleful mistletoe;
    Here never shines the sun; here nothing breeds,
    Unless the nightly owl or fatal raven.
And then they call'd me foul adulteress,
    Lascivious Goth, and all the bitterest terms
    That ever ear did hear to such effect;
    And had you not by wondrous fortune come,
    This vengeance on me had they executed.
Revenge it, as you love your mother's life,
    Or be ye not henceforth call'd my children.
Give me the poniard; you shall know, my boys,
    Your mother's hand shall right your mother's wrong.
I warrant you, madam, we will make that sure.
Therefore away with her, and use her as you will;
    The worse to her the better lov'd of me.
Farewell, my sons; see that you make her sure.
Come on, my lords, the better foot before;
    Straight will I bring you to the loathsome pit
    Where I espied the panther fast asleep.
And mine, I promise you; were it not for shame,  
    Well could I leave our sport to sleep awhile.
We know not where you left them all alive;
    But, out alas!
Look, sirs, if you can find the huntsman out
    That should have murdered Bassianus here.
Tamora, was it you?
For pity of mine age, whose youth was spent
    In dangerous wars whilst you securely slept;
    For all my blood in Rome's great quarrel shed,
    For all the frosty nights that I have watch'd,
    And for these bitter tears, which now you see
    Filling the aged wrinkles in my cheeks,
    Be pitiful to my condemned sons,
    Whose souls are not corrupted as 'tis thought.
O noble father, you lament in vain;
    The Tribunes hear you not, no man is by,
    And you recount your sorrows to a stone.
Grave Tribunes, once more I entreat of you.
My gracious lord, no tribune hears you speak.
Titus Andronicus, my lord the Emperor
    Sends thee this word, that, if thou love thy sons,
    Let Marcus, Lucius, or thyself, old Titus,
    Or any one of you, chop off your hand
    And send it to the King: he for the same
    Will send thee hither both thy sons alive,
    And that shall be the ransom for their fault.
My hand will serve the turn,
    My youth can better spare my blood than you,
    And therefore mine shall save my brothers' lives.
Agree between you; I will spare my hand.
[Aside]  If that be call'd deceit, I will be honest,
    And never whilst I live deceive men so;
    But I'll deceive you in another sort,
    And that you'll say ere half an hour pass.
You heavy people, circle me about,
    That I may turn me to each one of you
    And swear unto my soul to right your wrongs.
Hie to the Goths and raise an army there;
    And if ye love me, as I think you do,
    Let's kiss and part, for we have much to do.
So so, now sit; and look you eat no more
    Than will preserve just so much strength in us
    As will revenge these bitter woes of ours.
Alas, sweet aunt, I know not what you mean.
'Tis sure enough, an you knew how;
    But if you hunt these bear-whelps, then beware:
    The dam will wake; and if she wind ye once,
    She's with the lion deeply still in league,
    And lulls him whilst she playeth on her back,
    And when he sleeps will she do what she list.
Boy, what say you?
O heavens, can you hear a good man groan
    And not relent, or not compassion him?
My lords, with all the humbleness I may,
    I greet your honours from Andronicus-
    [Aside]  And pray the Roman gods confound you both!
[Aside]  That you are both decipher'd, that's the news,
    For villains mark'd with rape.
- May it please you,
    My grandsire, well advis'd, hath sent by me
    The goodliest weapons of his armoury
    To gratify your honourable youth,
    The hope of Rome; for so he bid me say;
    And so I do, and with his gifts present
    Your lordships, that, whenever you have need,  
    You may be armed and appointed well.
And so I leave you both-  [Aside]  like bloody villains.
Right, you have it.
Did you not use his daughter very friendly?
O, tell me, did you see Aaron the Moor?
Sweet blowse, you are a beauteous blossom sure.
[Takes the CHILD from the NURSE, and draws]
    Stay, murderous villains, will you kill your brother!
I tell you, younglings, not Enceladus,
    With all his threat'ning band of Typhon's brood,
    Nor great Alcides, nor the god of war,
    Shall seize this prey out of his father's hands.
This before all the world do I prefer;
    This maugre all the world will I keep safe,
    Or some of you shall smoke for it in Rome.
'
    He is your brother, lords, sensibly fed
    Of that self-blood that first gave life to you;
    And from your womb where you imprisoned were
    He is enfranchised and come to light.
My son and I will have the wind of you:
    Keep there; now talk at pleasure of your safety.
When we join in league
    I am a lamb; but if you brave the Moor,
    The chafed boar, the mountain lioness,
    The ocean swells not so as Aaron storms.
And now be it known to you my full intent:
    Not far, one Muliteus, my countryman-
    His wife but yesternight was brought to bed;
    His child is like to her, fair as you are.
You see I have given her physic,
                                         [Pointing to the NURSE]
    And you must needs bestow her funeral;  
    The fields are near, and you are gallant grooms.
This done, see that you take no longer days,
    But send the midwife presently to me.
Come on, you thick-lipp'd slave, I'll bear you hence;
    For it is you that puts us to our shifts.
I'll make you feed on berries and on roots,
    And feed on curds and whey, and suck the goat,
    And cabin in a cave, and bring you up  
    To be a warrior and command a camp.
Terras Astrea reliquit,
    Be you rememb'red, Marcus; she's gone, she's fled.
Sirs, take you to your tools.
You, cousins, shall
    Go sound the ocean and cast your nets;
    Happily you may catch her in the sea;
    Yet there's as little justice as at land.
No; Publius and Sempronius, you must do it;
    'Tis you must dig with mattock and with spade,
    And pierce the inmost centre of the earth;
    Then, when you come to Pluto's region,
    I pray you deliver him this petition.
Go get you gone; and pray be careful all,
    And leave you not a man-of-war unsearch'd.
What, have you met with her?
No, my good lord; but Pluto sends you word,
    If you will have Revenge from hell, you shall.
Marry, for Justice, she is so employ'd,
    He thinks, with Jove in heaven, or somewhere else,
    So that perforce you must needs stay a time.
[He gives them the arrows]
    'Ad Jovem' that's for you; here 'Ad Apollinem.
Have you any letters?
Why, sir, that is as fit as can be to serve for your
    oration; and let him deliver the pigeons to the Emperor from you.
Tell me, can you deliver an oration to the Emperor with a
    grace?
Sirrah, can you with a grace deliver up a
    supplication?
Then here is a supplication for you.
And when you come to
    him, at the first approach you must kneel; then kiss his foot;
    then deliver up your pigeons; and then look for your reward.
I'll
    be at hand, sir; see you do it bravely.
I warrant you, sir; let me alone.
God be with you, sir; I will.
My lords, you know, as know the mightful gods,
    However these disturbers of our peace
    Buzz in the people's ears, there nought hath pass'd
    But even with law against the wilful sons
    Of old Andronicus.
- God and Saint Stephen give you godden.
I have
    brought you a letter and a couple of pigeons here.
Come, sirrah, you must be hang'd.
Why should you fear?
Therefore, great lords, be, as your titles witness,
    Imperious and impatient of your wrongs;
    And wherein Rome hath done you any scath,
    Let him make treble satisfaction.
I humbly thank him, and I thank you all.
'
    With this, my weapon drawn, I rush'd upon him,
    Surpris'd him suddenly, and brought him hither
    To use as you think needful of the man.
If thou do this, I'll show thee wondrous things
    That highly may advantage thee to hear;
    If thou wilt not, befall what may befall,
    I'll speak no more but 'Vengeance rot you all!
If there be devils, would I were a devil,
    To live and burn in everlasting fire,
    So I might have your company in hell
    But to torment you with my bitter tongue!
Lord Lucius, and you Princes of the Goths,
    The Roman Emperor greets you all by me;
    And, for he understands you are in arms,
    He craves a parley at your father's house,
    Willing you to demand your hostages,
    And they shall be immediately deliver'd.
And you the Empress!
Whate'er I forge to feed his brain-sick humours,
    Do you uphold and maintain in your speeches,
    For now he firmly takes me for Revenge;  
    And, being credulous in this mad thought,
    I'll make him send for Lucius his son,
    And whilst I at a banquet hold him sure,
    I'll find some cunning practice out of hand
    To scatter and disperse the giddy Goths,
    Or, at the least, make them his enemies.
Rapine and Murder, you are welcome too.
How like the Empress and her sons you are!
Well are you fitted, had you but a Moor.
Could not all hell afford you such a devil?
For well I wot the Empress never wags
    But in her company there is a Moor;
    And, would you represent our queen aright,
    It were convenient you had such a devil.
But welcome as you are.
[Aside to her sons]  What say you, boys?
Will you abide
      with him,
    Whiles I go tell my lord the Emperor
    How I have govern'd our determin'd jest?
Tut, I have work enough for you to do.
Know you these two?
Oft have you heard me wish for such an hour,
    And now I find it; therefore bind them sure,
    And stop their mouths if they begin to cry.
Look that you bind them fast.
Here stands the spring whom you have stain'd with mud;
    This goodly summer with your winter mix'd.
You kill'd her husband; and for that vile fault
    Two of her brothers were condemn'd to death,
    My hand cut off and made a merry jest;
    Both her sweet hands, her tongue, and that more dear
    Than hands or tongue, her spotless chastity,
    Inhuman traitors, you constrain'd and forc'd.
What would you say, if I should let you speak?
Villains, for shame you could not beg for grace.
how I mean to martyr you.
This is the feast that I have bid her to,
    And this the banquet she shall surfeit on;
    For worse than Philomel you us'd my daughter,
    And worse than Progne I will be reveng'd.
Good uncle, take you in this barbarous Moor,
    This ravenous tiger, this accursed devil;
    Let him receive no sust'nance, fetter him,
    Till he be brought unto the Empress' face
    For testimony of her foul proceedings.
Please you, therefore, draw nigh and take your places.
Although the cheer be poor,
    'Twill fill your stomachs; please you eat of it.
We are beholding to you, good Andronicus.
An if your Highness knew my heart, you were.
Will't please you eat?
O, let me teach you how to knit again
    This scattered corn into one mutual sheaf,
    These broken limbs again into one body;
    Lest Rome herself be bane unto herself,
    And she whom mighty kingdoms curtsy to,
    Like a forlorn and desperate castaway,
    Do shameful execution on herself.
But if my frosty signs and chaps of age,
    Grave witnesses of true experience,
    Cannot induce you to attend my words,
    [To Lucius]  Speak, Rome's dear friend, as erst our ancestor,  
    When with his solemn tongue he did discourse
    To love-sick Dido's sad attending ear
    The story of that baleful burning night,
    When subtle Greeks surpris'd King Priam's Troy.
My heart is not compact of flint nor steel;
    Nor can I utter all our bitter grief,
    But floods of tears will drown my oratory
    And break my utt'rance, even in the time
    When it should move ye to attend me most,
    And force you to commiseration.
Then, gracious auditory, be it known to you
    That Chiron and the damn'd Demetrius
    Were they that murd'red our Emperor's brother;
    And they it were that ravished our sister.
I am the turned forth, be it known to you,
    That have preserv'd her welfare in my blood
    And from her bosom took the enemy's point,
    Sheathing the steel in my advent'rous body.
you know I am no vaunter, I;
    My scars can witness, dumb although they are,
    That my report is just and full of truth.
Now have you heard the truth: what say you, Romans?
Have we done aught amiss, show us wherein,
    And, from the place where you behold us pleading,
    The poor remainder of Andronici
    Will, hand in hand, all headlong hurl ourselves,
    And on the ragged stones beat forth our souls,
    And make a mutual closure of our house.
Speak, Romans, speak; and if you say we shall,
    Lo, hand in hand, Lucius and I will fall.
Stand all aloof; but, uncle, draw you near
    To shed obsequious tears upon this trunk.
ev'n with all my heart
    Would I were dead, so you did live again!
Now expectation, tickling skittish spirits
    On one and other side, Troyan and Greek,
    Sets all on hazard-and hither am I come
    A Prologue arm'd, but not in confidence
    Of author's pen or actor's voice, but suited
    In like conditions as our argument,
    To tell you, fair beholders, that our play
    Leaps o'er the vaunt and firstlings of those broils,
    Beginning in the middle; starting thence away,
    To what may be digested in a play.
Well, I have told you enough of this; for my part,
    I'll not meddle nor make no farther.
Ay, the grinding; but you must tarry the bolting.
Ay, the bolting; but you must tarry the leavening.
Ay, to the leavening; but here's yet in the word
    'hereafter' the kneading, the making of the cake, the heating
    of the oven, and the baking; nay, you must stay the cooling too,
    or you may chance to burn your lips.
I have had my labour for my travail, ill thought on of
    her and ill thought on of you; gone between and between, but
    small thanks for my labour.
I do not care whether you do or no.
Pray you, speak no more to me: I will leave all
    as I found it, and there an end.
Peace, you ungracious clamours!
Helen must needs be fair,
    When with your blood you daily paint her thus.
But Pandarus-O gods, how do you plague me!
Are you bound thither?
What do you talk of?
-How do you, cousin?
When were you at Ilium?
What were you talking of when I came?
Was Hector arm'd
    and gone ere you came to Ilium?
Do you know a man
    if you see him?
Then you say as I say, for I am sure he is not Hector.
Th' other's not come to't; you shall tell me another tale
    when th' other's come to't.
I swear to you I think Helen loves him better than Paris.
She came to him th' other day
    into the compass'd window-and you know he has not past three or
    four hairs on his chin-
  CRESSIDA.
But to prove to you that Helen loves him: she came and
    puts me her white hand to his cloven chin-
  CRESSIDA.
Why, you know, 'tis dimpled.
But to prove to you that Helen loves
    Troilus-
  CRESSIDA.
Troilus will stand to the proof, if you'll prove it so.
If you love an addle egg as well as you love an idle
    head, you would eat chickens i' th' shell.
Well, cousin, I told you a thing yesterday; think on't.
I'll be sworn 'tis true; he will weep you, and 'twere a
    man born in April.
I'll tell you them all by their names as they pass
    by; but mark Troilus above the rest.
He's one of the  
    flowers of Troy, I can tell you.
But mark Troilus; you shall see
    anon.
He has a shrewd wit, I can tell you; and
    he's a man good enough; he's one o' th' soundest judgments in
    Troy, whosoever, and a proper man of person.
I'll show you Troilus anon.
If he see me, you shall see him nod
    at me.
Will he give you the nod?
That's Hector, that, that, look you, that; there's a
    fellow!
Look you what
    hacks are on his helmet!
Look you yonder, do you see?
Look you
    there.
do you not hear the people cry 'Troilus'?
Look well upon him,
    niece; look you how his sword is bloodied, and his helm more
    hack'd than Hector's; and how he looks, and how he goes!
Why, have you any discretion?
Have you any
    eyes?
Do you know what a man is?
A man knows not at what ward you
    lie.
Upon my back, to defend my belly; upon my wit, to defend
    my wiles; upon my secrecy, to defend mine honesty; my mask, to
    defend my beauty; and you, to defend all these; and at all these
    wards I lie at, at a thousand watches.
Nay, I'll watch you for that; and that's one of the
    chiefest of them too.
If I cannot ward what I would not have hit,
    I can watch you for telling how I took the blow; unless it swell
    past hiding, and then it's past watching
  PANDARUS.
Sir, my lord would instantly speak with you.
I will be with you, niece, by and by.
By the same token, you are a bawd.
Why then, you princes,
    Do you with cheeks abash'd behold our works
    And call them shames, which are, indeed, nought else
    But the protractive trials of great Jove
    To find persistive constancy in men;
    The fineness of which metal is not found
    In fortune's love?
What would you fore our tent?
Is this great Agamemnon's tent, I pray you?
Sir, you of Troy, call you yourself Aeneas?
What's your affair, I pray you?
Fair Lord Aeneas, let me touch your hand;
    To our pavilion shall I lead you, first.
Yourself shall feast with us before you go,  
    And find the welcome of a noble foe.
I have a young conception in my brain;
    Be you my time to bring it to some shape.
And wake him to the answer, think you?
Who may you else oppose
    That can from Hector bring those honours off,
    If not Achilles?
Wherefore do you thus?
You see him there, do you?
But yet you look not well upon him; for who some ever
    you take him to be, he is Ajax.
This
    lord, Achilles, Ajax-who wears his wit in his belly and his guts
    in his head-I'll tell you what I say of him.
Nay, I must hold you.
I would have peace and quietness, but the fool will not-
    he there; that he; look you there.
Will you set your wit to a fool's?
No, I warrant you, the fool's will shame it.
Ajax was here the voluntary, and you as
    under an impress.
There's Ulysses and old Nestor-whose wit was mouldy ere
    your grandsires had nails on their toes-yoke you like draught
    oxen, and make you plough up the wars.
There's for you, Patroclus.
I will see you hang'd like clotpoles ere I come any more
    to your tents.
O, meaning you!
' Hector, what say you to't?
Weigh you the worth and honour of a king,
    So great as our dread father's, in a scale
    Of common ounces?
Will you with counters sum
    The past-proportion of his infinite,
    And buckle in a waist most fathomless
    With spans and inches so diminutive
    As fears and reasons?
No marvel though you bite so sharp at reasons,
    You are so empty of them.
Here are your reasons:
    You know an enemy intends you harm;
    You know a sword employ'd is perilous,
    And reason flies the object of all harm.
If you'll avouch 'twas wisdom Paris went-
    As you must needs, for you all cried 'Go, go'-
    If you'll confess he brought home worthy prize-
    As you must needs, for you all clapp'd your hands,
    And cried 'Inestimable!
' -why do you now
    The issue of your proper wisdoms rate,
    And do a deed that never fortune did-
    Beggar the estimation which you priz'd
    Richer than sea and land?
Paris, you speak
    Like one besotted on your sweet delights.
Paris and Troilus, you have both said well;
    And on the cause and question now in hand
    Have gloz'd, but superficially; not much
    Unlike young men, whom Aristode thought
    Unfit to hear moral philosophy.
The reasons you allege do more conduce
    To the hot passion of distemp'red blood  
    Than to make up a free determination
    'Twixt right and wrong; for pleasure and revenge
    Have ears more deaf than adders to the voice
    Of any true decision.
Yet, ne'er the less,  
    My spritely brethren, I propend to you
    In resolution to keep Helen still;
    For 'tis a cause that hath no mean dependence
    Upon our joint and several dignities.
Why, there you touch'd the life of our design.
Look you, who comes here?
You may call it
    melancholy, if you will favour the man; but, by my head, 'tis
    pride.
No; you see he is his argument that has his argument-
    Achilles.
Hear you, Patroclus.
Go and tell him
    We come to speak with him; and you shall not sin
    If you do say we think him over-proud
    And under-honest, in self-assumption greater
    Than in the note of judgment; and worthier than himself
    Here tend the savage strangeness he puts on,
    Disguise the holy strength of their command,
    And underwrite in an observing kind
    His humorous predominance; yea, watch
    His pettish lunes, his ebbs, his flows, as if
    The passage and whole carriage of this action
    Rode on his tide.
Ulysses, enter you.
Do you not think he thinks himself a better
    man than I am?
Will you subscribe his thought and say he is?
No, noble Ajax; you are as strong, as valiant, as wise,
    no less noble, much more gentle, and altogether more tractable.
Dear lord, go you and greet him in his tent.
'Tis said he holds you well; and will be led
    At your request a little from himself.
O, no, you shall not go.
[Aside] An 'twould, you'd carry half.
[To AGAMEMNON] My lord, you feed too much on this dislike.
Wherefore should you so?
Shall I call you father?
Friend, you-pray you, a word.
Do you not follow the young
    Lord Paris?
You know me, do you not?
Know you the musicians?
Could not you find out that by her
    attributes?
Fair be to you, my lord, and to all this fair company!
Fair desires, in all fair measure, fairly guide them- especially
    to you, fair queen!
Dear lord, you are full of fair words.
You have broke it, cousin; and by my life, you shall make it
    whole again; you shall piece it out with a piece of your
    performance.
Well, you say so in fits.
My lord, will you
    vouchsafe me a word?
We'll hear you sing,
    certainly-
  PANDARUS.
Well sweet queen, you are pleasant with me.
Go to, sweet queen, go to-commends himself most
    affectionately to you-
  HELEN.
If you do, our
    melancholy upon your head!
-And, my
    lord, he desires you that, if the King call for him at supper,
    you will make his excuse.
-My cousin will fall out with
    you.
No, no, no such matter; you are wide.
Why should you say Cressida?
What do you spy?
My niece is horribly in love with a thing you have, sweet
    queen.
I'll hear no more of this; I'll sing you a
    song now.
Ay, you may, you may.
Sweet Helen, I must woo you
    To help unarm our Hector.
His stubborn buckles,
    With these your white enchanting fingers touch'd,
    Shall more obey than to the edge of steel
    Or force of Greekish sinews; you shall do more
    Than all the island kings-disarm great Hector.
No, sir; he stays for you to conduct him thither.
Have you seen my cousin?
She's making her ready, she'll come straight; you must be
    witty now.
Come, come, what need you blush?
-Here she
    is now; swear the oaths now to her that you have sworn to me.
-
    What, are you gone again?
You must be watch'd ere you be made
    tame, must you?
Come your ways, come your ways; an you draw
    backward, we'll put you i' th' fills.
-Why do you not speak to
    her?
Alas the day, how loath you are to offend daylight!
An 'twere
    dark, you'd close sooner.
Nay, you shall fight your hearts out ere I part you.
Words pay no debts, give her deeds; but she'll bereave
    you o' th' deeds too, if she call your activity in question.
Will you walk in, my lord?
Will you walk in, my lord?
Have you not done talking yet?
Well, uncle, what folly I commit, I dedicate to you.
I thank you for that; if my lord get a boy of you, you'll
    give him me.
Nay, I'll give my word for her too: our kindred, though
    they be long ere they are wooed, they are constant being won;
    they are burs, I can tell you; they'll stick where they are
    thrown.
Prince Troilus, I have lov'd you night and day
    For many weary months.
If I confess much, you will play the tyrant.
I love you now; but till now not so much
    But I might master it.
But, though I lov'd you well, I woo'd you not;
    And yet, good faith, I wish'd myself a man,
    Or that we women had men's privilege
    Of speaking first.
My lord, I do beseech you, pardon me;
    'Twas not my purpose thus to beg a kiss.
An you take leave till to-morrow morning-
  CRESSIDA.
Pray you, content you.
What offends you, lady?
I have a kind of self resides with you;
    But an unkind self, that itself will leave
    To be another's fool.
Perchance, my lord, I show more craft than love;
    And fell so roundly to a large confession
    To angle for your thoughts; but you are wise-
    Or else you love not; for to be wise and love
    Exceeds man's might; that dwells with gods above.
O that I thought it could be in a woman-
    As, if it can, I will presume in you-  
    To feed for aye her lamp and flames of love;
    To keep her constancy in plight and youth,
    Outliving beauty's outward, with a mind
    That doth renew swifter than blood decays!
Or that persuasion could but thus convince me
    That my integrity and truth to you
    Might be affronted with the match and weight
    Of such a winnowed purity in love.
In that I'll war with you.
Prophet may you be!
If ever you
    prove false one to another, since I have taken such pains to
    bring you together, let all pitiful goers- between be call'd to
    the world's end after my name-call them all Pandars; let all
    constant men be Troiluses, all false women Cressids, and all
    brokers between Pandars.
Whereupon I will show you a chamber
    and a bed; which bed, because it shall not speak of your
    pretty encounters, press it to death.
Appear it to your mind
    That, through the sight I bear in things to come,
    I have abandon'd Troy, left my possession,
    Incurr'd a traitor's name, expos'd myself
    From certain and possess'd conveniences
    To doubtful fortunes, sequest'ring from me all
    That time, acquaintance, custom, and condition,
    Made tame and most familiar to my nature;
    And here, to do you service, am become
    As new into the world, strange, unacquainted-
    I do beseech you, as in way of taste,
    To give me now a little benefit
    Out of those many regist'red in promise,
    Which you say live to come in my behalf.
Oft have you-often have you thanks therefore-
    Desir'd my Cressid in right great exchange,
    Whom Troy hath still denied; but this Antenor,
    I know, is such a wrest in their affairs
    That their negotiations all must slack
    Wanting his manage; and they will almost
    Give us a prince of blood, a son of Priam,
    In change of him.
Good Diomed,
    Furnish you fairly for this interchange;
    Withal, bring word if Hector will to-morrow
    Be answer'd in his challenge.
Would you, my lord, aught with the general?
How do you?
How do you?
What are you reading?
Keep then the path,
    For emulation hath a thousand sons
    That one by one pursue; if you give way,
    Or hedge aside from the direct forthright,
    Like to an ent'red tide they all rush by
    And leave you hindmost;
    Or, like a gallant horse fall'n in first rank,
    Lie there for pavement to the abject rear,
    O'er-run and trampled on.
'Tis known, Achilles, that you are in love
    With one of Priam's daughters.
All the commerce that you have had with Troy
    As perfectly is ours as yours, my lord;
    And better would it fit Achilles much
    To throw down Hector than Polyxena.
The fool slides o'er the ice that you should break.
To this effect, Achilles, have I mov'd you.
I stand condemn'd for this;
    They think my little stomach to the war
    And your great love to me restrains you thus.
' What think you
    of this man that takes me for the general?
Let Patroclus make his demands
    to me, you shall see the pageant of Ajax.
Who most humbly desires you to invite Hector to his  
    tent-
  THERSITES.
What you say to't?
God buy you, with all my heart.
Had I so good occasion to lie long
    As you, Prince Paris, nothing but heavenly business
    Should rob my bed-mate of my company.
A valiant Greek, Aeneas -take his hand:
    Witness the process of your speech, wherein
    You told how Diomed, a whole week by days,
    Did haunt you in the field.
Health to you, valiant sir,
    During all question of the gentle truce;
    But when I meet you arm'd, as black defiance
    As heart can think or courage execute.
His purpose meets you: 'twas to bring this Greek
    To Calchas' house, and there to render him,
    For the enfreed Antenor, the fair Cressid.
Let's have your company; or, if you please,
    Haste there before us.
That I assure you:
    Troilus had rather Troy were borne to Greece
    Than Cressid borne from Troy.
On, lord; we'll follow you.
Both alike:
    He merits well to have her that doth seek her,
    Not making any scruple of her soilure,
    With such a hell of pain and world of charge;
    And you as well to keep her that defend her,
    Not palating the taste of her dishonour,
    With such a costly loss of wealth and friends.
Fair Diomed, you do as chapmen do,
    Dispraise the thing that you desire to buy;
    But we in silence hold this virtue well:
    We'll not commend what we intend to sell.
Are you aweary of me?
I might have still held off,
    And then you would have tarried.
Here, you maid!
Go hang yourself, you naughty mocking uncle.
You bring me to do, and then you flout me too.
What have I brought you to do?
Did not I tell you?
My lord, come you again into my chamber.
Come, you are deceiv'd, I think of no such thing.
Pray you come in:
    I would not for half Troy have you seen here.
Will you beat down the
    door?
By my troth,
    I knew you not.
What news with you so early?
Is he here, say you?
Come, come, you'll do him wrong ere you are
    ware; you'll be so true to him to be false to him.
Do not you
    know of him, but yet go fetch him hither; go.
My lord, I scarce have leisure to salute you,
    My matter is so rash.
I will go meet them; and, my lord Aeneas,
    We met by chance; you did not find me here.
Why sigh you so profoundly?
Good uncle, I beseech you, on my knees I beseech you,
    what's the matter?
O you immortal gods!
O you gods divine,  
    Make Cressid's name the very crown of falsehood,
    If ever she leave Troilus!
Time, force, and death,
    Do to this body what extremes you can,
    But the strong base and building of my love
    Is as the very centre of the earth,
    Drawing all things to it.
Good my brother Troilus,
    Tell you the lady what she is to do
    And haste her to the purpose.
Please you walk in, my lords.
Why tell you me of moderation?
you are call'd.
O, you shall be expos'd, my lord, to dangers
    As infinite as imminent!
And you this glove.
When shall I see you?
How novelties may move, and parts with person,
    Alas, a kind of godly jealousy,
    Which I beseech you call a virtuous sin,
    Makes me afeard.
you love me not.
Do you think I will?
Good brother, come you hither;
    And bring Aeneas and the Grecian with you.
My lord, will you be true?
Here is the lady
    Which for Antenor we deliver you;
    At the port, lord, I'll give her to thy hand,
    And by the way possess thee what she is.
Fair Lady Cressid,
    So please you, save the thanks this prince expects.
And know you, lord,
    I'll nothing do on charge: to her own worth
    She shall be priz'd.
But that you say 'Be't so,'
    I speak it in my spirit and honour, 'No.
Our general doth salute you with a kiss.
Achilles bids you welcome.
But that's no argument for kissing now;
    For thus popp'd Paris in his hardiment,
    And parted thus you and your argument.
The first was Menelaus' kiss; this, mine-
                                                   [Kisses her again]
    Patroclus kisses you.
In kissing, do you render or receive?
I'll make my match to live,
    The kiss you take is better than you give;
    Therefore no kiss.
I'll give you boot; I'll give you three for one.
No, Paris is not; for you know 'tis true
    That you are odd, and he is even with you.
May I, sweet lady, beg a kiss of you?
Never's my day, and then a kiss of you.
I'll bring you to your father.
Or do you purpose
    A victor shall be known?
Will you the knights
    Shall to the edge of all extremity
    Pursue each other, or shall they be divided
    By any voice or order of the field?
O, I perceive you!
As you and Lord ]Eneas
    Consent upon the order of their fight,
    So be it; either to the uttermost,  
    Or else a breath.
Princes, enough, so please you.
There is expectance here from both the sides
    What further you will do.
[To Troilus] My well-fam'd lord of Troy, no less to you.
O you, my lord?
She's well, but bade me not commend her to you.
Sir, I foretold you then what would ensue.
I must not believe you.
After the General, I beseech you next
    To feast with me and see me at my tent.
Tell me, you heavens, in which part of his body
    Shall I destroy him?
Do not chafe thee, cousin;
    And you, Achilles, let these threats alone
    Till accident or purpose bring you to't.
You may have every day enough of Hector,
    If you have stomach.
The general state, I fear,
    Can scarce entreat you to be odd with him.
I pray you let us see you in the field;
    We have had pelting wars since you refus'd
    The Grecians' cause.
First, all you peers of Greece, go to my tent;  
    There in the full convive we; afterwards,
    As Hector's leisure and your bounties shall
    Concur together, severally entreat him.
My Lord Ulysses, tell me, I beseech you,
    In what place of the field doth Calchas keep?
Shall I, sweet lord, be bound to you so much,
    After we part from Agamemnon's tent,
    To bring me thither?
Will you walk on, my lord?
Male varlet, you rogue!
Why, no, you ruinous butt; you whoreson
    indistinguishable cur, no.
I trouble you.
Here comes himself to guide you.
So now, fair Prince of Troy, I bid good night;
    Ajax commands the guard to tend on you.
Old Nestor tarries; and you too, Diomed,
    Keep Hector company an hour or two.
[Aside to TROILUS] Follow his torch; he goes to
    Calchas' tent; I'll keep you company.
Sweet sir, you honour me.
What, are you up here, ho?
[Within] She comes to you.
Hark, a word with you.
Will you remember?
I'll tell you what-
  DIOMEDES.
come, tell a pin; you are a forsworn-
  CRESSIDA.
What would you have me do?
What did you swear you would bestow on me?
This place is dangerous;
    The time right deadly; I beseech you, go.
Behold, I pray you.
I pray you, stay; by hell and all hell's torments,
    I will not speak a word.
Nay, but you part in anger.
you palter.
You shake, my lord, at something; will you go?
But will you, then?
I'll fetch you one.
I will not meet with you to-morrow night.
O all you gods!
You shall not have it, Diomed; faith, you shall not;
    I'll give you something else.
'Twas one's that lov'd me better than you will.
But, now you have it, take it.
By all Diana's waiting women yond,
    And by herself, I will not tell you whose.
One cannot speak a word
    But it straight starts you.
Nor I, by Pluto; but that that likes not you
    Pleases me best.
I have been seeking you this hour, my lord.
Hector, by this, is arming him in Troy;
    Ajax, your guard, stays to conduct you home.
Have with you, Prince.
I'll bring you to the gates.
You train me to offend you; get you in.
Hold you still, I say.
Brother, you have a vice of mercy in you
    Which better fits a lion than a man.
Troilus, I would not have you fight to-day.
Not fate, obedience, nor the hand of Mars
    Beck'ning with fiery truncheon my retire;
    Not Priamus and Hecuba on knees,
    Their eyes o'ergalled with recourse of tears;
    Nor you, my brother, with your true sword drawn,
    Oppos'd to hinder me, should stop my way,
    But by my ruin.
You know me dutiful; therefore, dear sir,
    Let me not shame respect; but give me leave
    To take that course by your consent and voice
    Which you do here forbid me, royal Priam.
Andromache, I am offended with you.
Upon the love you bear me, get you in.
Go in, and cheer the town; we'll forth, and fight,
    Do deeds worth praise and tell you them at night.
Do you hear, my lord?
Do you hear?
A whoreson tisick, a whoreson rascally tisick so troubles
    me, and the foolish fortune of this girl, and what one thing,
    what another, that I shall leave you one o' th's days; and I have
    a rheum in mine eyes too, and such an ache in my bones that
    unless a man were curs'd I cannot tell what to think on't.
Come, both, you cogging Greeks; have at you
                                                      Exeunt fighting

                      Enter HECTOR

  HECTOR.
Come here about me, you my Myrmidons;
    Mark what I say.
On, Myrmidons, and cry you an amain
    'Achilles hath the mighty Hector slain.
Frown on, you heavens, effect your rage with speed.
My lord, you do discomfort all the host.
You vile abominable tents,
    Thus proudly pight upon our Phrygian plains,
    Let Titan rise as early as he dare,
    I'll through and through you.
But hear you, hear you!
traitors and bawds, how earnestly are
    you set a work, and how ill requited!
As many as be here of pander's hall,
    Your eyes, half out, weep out at Pandar's fall;
    Or, if you cannot weep, yet give some groans,  
    Though not for me, yet for your aching bones.
Till then I'll sweat and seek about for eases,
    And at that time bequeath you my diseases.
Will you go hunt, my lord?
Perchance he is not drown'd- what think you, sailors?
It is perchance that you yourself were saved.
True, madam, and, to comfort you with chance,
    Assure yourself, after our ship did split,
    When you, and those poor number saved with you,
    Hung on our driving boat, I saw your brother,
    Most provident in peril, bind himself-
    Courage and hope both teaching him the practice-
    To a strong mast that liv'd upon the sea;
    Where, like Arion on the dolphin's back,
    I saw him hold acquaintance with the waves
    So long as I could see.
And so is now, or was so very late;
    For but a month ago I went from hence,
    And then 'twas fresh in murmur- as, you know,
    What great ones do the less will prattle of-
    That he did seek the love of fair Olivia.
Be you his eunuch and your mute I'll be;
    When my tongue blabs, then let mine eyes not see.
By my troth, Sir Toby, you must come in earlier o' nights;
    your cousin, my lady, takes great exceptions to your ill hours.
Ay, but you must confine yourself within the modest limits
    of order.
That quaffing and drinking will undo you; I heard my lady
    talk of it yesterday, and of a foolish knight that you brought in
    one night here to be her wooer.
Fie that you'll say so!
Bless you, fair shrew.
And you too, sir.
Fare you well, gentlemen.
An you part so, mistress, I would I might never draw
    sword again.
Fair lady, do you think you have fools in hand?
Sir, I have not you by th' hand.
Marry, but you shall have; and here's my hand.
I pray you, bring your hand to
    th' buttry-bar and let it drink.
Are you full of them?
Never in your life, I think; unless you see canary put
    me down.
If the Duke continue these favours towards you, Cesario,
    you are like to be much advanc'd; he hath known you but three
    days, and already you are no stranger.
You either fear his humour or my negligence, that you call
    in question the continuance of his love.
I thank you.
Stand you awhile aloof.
Some four or five attend him-
    All, if you will, for I myself am best
    When least in company.
In the wars; and that may you be bold to say in your
    foolery.
Yet you will be hang'd for being so long absent; or to be
    turn'd away- is not that as good as a hanging to you?
Peace, you rogue, no more o' that.
Make
    your excuse wisely, you were best.
Do you not hear, fellows?
Go to, y'are a dry fool; I'll no more of you.
Besides, you
    grow dishonest.
Sir, I bade them take away you.
Good madonna, give me leave to prove you a fool.
Can you do it?
I must catechize you for it, madonna.
What think you of this fool, Malvolio?
God send you, sir, a speedy infirmity, for the better
    increasing your folly!
Sir Toby will be sworn that I am no fox;
    but he will not pass his word for twopence that you are no fool.
How say you to that, Malvolio?
Look you now, he's out of
    his guard already; unless you laugh and minister occasion to him,  
    he is gagg'd.
O, you are sick of self-love, Malvolio, and taste with a
    distemper'd appetite.
To be generous, guiltless, and of free
    disposition, is to take those things for bird-bolts that you deem
    cannon bullets.
Madam, there is at the gate a young gentleman much desires
    to speak with you.
Fetch him off, I pray you; he speaks nothing but madman.
[Exit MARIA] Go you, Malvolio: if it be a suit from
    the Count, I am sick, or not at home- what you will to dismiss
    it.
[Exit MALVOLIO] Now you see, sir, how your fooling grows old,
    and people dislike it.
Cousin, cousin, how have you come so early by this
    lethargy?
Madam, yond young fellow swears he will speak with you.
I
    told him you were sick; he takes on him to understand so much,
     and therefore comes to speak with you.
I told him you were
    asleep; he seems to have a foreknowledge of that too, and
    therefore comes to speak with you.
Has been told so; and he says he'll stand at your door
    like a sheriff's post, and be the supporter to a bench, but he'll
    speak with you.
Of very ill manner; he'll speak with you, will you or no.
Most radiant, exquisite, and unmatchable beauty- I pray you
    tell me if this be the lady of the house, for I never saw her.
Whence came you, sir?
Good gentle one, give me modest
    assurance if you be the lady of the house, that I may proceed in
    my speech.
Are you a comedian?
Are you the lady of the house?
Most certain, if you are she, you do usurp yourself; for
    what is yours to bestow is not yours to reserve.
I will on with my speech in your praise, and then
    show you the heart of my message.
I forgive you the praise.
It is the more like to be feigned; I pray you keep it in.
I
    heard you were saucy at my gates, and allow'd your approach
    rather to wonder at you than to hear you.
If you be not mad, be
    gone; if you have reason, be brief; 'tis not that time of moon
    with me to make one in so skipping dialogue.
Will you hoist sail, sir?
Sure, you have some hideous matter to deliver, when the
    courtesy of it is so fearful.
Yet you began rudely.
What are you?
What would you?
Have you no more to say?
Have you any commission from your lord to negotiate with my
    face?
You are now out of your text; but we will draw the curtain
    and show you the picture.
[Unveiling] Look you, sir, such a one I
    was this present.
Lady, you are the cruell'st she alive,
    If you will lead these graces to the grave,
    And leave the world no copy.
Were you sent hither to praise me?
I see you what you are: you are too proud;
    But, if you were the devil, you are fair.
My lord and master loves you- O, such love
    Could be but recompens'd though you were crown'd
    The nonpareil of beauty!
If I did love you in my master's flame,
    With such a suff'ring, such a deadly life,
    In your denial I would find no sense;
    I would not understand it.
Why, what would you?
' O, you should not rest
    Between the elements of air and earth  
    But you should pity me!
Get you to your lord.
I cannot love him; let him send no more-
    Unless perchance you come to me again
    To tell me how he takes it.
Fare you well.
I thank you for your pains; spend this for me.
Love make his heart of flint that you shall love;
    And let your fervour, like my master's, be
    Plac'd in contempt!
Will you stay no longer; nor will you not that I go with
    you?
My stars shine darkly over me; the
    malignancy of my fate might perhaps distemper yours; therefore I
    shall crave of you your leave that I may bear my evils alone.
It
    were a bad recompense for your love to lay any of them on you.
Let me know of you whither you are bound.
But I perceive in you so excellent a touch of
    modesty that you will not extort from me what I am willing to
    keep in; therefore it charges me in manners the rather to express
    myself.
You must know of me then, Antonio, my name is Sebastian,
    which I call'd Roderigo; my father was that Sebastian of
    Messaline whom I know you have heard of.
But you, sir, alter'd that;
    for some hour before you took me from the breach of the sea was  
    my sister drown'd.
If you will not murder me for my love, let me be your
    servant.
If you will not undo what you have done- that is, kill
    him whom you have recover'd-desire it not.
Were you not ev'n now with the Countess Olivia?
She returns this ring to you, sir; you might have saved
    me my pains, to have taken it away yourself.
She adds, moreover,
    that you should put your lord into a desperate assurance she will
    none of him.
And one thing more: that you be never so hardy to
    come again in his affairs, unless it be to report your lord's
    taking of this.
Come, sir, you peevishly threw it to her; and her will is
    it should be so return'd.
Did you never see the picture of 'we  
    three'?
Come on, there is sixpence for you.
Would you have a love-song, or a song of good life?
CLOWN sings
  
         O mistress mine, where are you roaming?
An you love me, let's do't.
What a caterwauling do you keep here!
If my lady have not
    call'd up her steward Malvolio, and bid him turn you out of  
    doors, never trust me.
My masters, are you mad?
Or what are you?
Have you no
    wit, manners, nor honesty, but to gabble like tinkers at this
    time of night?
Is there no respect of place, persons, nor
    time, in you?
Sir Toby, I must be round with you.
My lady bade me tell
    you that, though she harbours you as her kins-man, she's nothing
    allied to your disorders.
If you can separate yourself and your
    misdemeanours, you are welcome to the house; if not, and it would
    please you to take leave of her, she is very willing to bid you
    farewell.
[Sings] Sir Toby, there you lie.
This is much credit to you.
[Sings] What an if you do?
[Sings] O, no, no, no, no, you dare not.
Mistress Mary, if you priz'd my lady's favour at anything
    more than contempt, you would not give means for this uncivil
    rule; she shall know of it, by this hand.
Sport royal, I warrant you.
I will plant you two, and let the fool make a third, where
    he shall find the letter; observe his construction of it.
If I do not, never trust me; take it how you will.
Are you ready, sir?
But if she cannot love you, sir?
Sooth, but you must.
Say that some lady, as perhaps there is,
    Hath for your love as great a pang of heart
    As you have for Olivia.
I would exult, man; you know he brought me out o' favour
    with my lady about a bear-baiting here.
And does not Toby take you a blow o' the lips then?
'Besides, you waste the treasure of your time with a
    foolish knight'-
  AGUECHEEK.
That's me, I warrant you.
Ay, an you had any eye behind you, you might see more
    detraction at your heels than fortunes before you.
If you will then see the fruits of the sport, mark his
    first approach before my lady.
If you will see it, follow me.
Troth, sir, I can yield you none without words, and words
    are grown so false I am loath to prove reason with them.
Not so, sir; I do care for something; but in my conscience,
    sir, I do not care for you.
If that be to care for nothing, sir,
    I would it would make you invisible.
I understand you, sir; 'tis well begg'd.
I will construe to
    them whence you come; who you are and what you would are out of
    my welkin- I might say 'element' but the word is overworn.
Save you, gentleman!
And you, sir.
I hope, sir, you are; and I am yours.
Will you encounter the house?
My niece is desirous you
    should enter, if your trade be to her.
My legs do better understand me, sir, than I understand what
    you mean by bidding me taste my legs.
I will answer you with gait and entrance.
Enter OLIVIA and MARIA

    Most excellent accomplish'd lady, the heavens rain odours on you!
O, by your leave, I pray you:
    I bade you never speak again of him;
    But, would you undertake another suit,
    I had rather hear you to solicit that
    Than music from the spheres.
Give me leave, beseech you.
I did send,
    After the last enchantment you did here,
    A ring in chase of you; so did I abuse
    Myself, my servant, and, I fear me, you.
Under your hard construction must I sit,
    To force that on you in a shameful cunning
    Which you knew none of yours.
What might you think?
Have you not set mine honour at the stake,  
    And baited it with all th' unmuzzled thoughts
    That tyrannous heart can think?
So, let me hear you speak.
Be not afraid, good youth; I will not have you;
    And yet, when wit and youth is come to harvest,
    Your wife is like to reap a proper man.
That you do think you are not what you are.
If I think so, I think the same of you.
Then think you right: I am not what I am.
I would you were as I would have you be!
And so adieu, good madam; never more
    Will I my master's tears to you deplore.
As plain as I see you now.
This was a great argument of love in her toward you.
will you make an ass o' me?
She did show favour to the youth in your sight only to
    exasperate you, to awake your dormouse valour, to put fire in
    your heart and brimstone in your liver.
You should then have  
    accosted her; and with some excellent jests, fire-new from the
    mint, you should have bang'd the youth into dumbness.
The double gilt of
    this opportunity you let time wash off, and you are now sail'd
    into the north of my lady's opinion; where you will hang like an
    icicle on Dutchman's beard, unless you do redeem it by some
    laudable attempt either of valour or policy.
Will either of you bear me a challenge to him?
Where shall I find you?
This is a dear manakin to you, Sir Toby.
We shall have a rare letter from him; but you'll not
    deliver't?
For Andrew, if he were open'd and you find so much
    blood in his liver as will clog the foot of a flea, I'll eat the
    rest of th' anatomy.
If you desire the spleen, and will laugh yourselves into
    stitches, follow me.
I would not by my will have troubled you;
    But since you make your pleasure of your pains,
    I will no further chide you.
I could not stay behind you: my desire,
    More sharp than filed steel, did spur me forth;
    And not all love to see you- though so much
    As might have drawn one to a longer voyage-
    But jealousy what might befall your travel,
    Being skilless in these parts; which to a stranger,
    Unguided and unfriended, often prove
    Rough and unhospitable.
I am not weary, and 'tis long to night;
    I pray you, let us satisfy our eyes
    With the memorials and the things of fame
    That do renown this city.
Would you'd pardon me.
Belike you slew great number of his people.
I will bespeak our diet,
    Whiles you beguile the time and feed your knowledge
    With viewing of the town; there shall you have me.
I'll be your purse-bearer, and leave you for
    An hour.
Your ladyship were
    best to have some guard about you if he come; for sure the man is
    tainted in's wits.
How do you, Malvolio?
Why appear you with this ridiculous boldness before my lady?
do you come near me now?
How is't with you, sir?
How is't with you, man?
Go off; I discard you.
Did not I tell
    you?
Sir Toby, my lady prays you to have a care of him.
How do you, Malvolio?
How is't with you?
Do you know what you say?
La you, an you speak ill of the devil, how he takes it at
    heart!
Do you not
    see you move him?
No, I warrant you, he will not hear of godliness.
You are idle shallow things; I
    am not of your element; you shall know more hereafter.
A good note; that keeps you from the blow of the law.
Still you keep o' th' windy side of the law.
Refuse it not; it hath no tongue to vex you.
And I beseech you come again to-morrow.
What shall you ask of me that I'll deny,
    That honour sav'd may upon asking give?
How with mine honour may I give him that
    Which I have given to you?
I will acquit you.
And you, sir.
You'll find it otherwise, I assure you; therefore, if you
    hold your life at any price, betake you to your guard; for your
    opposite hath in him what youth, strength, skill, and wrath, can
    furnish man withal.
I pray you, sir, what is he?
Sir, no; his indignation derives itself out of a very
    competent injury; therefore, get you on and give him his desire.
Back you shall not to the house, unless you undertake that with
    me which with as much safety you might answer him; therefore on,
    or strip your sword stark naked; for meddle you must, that's
    certain, or forswear to wear iron about you.
I beseech you do me this
    courteous office as to know of the knight what my offence to him
    is: it is something of my negligence, nothing of my purpose.
Signior Fabian, stay you by this gentleman
    till my return.
Pray you, sir, do you know of this matter?
I know the knight is incens'd against you, even to a mortal
    arbitrement; but nothing of the circumstance more.
I beseech you, what manner of man is he?
Nothing of that wonderful promise, to read him by his form,
    as you are like to find him in the proof of his valour.
He is
    indeed, sir, the most skilful, bloody, and fatal opposite that
    you could possibly have found in any part of Illyria.
Will you
    walk towards him?
I shall be much bound to you for't.
I had a pass with him, rapier, scabbard, and all, and he
    gives me the stuck in with such a mortal motion that it is
    inevitable; and on the answer, he pays you as surely as your feet
    hit the ground they step on.
[Aside] Marry,
    I'll ride your horse as well as I ride you.
[To VIOLA] There's no remedy, sir: he will fight with you
    for's oath sake.
Therefore draw for the supportance of his vow; he protests he
    will not hurt you.
Give ground if you see him furious.
Come, Sir Andrew, there's no remedy; the gentleman will,
    for his honour's sake, have one bout with you; he cannot by the
    duello avoid it; but he has promis'd me, as he is a gentleman and  
    a soldier, he will not hurt you.
I do assure you 'tis against my will.
If this young gentleman
    Have done offence, I take the fault on me:
    If you offend him, I for him defy you.
Why, what are you?
One, sir, that for his love dares yet do more
    Than you have heard him brag to you he will.
Nay, if you be an undertaker, I am for you.
[To ANTONIO] I'll be with you anon.
Pray, sir, put your sword up, if you please.
Marry, will I, sir; and for that I promis'd you, I'll be
    as good as my word.
He will bear you easily and reins well.
No, sir, no jot; I know your favour well,
    Though now you have no sea-cap on your head.
[To VIOLA] This comes with seeking you;
    But there's no remedy; I shall answer it.
What will you do, now my necessity
    Makes me to ask you for my purse?
It grieves me
    Much more for what I cannot do for you
    Than what befalls myself.
I must entreat of you some of that money.
For the fair kindness you have show'd me here,  
    And part being prompted by your present trouble,
    Out of my lean and low ability
    I'll lend you something.
My having is not much;
    I'll make division of my present with you;
    Hold, there's half my coffer.
Will you deny me now?
Is't possible that my deserts to you
    Can lack persuasion?
Do not tempt my misery,
    Lest that it make me so unsound a man
    As to upbraid you with those kindnesses
    That I have done for you.
I know of none,
    Nor know I you by voice or any feature.
Come, sir, I pray you go.
This youth that you see here  
    I snatch'd one half out of the jaws of death,
    Reliev'd him with such sanctity of love,
    And to his image, which methought did promise
    Most venerable worth, did I devotion.
Prove true, imagination, O, prove true,
    That I, dear brother, be now ta'en for you!
Will you make me believe that I am not sent for you?
No, I do not know you; nor I am not
    sent to you by my lady, to bid you come speak with her; nor your
    name is not Master Cesario; nor this is not my nose neither.
I prithee, foolish Greek, depart from me;
    There's money for thee; if you tarry longer
    I shall give worse payment.
Now, sir, have I met you again?
[Striking SEBASTIAN] There's for you.
Come, sir, I will not let you go.
Come, my young soldier,
    put up your iron; you are well flesh'd.
Nay, then I must have an ounce or two of this
    malapert blood from you.
I say to you this house is dark.
I am no more mad than you are; make the trial of it
    in any constant question.
Alas, sir, how fell you besides your five wits?
Then you are mad indeed, if you be no better in
    your wits than a fool.
Advise you what.
you say: the minister is here.
God buy you, good Sir Topas.
What say you, sir?
I am shent for
    speaking to you.
Well-a-day that you were, sir!
I will help you to't.
But tell me true, are you not mad
    indeed, or do you but counterfeit?
I will fetch you light and paper and ink.
[Singing]
                   I am gone, sir,
                   And anon, sir,
                 I'll be with you again,
                   In a trice,
                   Like to the old Vice,
                 Your need to sustain;

                 Who with dagger of lath,  
                 In his rage and his wrath,
                   Cries, Ah, ha!
If you mean well,
    Now go with me and with this holy man
    Into the chantry by; there, before him
    And underneath that consecrated roof,
    Plight me the fun assurance of your faith,
    That my most jealous and too doubtful soul
    May live at peace.
He shall conceal it
    Whiles you are willing it shall come to note,
    What time we will our celebration keep
    According to my birth.
What do you say?
I'll follow this good man, and go with you;
    And, having sworn truth, ever will be true.
Belong you to the Lady Olivia, friends?
By my troth, sir, no; though it please you to be one of my
    friends.
But that it would be double-dealing, sir, I would you could
    make it another.
O, you give me ill counsel.
' The triplex, sir, is a good tripping
    measure; or the bells of Saint Bennet, sir, may put you in mind-  
    one, two, three.
You can fool no more money out of me at this throw; if you
    will let your lady know I am here to speak with her, and bring
    her along with you, it may awake my bounty further.
I go,
    sir; but I would not have you to think that my desire of having
    is the sin of covetousness.
But, as you say, sir, let your bounty
    take a nap; I will awake it anon.
Orsino, noble sir,
    Be pleas'd that I shake off these names you give me:
    Antonio never yet was thief or pirate,
    Though I confess, on base and ground enough,
    Orsino's enemy.
Cesario, you do not keep promise with me.
What do you say, Cesario?
But hear me this:
    Since you to non-regardance cast my faith,
    And that I partly know the instrument
    That screws me from my true place in your favour,
    Live you the marble-breasted tyrant still;
    But this your minion, whom I know you love,
    And whom, by heaven I swear, I tender dearly,
    Him will I tear out of that cruel eye
    Where he sits crowned in his master's spite.
And I, most jocund, apt, and willingly,  
    To do you rest, a thousand deaths would die.
If I do feign, you witnesses above
    Punish my life for tainting of my love!
Who does beguile you?
Who does do you wrong?
Why do you speak to me?
I never hurt you.
You drew your sword upon me without cause;
    But I bespake you fair and hurt you not.
If a bloody coxcomb be a hurt, you have hurt me; I think
    you set nothing by a bloody coxcomb.
Here comes Sir Toby halting;
    you shall hear more; but if he had not been in drink, he would
    have tickl'd you othergates than he did.
How is't with you?
I'll help you, Sir Toby, because we'll be dress'd
    together.
Will you help- an ass-head and a coxcomb and a knave, a
    thin fac'd knave, a gull?
You throw a strange regard upon me, and by that
    I do perceive it hath offended you.
Sebastian are you?
How have you made division of yourself?
Of charity, what kin are you to me?
Were you a woman, as the rest goes even,
    I should my tears let fall upon your cheek,
    And say 'Thrice welcome, drowned Viola!
If nothing lets to make us happy both
    But this my masculine usurp'd attire,
    Do not embrace me till each circumstance
    Of place, time, fortune, do cohere and jump
    That I am Viola; which to confirm,
    I'll bring you to a captain in this town,
    Where lie my maiden weeds; by whose gentle help
    I was preserv'd to serve this noble Count.
[To OLIVIA] So Comes it, lady, you have been mistook;
    But nature to her bias drew in that.
You would have been contracted to a maid;
    Nor are you therein, by my life, deceiv'd;
    You are betroth'd both to a maid and man.
Has here writ a letter to you; I
    should have given 't you to-day morning, but as a madman's
    epistles are no gospels, so it skills not much when they are
    deliver'd.
An your ladyship will have
    it as it ought to be, you must allow vox.
[To FABIAN] Read it you, sirrah.
[Reads] 'By the Lord, madam, you wrong me, and the world
    shall know it.
Though you have put me into darkness and given
    your drunken cousin rule over me, yet have I the benefit of my
    senses as well as your ladyship.
I have your own letter that
    induced me to the semblance I put on, with the which I doubt not
    but to do myself much right or you much shame.
Think of me as you
    please.
Exit FABIAN
    My lord, so please you, these things further thought on,
    To think me as well a sister as a wife,
    One day shall crown th' alliance on't, so please you,
    Here at my house, and at my proper cost.
[To VIOLA] Your master quits you; and, for your service done
      him,
    So much against the mettle of your sex,
    So far beneath your soft and tender breeding,
    And since you call'd me master for so long,
    Here is my hand; you shall from this time be
    You master's mistress.
Madam, you have done me wrong,
    Notorious wrong.
Lady, you have.
Pray you peruse that letter.
You must not now deny it is your hand;
    Write from it if you can, in hand or phrase;
    Or say 'tis not your seal, not your invention;
    You can say none of this.
Well, grant it then,
    And tell me, in the modesty of honour,
    Why you have given me such clear lights of favour,
    Bade me come smiling and cross-garter'd to you,
    To put on yellow stockings, and to frown
    Upon Sir Toby and the lighter people;
    And, acting this in an obedient hope,
    Why have you suffer'd me to be imprison'd,
    Kept in a dark house, visited by the priest,
    And made the most notorious geck and gul
    That e'er invention play'd on?
' But do you remember- 'Madam, why laugh you
    at such a barren rascal?
An you smile not, he's gagg'd'?
I'll be reveng'd on the whole pack of you.
Cesario, come;
    For so you shall be while you are a man;  
    But when in other habits you are seen,
    Orsino's mistress, and his fancy's queen.
A great while ago the world begun,
             With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,
           But that's all one, our play is done,
           And we'll strive to please you every day.
'Tis true; for you are over boots in love,
    And yet you never swum the Hellespont.
So, by your circumstance, you call me fool.
So, by your circumstance, I fear you'll prove.
'Tis love you cavil at; I am not Love.
Love is your master, for he masters you;
    And he that is so yoked by a fool,
    Methinks, should not be chronicled for wise.
As much to you at home; and so farewell!
Sir Proteus, save you!
Saw you my master?
If the ground be overcharg'd, you were best stick her.
Nay, in that you are astray: 'twere best pound you.
You mistook, sir; I say she did nod; and you ask me if she
    did nod; and I say 'Ay.
Now you have taken the pains to set it together, take it for
    your pains.
No, no; you shall have it for bearing the letter.
Well, I perceive I must be fain to bear with you.
Why, sir, how do you bear with me?
Beshrew me, but you have a quick wit.
Truly, sir, I think you'll hardly win her.
Sir, I could perceive nothing at all from her; no, not so
    much as a ducat for delivering your letter; and being so hard to
    me that brought your mind, I fear she'll prove as hard to you in
    telling your mind.
' To testify  
    your bounty, I thank you, you have testern'd me; in requital
    whereof, henceforth carry your letters yourself; and so, sir,
    I'll commend you to my master.
Ay, madam; so you stumble not unheedfully.
Please you, repeat their names; I'll show my mind
    According to my shallow simple skill.
As of a knight well-spoken, neat, and fine;
    But, were I you, he never should be mine.
Ay, if you thought your love not cast away.
He would have given it you; but I, being in the way,
    Did in your name receive it; pardon the fault, I pray.
Dare you presume to harbour wanton lines?
Now, trust me, 'tis an office of great worth,
    And you an officer fit for the place.
That you may ruminate.
I would it were,
    That you might kill your stomach on your meat
    And not upon your maid.
What is't that you took up so gingerly?
Some love of yours hath writ to you in rhyme.
Ay; and melodious were it, would you sing it.
And why not you?
Keep tune there still, so you will sing it out.
Nay, now you are too flat
    And mar the concord with too harsh a descant;
    There wanteth but a mean to fill your song.
[Tears the letter]
    Go, get you gone; and let the papers lie.
Thus will I fold them one upon another;  
    Now kiss, embrace, contend, do what you will.
If you respect them, best to take them up.
I see you have a month's mind to them.
Ay, madam, you may say what sights you see;
    I see things too, although you judge I wink.
Come, come; will't please you go?
Tell me, Panthino, what sad talk was that
    Wherewith my brother held you in the cloister?
For any, or for all these exercises,
    He said that Proteus, your son, was meet;
    And did request me to importune you
    To let him spend his time no more at home,
    Which would be great impeachment to his age,
    In having known no travel in his youth.
To-morrow, may it please you, Don Alphonso
    With other gentlemen of good esteem
    Are journeying to salute the Emperor,
    And to commend their service to his will.
What letter are you reading there?
And how stand you affected to his wish?
My lord, I cannot be so soon provided;
    Please you, deliberate a day or two.
Come on, Panthino; you shall be employ'd
    To hasten on his expedition.
Sir Proteus, your father calls for you;
    He is in haste; therefore, I pray you, go.
Why, sir, who bade you call her?
Well, you'll still be too forward.
Go to, sir; tell me, do you know Madam Silvia?
Why, how know you that I am in love?
Marry, by these special marks: first, you have learn'd, like  
    Sir Proteus, to wreath your arms like a malcontent; to relish a
    love-song, like a robin redbreast; to walk alone, like one that
    had the pestilence; to sigh, like a school-boy that had lost his
    A B C; to weep, like a young wench that had buried her grandam;
    to fast, like one that takes diet; to watch, like one that fears
    robbing; to speak puling, like a beggar at Hallowmas.
You were
    wont, when you laughed, to crow like a cock; when you walk'd, to
    walk like one of the lions; when you fasted, it was presently
    after dinner; when you look'd sadly, it was for want of money.
And now you are metamorphis'd with a mistress, that, when I look
    on you, I can hardly think you my master.
Without you!
Nay, that's certain; for, without you were so
    simple, none else would; but you are so without these follies
    that these follies are within you, and shine through you like the
    water in an urinal, that not an eye that sees you but is a
    physician to comment on your malady.
She that you gaze on so, as she sits at supper?
That she is not so fair as, of you, well-favour'd.
Ever since you lov'd her.
If you love her, you cannot see her.
O that you had mine eyes; or your own
    eyes had the lights they were wont to have when you chid at Sir
    Proteus for going ungarter'd!
Your own present folly and her passing deformity; for he,
    being in love, could not see to garter his hose; and you, being
    in love, cannot see to put on your hose.
Belike, boy, then you are in love; for last morning you
    could not see to wipe my shoes.
I thank you, you
    swing'd me for my love, which makes me the bolder to chide you
    for yours.
I would you were set, so your affection would cease.
And have you?
Sir Valentine and servant, to you two thousand.
As you enjoin'd me, I have writ your letter
    Unto the secret nameless friend of yours;
    Which I was much unwilling to proceed in,
    But for my duty to your ladyship.
I thank you, gentle servant.
Perchance you think too much of so much pains?
No, madam; so it stead you, I will write,
    Please you command, a thousand times as much;
    And yet-
  SILVIA.
And yet take this again- and yet I thank you-
    Meaning henceforth to trouble you no more.
[Aside]  And yet you will; and yet another' yet.
Do you not like it?
Madam, they are for you.
Ay, ay, you writ them, sir, at my request;
    But I will none of them; they are for you:  
    I would have had them writ more movingly.
Please you, I'll write your ladyship another.
And when it's writ, for my sake read it over;
    And if it please you, so; if not, why, so.
Why, if it please you, take it for your labour.
What are you reasoning with yourself?
Nay, I was rhyming: 'tis you that have the reason.
To yourself; why, she woos you by a figure.
What need she, when she hath made you write to yourself?
Why, do you not perceive the jest?
No believing you indeed, sir.
But did you perceive her
    earnest?
Why, she hath given you a letter.
I'll warrant you 'tis as well.
'For often have you writ to her; and she, in modesty,
    Or else for want of idle time, could not again reply;
    Or fearing else some messenger that might her mind discover,
    Herself hath taught her love himself to write unto her lover.
Why muse you,
    sir?
If you turn not, you will return the sooner.
Here, take you this.
Sir Proteus, you are stay'd for.
A Jew would have
    wept to have seen our parting; why, my grandam having no eyes,
    look you, wept herself blind at my parting.
Nay, I'll show you
    the manner of it.
Now, sir, this staff is my sister,
    for, look you, she is as white as a lily and as small as a wand;  
    this hat is Nan our maid; I am the dog; no, the dog is himself,
    and I am the dog- O, the dog is me, and I am myself; ay, so, so.
You'll lose the tide if you tarry any
    longer.
Master, Sir Thurio frowns on you.
Not of you.
'Twere good you knock'd him.
Servant, you are sad.
Seem you that you are not?
So do you.
And how quote you my folly?
Do you change colour?
I know it well, sir; you always end ere you begin.
Yourself, sweet lady; for you gave the fire.
Sir, if you spend word for word with me, I shall make your
    wit bankrupt.
I know it well, sir; you have an exchequer of words,
    and, I think, no other treasure to give your followers; for it
    appears by their bare liveries that they live by your bare words.
Now, daughter Silvia, you are hard beset.
What say you to a letter from your friends
    Of much good news?
I think 'tis no unwelcome news to you.
Welcome him, then, according to his worth-
    Silvia, I speak to you, and you, Sir Thurio;
    For Valentine, I need not cite him to it.
I will send him hither to you presently.
Nay, then, he should be blind; and, being blind,
    How could he see his way to seek out you?
Mistress, I beseech you
    Confirm his welcome with some special favour.
His worth is warrant for his welcome hither,
    If this be he you oft have wish'd to hear from.
Servant, you are welcome to a worthless mistress.
That you are welcome?
That you are worthless.
Madam, my lord your father would speak with you.
I'll leave you to confer of home affairs;
    When you have done we look to hear from you.
Now, tell me, how do all from whence you came?
My tales of love were wont to weary you;
    I know you joy not in a love-discourse.
Was this the idol that you worship so?
When I was sick you gave me bitter pills,
    And I must minister the like to you.
But she loves you?
Go on before; I shall enquire you forth;
    I must unto the road to disembark
    Some necessaries that I needs must use;  
    And then I'll presently attend you.
Will you make haste?
Come on, you madcap; I'll to the alehouse with you
    presently; where, for one shot of five pence, thou shalt have
    five thousand welcomes.
But in what habit will you go along?
That fits as well as 'Tell me, good my lord,
    What compass will you wear your farthingale.
A round hose, madam, now's not worth a pin,
    Unless you have a codpiece to stick pins on.
If you think so, then stay at home and go not.
If Proteus like your journey when you come,
    No matter who's displeas'd when you are gone.
Pray heav'n he prove so when you come to him.
I know you have determin'd to bestow her
    On Thurio, whom your gentle daughter hates;
    And should she thus be stol'n away from you,
    It would be much vexation to your age.
Thus, for my duty's sake, I rather chose  
    To cross my friend in his intended drift
    Than, by concealing it, heap on your head
    A pack of sorrows which would press you down,
    Being unprevented, to your timeless grave.
Know, noble lord, they have devis'd a mean
    How he her chamber window will ascend
    And with a corded ladder fetch her down;
    For which the youthful lover now is gone,
    And this way comes he with it presently;
    Where, if it please you, you may intercept him.
But, good my lord, do it so cunningly
    That my discovery be not aimed at;
    For love of you, not hate unto my friend,
    Hath made me publisher of this pretence.
If she do frown, 'tis not in hate of you,
    But rather to beget more love in you;
    If she do chide, 'tis not to have you gone,
    For why, the fools are mad if left alone.
Take no repulse, whatever she doth say;
    For 'Get you gone' she doth not mean 'Away!
When would you use it?
By seven o'clock I'll get you such a ladder.
It will be light, my lord, that you may bear it
    Under a cloak that is of any length.
I pray you-
  PROTEUS.
Sir, there is a proclamation that you are vanished.
I am but a fool, look you, and yet I have the wit to think
    my master is a kind of a knave; but that's all one if he be but
    one knave.
' Look you, a sweet virtue in a maid
    with clean hands.
And thereof comes the proverb: Blessing of your heart, you
    brew good ale.
Sir Thurio, fear not but that she will love you
    Now Valentine is banish'd from her sight.
Then you must undertake to slander him.
Therefore, as you unwind her love from him,
    Lest it should ravel and be good to none,
    You must provide to bottom it on me;
    Which must be done by praising me as much  
    As you in worth dispraise Sir Valentine.
And, Proteus, we dare trust you in this kind,
    Because we know, on Valentine's report,
    You are already Love's firm votary
    And cannot soon revolt and change your mind.
Upon this warrant shall you have access
    Where you with Silvia may confer at large-
    For she is lumpish, heavy, melancholy,
    And, for your friend's sake, will be glad of you-
    Where you may temper her by your persuasion
    To hate young Valentine and love my friend.
But you, Sir Thurio, are not sharp enough;
    You must lay lime to tangle her desires
    By wailful sonnets, whose composed rhymes
    Should be full-fraught with serviceable vows.
I will pardon you.
Stand, sir, and throw us that you have about ye;
    If not, we'll make you sit, and rifle you.
Then know that I have little wealth to lose;
    A man I am cross'd with adversity;
    My riches are these poor habiliments,
    Of which if you should here disfurnish me,  
    You take the sum and substance that I have.
Whither travel you?
Whence came you?
Have you long sojourn'd there?
What, were you banish'd thence?
But were you banish'd for so small a fault?
Have you the tongues?
Tell us this: have you anything to take to?
But to the purpose- for we cite our faults
    That they may hold excus'd our lawless lives;
    And, partly, seeing you are beautified  
    With goodly shape, and by your own report
    A linguist, and a man of such perfection
    As we do in our quality much want-
  SECOND OUTLAW.
Indeed, because you are a banish'd man,
    Therefore, above the rest, we parley to you.
Are you content to be our general-
    To make a virtue of necessity,
    And live as we do in this wilderness?
I take your offer, and will live with you,
    Provided that you do no outrages
    On silly women or poor passengers.
How now, Sir Proteus, are you crept before us?
Ay, gentle Thurio; for you know that love
    Will creep in service where it cannot go.
Ay, but I hope, sir, that you love not here.
I thank you for your own.
Now, my young guest, methinks you're allycholly; I pray you,
    why is it?
Come, we'll have you merry; I'll bring you where you shall
    hear music, and see the gentleman that you ask'd for.
Ay, that you shall.
How now, are you sadder than you were before?
How do you, man?
The music likes you not.
I perceive you delight not in music.
I tell you what Launce, his man, told me: he lov'd her out of
    all nick.
Sir Thurio, fear not you; I will so plead
    That you shall say my cunning drift excels.
I thank you for your music, gentlemen.
One, lady, if you knew his pure heart's truth,
    You would quickly learn to know him by his voice.
You have your wish; my will is even this,
    That presently you hie you home to bed.
[Aside]  If 'twere a substance, you would, sure, deceive it
    And make it but a shadow, as I am.
I am very loath to be your idol, sir;
    But since your falsehood shall become you well
    To worship shadows and adore false shapes,
    Send to me in the morning, and I'll send it;
    And so, good rest.
Host, will you go?
Pray you, where lies Sir Proteus?
Madam, I pity much your grievances;
    Which since I know they virtuously are plac'd,
    I give consent to go along with you,
    Recking as little what betideth me
    As much I wish all good befortune you.
When will you go?
Where shall I meet you?
When a man's servant shall play the cur with him, look you,
    it goes hard- one that I brought up of a puppy; one that I sav'd
    from drowning, when three or four of his blind brothers and
    sisters went to it.
'Friend,' quoth I 'you mean to whip the dog.
'You do him the more wrong,' quoth I; "twas I did the
    thing you wot of.
Nay, I remember the trick
    you serv'd me when I took my leave of Madam Silvia.
In what you please; I'll do what I can.
[To LAUNCE]  How now, you whoreson
      peasant!
Where have you been these two days loitering?
Marry, sir, I carried Mistress Silvia the dog you bade me.
Marry, she says your dog was a cur, and tells you currish
    thanks is good enough for such a present.
It seems you lov'd not her, to leave her token.
Because methinks that she lov'd you as well  
    As you do love your lady Silvia.
I pray you be my mean
    To bring me where to speak with Madam Silvia.
What would you with her, if that I be she?
If you be she, I do entreat your patience
    To hear me speak the message I am sent on.
O, he sends you for a picture?
Madam, please you peruse this letter.
Pardon me, madam; I have unadvis'd
    Deliver'd you a paper that I should not.
She thanks you.
I thank you, madam, that you tender her.
When she did think my master lov'd her well,
    She, in my judgment, was as fair as you;
    But since she did neglect her looking-glass
    And threw her sun-expelling mask away,
    The air hath starv'd the roses in her cheeks
    And pinch'd the lily-tincture of her face,
    That now she is become as black as I.
And she shall thank you for't, if e'er you know her.
Ill, when you talk of war.
[Aside]  But better, indeed, when you hold your peace.
That you are well deriv'd.
Which of you saw Sir Eglamour of late?
Saw you my daughter?
These likelihoods confirm her flight from hence;
    Therefore, I pray you, stand not to discourse,
    But mount you presently, and meet with me
    Upon the rising of the mountain foot
    That leads toward Mantua, whither they are fled.
Be patient; we must bring you to our captain.
Come, I must bring you to our captain's cave;
    Fear not; he bears an honourable mind,
    And will not use a woman lawlessly.
Madam, this service I have done for you,
    Though you respect not aught your servant doth,
    To hazard life, and rescue you from him
    That would have forc'd your honour and your love.
Vouchsafe me, for my meed, but one fair look;
    A smaller boon than this I cannot beg,
    And less than this, I am sure, you cannot give.
Unhappy were you, madam, ere I came;
    But by my coming I have made you happy.
Nay, if the gentle spirit of moving words
    Can no way change you to a milder form,
    I'll woo you like a soldier, at arms' end,
    And love you 'gainst the nature of love- force ye.
O, cry you mercy, sir, I have mistook;
    This is the ring you sent to Silvia.
I now beseech you, for your daughter's sake,
    To grant one boon that I shall ask of you.
What think you of this page, my lord?
I warrant you, my lord- more grace than boy.
What mean you by that saying?
Please you, I'll tell you as we pass along,
    That you will wonder what hath fortuned.
If you shall chance, Camillo, to visit Bohemia, on the
    like occasion whereon my services are now on foot, you shall see,
    as I have said, great difference betwixt our Bohemia and your
    Sicilia.
Beseech you-
  ARCHIDAMUS.
We will give you sleepy drinks, that your senses,
    unintelligent of our insufficience, may, though they cannot
    praise us, as little accuse us.
I very well agree with you in the hopes of him.
And therefore, like a cipher,
    Yet standing in rich place, I multiply
    With one 'We thank you' many thousands moe
    That go before it.
Stay your thanks a while,
    And pay them when you part.
We are tougher, brother,
    Than you can put us to't.
Press me not, beseech you, so.
My affairs
    Do even drag me homeward; which to hinder
    Were in your love a whip to me; my stay
    To you a charge and trouble.
Speak you.
Tell him you are sure
    All in Bohemia's well- this satisfaction
    The by-gone day proclaim'd.
Nay, but you will?
You put me off with limber vows; but I,
    Though you would seek t' unsphere the stars with oaths,
    Should yet say 'Sir, no going.
Force me to keep you as a prisoner,
    Not like a guest; so you shall pay your fees
    When you depart, and save your thanks.
How say you?
By your dread 'verily,'
    One of them you shall be.
Your guest, then, madam:
    To be your prisoner should import offending;
    Which is for me less easy to commit
    Than you to punish.
Come, I'll question you
    Of my lord's tricks and yours when you were boys.
Of this make no conclusion, lest you say
    Your queen and I are devils.
Yet, go on;
    Th' offences we have made you do we'll answer,
    If you first sinn'd with us, and that with us
    You did continue fault, and that you slipp'd not
    With any but with us.
Our praises are our wages; you may ride's
    With one soft kiss a thousand furlongs ere  
    With spur we heat an acre.
It has an elder sister,
    Or I mistake you.
Why, lo you now, I have spoke to th' purpose twice:
    The one for ever earn'd a royal husband;
    Th' other for some while a friend.
- How now, you wanton calf,
    Art thou my calf?
Yes, if you will, my lord.
How is't with you, best brother?
You look
    As if you held a brow of much distraction.
Are you mov'd, my lord?
Mine honest friend,
    Will you take eggs for money?
My brother,
    Are you so fond of your young prince as we  
    Do seem to be of ours?
We two will walk, my lord,
    And leave you to your graver steps.
If you would seek us,
    We are yours i' th' garden.
Shall's attend you there?
To your own bents dispose you; you'll be found,
    Be you beneath the sky.
[Aside]  I am angling now,
    Though you perceive me not how I give line.
I am like you, they say.
You had much ado to make his anchor hold;
    When you cast out, it still came home.
Ha' not you seen, Camillo-
    But that's past doubt; you have, or your eye-glass
    Is thicker than a cuckold's horn- or heard-
    For to a vision so apparent rumour
    Cannot be mute- or thought- for cogitation
    Resides not in that man that does not think-
    My wife is slippery?
You never spoke what did become you less
    Than this; which to reiterate were sin
    As deep as that, though true.
It is; you lie, you lie.
I must believe you, sir.
Do you know, and dare not
    Be intelligent to me?
'Tis thereabouts;
    For, to yourself, what you do know, you must,
    And cannot say you dare not.
There is a sickness
    Which puts some of us in distemper; but
    I cannot name the disease; and it is caught
    Of you that yet are well.
Camillo-
    As you are certainly a gentleman; thereto
    Clerk-like experienc'd, which no less adorns
    Our gentry than our parents' noble names,
    In whose success we are gentle- I beseech you,
    If you know aught which does behove my knowledge
    Thereof to be inform'd, imprison't not
    In ignorant concealment.
Sir, I will tell you;
    Since I am charg'd in honour, and by him
    That I think honourable.
I am appointed him to murder you.
He thinks, nay, with all confidence he swears,
    As he had seen 't or been an instrument
    To vice you to't, that you have touch'd his queen
    Forbiddenly.
Swear his thought over
    By each particular star in heaven and
    By all their influences, you may as well
    Forbid the sea for to obey the moon
    As or by oath remove or counsel shake
    The fabric of his folly, whose foundation
    Is pil'd upon his faith and will continue
    The standing of his body.
If therefore you dare trust my honesty,
    That lies enclosed in this trunk which you
    Shall bear along impawn'd, away to-night.
Be not uncertain,
    For, by the honour of my parents, I
    Have utt'red truth; which if you seek to prove,
    I dare not stand by; nor shall you be safer
    Than one condemn'd by the King's own mouth, thereon
    His execution sworn.
Take the boy to you; he so troubles me,
    'Tis past enduring.
No, I'll none of you.
I love you better.
We shall
    Present our services to a fine new prince
    One of these days; and then you'd wanton with us,
    If we would have you.
What wisdom stirs amongst you?
Come, sir, now
    I am for you again.
Pray you sit by us,
    And tell's a tale.
As merry as you will.
Come on, sit down; come on, and do your best
    To fright me with your sprites; you're pow'rfull at it.
I am glad you did not nurse him;
    Though he does bear some signs of me, yet you
    Have too much blood in him.
But I'd say he had not,
    And I'll be sworn you would believe my saying,
    Howe'er you lean to th' nayward.
-
    That mercy does, for calumny will sear
    Virtue itself- these shrugs, these hum's and ha's,
    When you have said she's goodly, come between,
    Ere you can say she's honest.
Should a villain say so,
    The most replenish'd villain in the world,
    He were as much more villain: you, my lord,
    Do but mistake.
How will this grieve you,
    When you shall come to clearer knowledge, that
    You thus have publish'd me!
Beseech you all, my lords,
    With thoughts so qualified as your charities
    Shall best instruct you, measure me; and so
    The King's will be perform'd!
Beseech your highness
    My women may be with me, for you see
    My plight requires it.
Do not weep, good fools;
    There is no cause; when you shall know your mistress
    Has deserv'd prison, then abound in tears
    As I come out: this action I now go on
    Is for my better grace.
I never wish'd to see you sorry; now
    I trust I shall.
My women, come; you have leave.
Be certain what you do, sir, lest your justice
    Prove violence, in the which three great ones suffer,
    Yourself, your queen, your son.
For her, my lord,
    I dare my life lay down- and will do't, sir,
    Please you t' accept it- that the Queen is spotless
    I' th' eyes of heaven and to you- I mean
    In this which you accuse her.
It is for you we speak, not for ourselves.
You smell this business with a sense as cold
    As is a dead man's nose; but I do see't and feel't
    As you feel doing thus; and see withal
    The instruments that feel.
I had rather you did lack than I, my lord,
    Upon this ground; and more it would content me
    To have her honour true than your suspicion,
    Be blam'd for't how you might.
Why, what need we  
    Commune with you of this, but rather follow
    Our forceful instigation?
Our prerogative
    Calls not your counsels; but our natural goodness
    Imparts this; which, if you- or stupified
    Or seeming so in skill- cannot or will not
    Relish a truth like us, inform yourselves
    We need no more of your advice.
Yet, for a greater confirmation-
    For, in an act of this importance, 'twere
    Most piteous to be wild- I have dispatch'd in post
    To sacred Delphos, to Apollo's temple,
    Cleomenes and Dion, whom you know
    Of stuff'd sufficiency.
Re-enter GENTLEMAN with the GAOLER

    Now, good sir,
    You know me, do you not?
Pray you, then,
    Conduct me to the Queen.
Is't lawful, pray you,
    To see her women- any of them?
So please you, madam,
    To put apart these your attendants,
    Shall bring Emilia forth.
The Queen receives
    Much comfort in't; says 'My poor prisoner,
    I am as innocent as you.
Pray you, Emilia,
    Commend my best obedience to the Queen;
    If she dares trust me with her little babe,
    I'll show't the King, and undertake to be
    Her advocate to th' loud'st.
Now be you blest for it!
Please you come something nearer.
Do not you fear.
Upon mine honour, I
    Will stand betwixt you and danger.
Fear you his tyrannous passion more, alas,
    Than the Queen's life?
'Tis such as you,
    That creep like shadows by him, and do sigh
    At each his needless heavings- such as you
    Nourish the cause of his awaking: I
    Do come with words as medicinal as true,
    Honest as either, to purge him of that humour
    That presses him from sleep.
I told her so, my lord,
    On your displeasure's peril, and on mine,
    She should not visit you.
From all dishonesty he can: in this,
    Unless he take the course that you have done-
    Commit me for committing honour- trust it,
    He shall not rule me.
La you now, you hear!
Good my liege, I come-
    And I beseech you hear me, who professes
    Myself your loyal servant, your physician,
    Your most obedient counsellor; yet that dares
    Less appear so, in comforting your evils,
    Than such as most seem yours- I say I come
    From your good Queen.
Good Queen, my lord, good Queen- I say good Queen;
    And would by combat make her good, so were I
    A man, the worst about you.
The good Queen,
    For she is good, hath brought you forth a daughter;
    Here 'tis; commends it to your blessing.
I am as ignorant in that as you
    In so entitling me; and no less honest
    Than you are mad; which is enough, I'll warrant,
    As this world goes, to pass for honest.
Will you not push her out?
So I would you did; then 'twere past all doubt
    You'd call your children yours.
And, might we lay th' old proverb to your charge,
    So like you 'tis the worse.
Hang all the husbands  
    That cannot do that feat, you'll leave yourself
    Hardly one subject.
I'll not call you tyrant
    But this most cruel usage of your Queen-
    Not able to produce more accusation
    Than your own weak-hing'd fancy- something savours
    Of tyranny, and will ignoble make you,
    Yea, scandalous to the world.
I pray you, do not push me; I'll be gone.
You that are thus so tender o'er his follies
    Will never do him good, not one of you.
We have always truly serv'd you; and beseech
    So to esteem of us; and on our knees we beg,
    As recompense of our dear services
    Past and to come, that you do change this purpose,
    Which being so horrible, so bloody, must
    Lead on to some foul issue.
[To ANTIGONUS]  You, Sir, come you hither.
You that have been so tenderly officious
    With Lady Margery, your midwife there,
    To save this bastard's life- for 'tis a bastard,
    So sure as this beard's grey- what will you adventure
    To save this brat's life?
Please your Highness, posts
    From those you sent to th' oracle are come
    An hour since.
So please you, sir, their speed
    Hath been beyond account.
Prepare you, lords;
    Summon a session, that we may arraign
    Our most disloyal lady; for, as she hath
    Been publicly accus'd, so shall she have
    A just and open trial.
For Polixenes,
    With whom I am accus'd, I do confess
    I lov'd him as in honour he requir'd;
    With such a kind of love as might become
    A lady like me; with a love even such,
    So and no other, as yourself commanded;
    Which not to have done, I think had been in me
    Both disobedience and ingratitude
    To you and toward your friend; whose love had spoke,
    Ever since it could speak, from an infant, freely,
    That it was yours.
You knew of his departure, as you know
    What you have underta'en to do in's absence.
As you were past all shame-
    Those of your fact are so- so past all truth;
    Which to deny concerns more than avails; for as
    Thy brat hath been cast out, like to itself,
    No father owning it- which is indeed
    More criminal in thee than it- so thou
    Shalt feel our justice; in whose easiest passage
    Look for no less than death.
The bug which you would fright me with I seek.
But yet hear this- mistake me not: no life,
    I prize it not a straw, but for mine honour  
    Which I would free- if I shall be condemn'd
    Upon surmises, all proofs sleeping else
    But what your jealousies awake, I tell you
    'Tis rigour, and not law.
You here shall swear upon this sword of justice
    That you, Cleomenes and Dion, have  
    Been both at Delphos, and from thence have brought
    This seal'd-up oracle, by the hand deliver'd
    Of great Apollo's priest; and that since then
    You have not dar'd to break the holy seal
    Nor read the secrets in't.
Beseech you tenderly apply to her
    Some remedies for life.
He, most humane
    And fill'd with honour, to my kingly guest
    Unclasp'd my practice, quit his fortunes here,
    Which you knew great, and to the certain hazard
    Of all incertainties himself commended,
    No richer than his honour.
If you can bring
    Tincture or lustre in her lip, her eye,
    Heat outwardly or breath within, I'll serve you
    As I would do the gods.
Say no more;
    Howe'er the business goes, you have made fault
    I' th' boldness of your speech.
Do not receive affliction
    At my petition; I beseech you, rather  
    Let me be punish'd that have minded you
    Of what you should forget.
I'll speak of her no more, nor of your children;
    I'll not remember you of my own lord,
    Who is lost too.
Take your patience to you,
    And I'll say nothing.
I would there were no age between ten and three and
    twenty, or that youth would sleep out the rest; for there is
    nothing in the between but getting wenches with child, wronging
    the ancientry, stealing, fighting-  [Horns]  Hark you now!
But I am
    not to say it is a sea, for it is now the sky; betwixt the
    firmament and it you cannot thrust a bodkin's point.
I would you did but see how it chafes, how it rages, how it
    takes up the shore!
Sometimes to see 'em, and not to  
    see 'em; now the ship boring the moon with her mainmast, and anon
    swallowed with yeast and froth, as you'd thrust a cork into a
    hogshead.
I would you had been by the ship-side, to have help'd her;
    there your charity would have lack'd footing.
You're a made old man; if the sins of your youth are
    forgiven you, you're well to live.
Go you the next way with your findings.
Marry, will I; and you shall help to put him i' th' ground.
Your patience this allowing,
    I turn my glass, and give my scene such growing
    As you had slept between.
Leontes leaving-
    Th' effects of his fond jealousies so grieving  
    That he shuts up himself- imagine me,
    Gentle spectators, that I now may be
    In fair Bohemia; and remember well
    I mention'd a son o' th' King's, which Florizel
    I now name to you; and with speed so pace
    To speak of Perdita, now grown in grace
    Equal with wond'ring.
Of this allow,
    If ever you have spent time worse ere now;
    If never, yet that Time himself doth say
    He wishes earnestly you never may.
No, good sweet sir; no, I beseech you, sir.
Offer me no
    money, I pray you; that kills my heart.
What manner of fellow was he that robb'd you?
His vices, you would say; there's no virtue whipt out of the
    court.
Not a more cowardly rogue in all Bohemia; if you had but
    look'd big and spit at him, he'd have run.
I must confess to you, sir, I am no fighter; I am false
    of heart that way, and that he knew, I warrant him.
How do you now?
I will even take my leave of you and pace softly towards my
    kinsman's.
Prosper you, sweet sir!
I'll be with
    you at your sheep-shearing too.
These your unusual weeds to each part of you
    Do give a life- no shepherdess, but Flora
    Peering in April's front.
This your sheep-shearing
    Is as a meeting of the petty gods,
    And you the Queen on't.
Your high self,
    The gracious mark o' th' land, you have obscur'd
    With a swain's wearing; and me, poor lowly maid,
    Most goddess-like prank'd up.
But that our feasts
    In every mess have folly, and the feeders
    Digest it with a custom, I should blush
    To see you so attir'd; swoon, I think,
    To show myself a glass.
Now Jove afford you cause!
Even now I tremble
    To think your father, by some accident,
    Should pass this way, as you did.
One of these two must be necessities,
    Which then will speak, that you must change this purpose,
    Or I my life.
Be merry, gentle;
    Strangle such thoughts as these with any thing
    That you behold the while.
O Lady Fortune,
    Stand you auspicious!
You are retired,
    As if you were a feasted one, and not
    The hostess of the meeting.
Pray you bid
    These unknown friends to's welcome, for it is  
    A way to make us better friends, more known.
Come, quench your blushes, and present yourself
    That which you are, Mistress o' th' Feast.
Reverend sirs,
    For you there's rosemary and rue; these keep
    Seeming and savour all the winter long.
Grace and remembrance be to you both!
Shepherdess-
    A fair one are you- well you fit our ages
    With flow'rs of winter.
Wherefore, gentle maiden,
    Do you neglect them?
Say there be;
    Yet nature is made better by no mean
    But nature makes that mean; so over that art
    Which you say adds to nature, is an art
    That nature makes.
Here's flow'rs for you:
    Hot lavender, mints, savory, marjoram;
    The marigold, that goes to bed wi' th' sun,
    And with him rises weeping; these are flow'rs
    Of middle summer, and I think they are given
    To men of middle age.
You'd be so lean that blasts of January
    Would blow you through and through.
O, these I lack
    To make you garlands of, and my sweet friend
    To strew him o'er and o'er!
What you do
    Still betters what is done.
When you speak, sweet,
    I'd have you do it ever.
When you sing,
    I'd have you buy and sell so; so give alms;
    Pray so; and, for the ord'ring your affairs,
    To sing them too.
When you do dance, I wish you
    A wave o' th' sea, that you might ever do
    Nothing but that; move still, still so,
    And own no other function.
Each your doing,
    So singular in each particular,
    Crowns what you are doing in the present deeds,
    That all your acts are queens.
But that your youth,
    And the true blood which peeps fairly through't,
    Do plainly give you out an unstain'd shepherd,
    With wisdom I might fear, my Doricles,
    You woo'd me the false way.
I think you have  
    As little skill to fear as I have purpose
    To put you to't.
O master, if you did but hear the pedlar at the door, you
    would never dance again after a tabor and pipe; no, the bagpipe
    could not move you.
He sings several tunes faster than you'll
    tell money; he utters them as he had eaten ballads, and all men's
    ears grew to his tunes.
Why he sings 'em over as they were gods or goddesses; you
    would think a smock were she-angel, he so chants to the
    sleeve-hand and the work about the square on't.
You have of these pedlars that have more in them than you'd
    think, sister.
He hath promis'd you more than that, or there be liars.
He hath paid you all he promis'd you.
May be he has paid you
    more, which will shame you to give him again.
Is there not
    milking-time, when you are going to bed, or kiln-hole, to whistle
    off these secrets, but you must be tittle-tattling before all our  
    guests?
Come, you promis'd me a tawdry-lace, and a pair
    of sweet gloves.
Is it true, think you?
Pray you now, buy it.
Is it true too, think you?
' There's scarce a maid westward but  
    she sings it; 'tis in request, I can tell you.
I can bear my part; you must know 'tis my occupation.
Have at it with you.
Get you hence, for I must go
             Where it fits not you to know.
Wenches, I'll buy for you both.
And you shall pay well for 'em.
Exit AUTOLYCUS, Singing

             Will you buy any tape,
             Or lace for your cape,
           My dainty duck, my dear-a?
I know, sir, we weary you.
[To SHEPHERD]  O, father, you'll know more of that
      hereafter.
Sooth, when I was young
    And handed love as you do, I was wont
    To load my she with knacks; I would have ransack'd
    The pedlar's silken treasury and have pour'd it
    To her acceptance: you have let him go
    And nothing marted with him.
If your lass
    Interpretation should abuse and call this
    Your lack of love or bounty, you were straited  
    For a reply, at least if you make a care
    Of happy holding her.
I have put you out.
But to your protestation; let me hear
    What you profess.
But, my daughter,
    Say you the like to him?
And, friends unknown, you shall bear witness to't:
    I give my daughter to him, and will make
    Her portion equal his.
One being dead,
    I shall have more than you can dream of yet;
    Enough then for your wonder.
Soft, swain, awhile, beseech you;
    Have you a father?
Pray you, once more,
    Is not your father grown incapable
    Of reasonable affairs?
I yield all this;
    But, for some other reasons, my grave sir,
    Which 'tis not fit you know, I not acquaint
    My father of this business.
And you, enchantment,
    Worthy enough a herdsman- yea, him too
    That makes himself, but for our honour therein,
    Unworthy thee- if ever henceforth thou
    These rural latches to his entrance open,
    Or hoop his body more with thy embraces,
    I will devise a death as cruel for thee
    As thou art tender to't.
[To FLORIZEL]  Will't please you, sir, be gone?
I told you what would come of this.
Beseech you,
    Of your own state take care.
Why look you so upon me?
How often have I told you 'twould be thus!
Therefore, I pray you,
    As you have ever been my father's honour'd friend,
    When he shall miss me- as, in faith, I mean not
    To see him any more- cast your good counsels
    Upon his passion.
This you may know,
    And so deliver: I am put to sea
    With her who here I cannot hold on shore.
[Takes her aside]
    [To CAMILLO]  I'll hear you by and by.
Very nobly
    Have you deserv'd.
Well, my lord,
    If you may please to think I love the King,
    And through him what's nearest to him, which is
    Your gracious self, embrace but my direction.
If your more ponderous and settled project
    May suffer alteration, on mine honour,
    I'll point you where you shall have such receiving
    As shall become your Highness; where you may
    Enjoy your mistress, from the whom, I see,
    There's no disjunction to be made but by,
    As heavens forfend!
Have you thought on
    A place whereto you'll go?
This follows, if you will not change your purpose
    But undergo this flight: make for Sicilia,
    And there present yourself and your fair princess-
    For so, I see, she must be- fore Leontes.
Sir,
    The manner of your bearing towards him, with
    What you as from your father shall deliver,
    Things known betwixt us three, I'll write you down;
    The which shall point you forth at every sitting
    What you must say, that he shall not perceive
    But that you have your father's bosom there
    And speak his very heart.
I am bound to you.
A course more promising
    Than a wild dedication of yourselves
    To unpath'd waters, undream'd shores, most certain  
    To miseries enough; no hope to help you,
    But as you shake off one to take another;
    Nothing so certain as your anchors, who
    Do their best office if they can but stay you
    Where you'll be loath to be.
Besides, you know
    Prosperity's the very bond of love,
    Whose fresh complexion and whose heart together
    Affliction alters.
Yea, say you so?
Your pardon, sir; for this
    I'll blush you thanks.
I think you know my fortunes
    Do all lie there.
It shall be so my care
    To have you royally appointed as if
    The scene you play were mine.
For instance, sir,
    That you may know you shall not want- one word.
Nay, but my letters, by this means being there
    So soon as you arrive, shall clear that doubt.
And those that you'll procure from King Leontes?
Happy be you!
All that you speak shows fair.
Are you in camest, sir?
- you must retire yourself
    Into some covert; take your sweetheart's hat
    And pluck it o'er your brows, muffle your face,
    Dismantle you, and, as you can, disliken
    The truth of your own seeming, that you may-
    For I do fear eyes over- to shipboard  
    Get undescried.
Have you done there?
Nay, you shall have no hat.
Pray you a word.
See, see; what a man you are now!
Show those things you found about her, those
    secret things- all but what she has with her.
This being done,
    let the law go whistle; I warrant you.
Indeed, brother-in-law was the farthest off you could have
    been to him; and then your blood had been the dearer by I know
    how much an ounce.
Whither are you
    bound?
A lie: you are rough and hairy.
Your worship had like to have given us one, if you had not  
    taken yourself with the manner.
Are you a courtier, an't like you, sir?
I know not, an't like you.
Advocate's the court-word for a pheasant; say you have none.
Think you so, sir?
Has the old man e'er a son, sir, do you hear, an't like you,
    sir?
Tell me, for you seem
    to be honest plain men, what you have to the King.
Being
    something gently consider'd, I'll bring you where he is aboard,  
    tender your persons to his presence, whisper him in your behalfs;
    and if it be in man besides the King to effect your suits, here
    is man shall do it.
An't please you, sir, to undertake the business for us,
    here is that gold I have.
I'll make it as much more, and leave
    this young man in pawn till I bring it you.
Are you a party in this
    business?
Sir, I will give you as much as this
    old man does, when the business is performed; and remain, as he
    says, your pawn till it be brought you.
I will trust you.
Walk before toward the sea-side; go on
    the right-hand; I will but look upon the hedge, and follow you.
Sir, you have done enough, and have perform'd
    A saint-like sorrow.
No fault could you make
    Which you have not redeem'd; indeed, paid down
    More penitence than done trespass.
If, one by one, you wedded all the world,
    Or from the all that are took something good
    To make a perfect woman, she you kill'd  
    Would be unparallel'd.
If you would not so,
    You pity not the state, nor the remembrance
    Of his most sovereign name; consider little
    What dangers, by his Highness' fail of issue,
    May drop upon his kingdom and devour
    Incertain lookers-on.
Were I the ghost that walk'd, I'd bid you mark
    Her eye, and tell me for what dull part in't  
    You chose her; then I'd shriek, that even your ears
    Should rift to hear me; and the words that follow'd
    Should be 'Remember mine.
Will you swear
    Never to marry but by my free leave?
Yet, if my lord will marry- if you will, sir,
    No remedy but you will- give me the office
    To choose you a queen.
His princess, say you, with him?
Sir, you yourself
    Have said and writ so, but your writing now
    Is colder than that theme: 'She had not been,
    Nor was not to be equall'd.
' Thus your verse
    Flow'd with her beauty once; 'tis shrewdly ebb'd,
    To say you have seen a better.
Your mother was most true to wedlock, Prince;
    For she did print your royal father off,
    Conceiving you.
Were I but twenty-one,
    Your father's image is so hit in you
    His very air, that I should call you brother,
    As I did him, and speak of something wildly
    By us perform'd before.
By his command
    Have I here touch'd Sicilia, and from him  
    Give you all greetings that a king, at friend,
    Can send his brother; and, but infirmity,
    Which waits upon worn times, hath something seiz'd
    His wish'd ability, he had himself
    The lands and waters 'twixt your throne and his
    Measur'd, to look upon you; whom he loves,
    He bade me say so, more than all the sceptres
    And those that bear them living.
The blessed gods
    Purge all infection from our air whilst you
    Do climate here!
You have a holy father,
    A graceful gentleman, against whose person,
    So sacred as it is, I have done sin,
    For which the heavens, taking angry note,
    Have left me issueless; and your father's blest,
    As he from heaven merits it, with you,  
    Worthy his goodness.
What might I have been,
    Might I a son and daughter now have look'd on,
    Such goodly things as you!
Please you, great sir,
    Bohemia greets you from himself by me;
    Desires you to attach his son, who has-
    His dignity and duty both cast off-
    Fled from his father, from his hopes, and with
    A shepherd's daughter.
I am sorry,
    Most sorry, you have broken from his liking
    Where you were tied in duty; and as sorry
    Your choice is not so rich in worth as beauty,
    That you might well enjoy her.
Beseech you, sir,
    Remember since you ow'd no more to time
    Than I do now.
Not a month
    Fore your queen died, she was more worth such gazes
    Than what you look on now.
Your honour not o'erthrown by your desires,
    I am friend to them and you.
Beseech you, sir, were you present at this relation?
Enter another GENTLEMAN

    Here comes the Lady Paulina's steward; he can deliver you more.
That which you hear you'll swear you see, there is
    such unity in the proofs.
Did  
    you see the meeting of the two kings?
Then you have lost a sight which was to be seen,
    cannot be spoken of.
There might you have beheld one joy crown
    another, so and in such manner that it seem'd sorrow wept to take
    leave of them; for their joy waded in tears.
What, pray you, became of Antigonus, that carried
    hence the child?
See you these  
    clothes?
Say you see them not and think me still no gentleman
    born.
I know you are now, sir, a gentleman born.
So you have; but I was a gentleman born before my father;
    for the King's son took me by the hand and call'd me brother; and
    then the two kings call'd my father brother; and then the Prince,
    my brother, and the Princess, my sister, call'd my father father.
I humbly beseech you, sir, to pardon me all the faults I
    have committed to your worship, and to give me your good report
    to the Prince my master.
All my services
    You have paid home; but that you have vouchsaf'd,
    With your crown'd brother and these your contracted
    Heirs of your kingdoms, my poor house to visit,
    It is a surplus of your grace, which never
    My life may last to answer.
O Paulina,
    We honour you with trouble; but we came
    To see the statue of our queen.
As she liv'd peerless,
    So her dead likeness, I do well believe,
    Excels whatever yet you look'd upon
    Or hand of man hath done; therefore I keep it
    Lonely, apart.
First, you, my liege.
Dear my brother,
    Let him that was the cause of this have pow'r
    To take off so much grief from you as he
    Will piece up in himself.
Indeed, my lord,
    If I had thought the sight of my poor image
    Would thus have wrought you- for the stone is mine-
    I'd not have show'd it.
No longer shall you gaze on't, lest your fancy
    May think anon it moves.
See, my lord,
    Would you not deem it breath'd, and that those veins
    Did verily bear blood?
I am sorry, sir, I have thus far stirr'd you; but
    I could afflict you farther.
The ruddiness upon her lip is wet;
    You'll mar it if you kiss it; stain your own
    With oily painting.
Either forbear,
    Quit presently the chapel, or resolve you
    For more amazement.
If you can behold it,
    I'll make the statue move indeed, descend,
    And take you by the hand, but then you'll think-
    Which I protest against- I am assisted
    By wicked powers.
What you can make her do
    I am content to look on; what to speak
    I am content to hear; for 'tis as easy
    To make her speak as move.
Bequeath to death your numbness, for from him
    Dear life redeems you.
Do not shun her
    Until you see her die again; for then
    You kill her double.
When she was young you woo'd her; now in age
    Is she become the suitor?
That she is living,
    Were it but told you, should be hooted at
    Like an old tale; but it appears she lives
    Though yet she speak not.
Please you to interpose, fair madam.
'Father,' she says, 'though in me you behold  
  The injury of many a blasting hour,
  Let it not tell your judgement I am old:
  Not age, but sorrow, over me hath power.
'"All my offences that abroad you see
  Are errors of the blood, none of the mind;
  Love made them not; with acture they may be,
  Where neither party is nor true nor kind.
'"Lo, all these trophies of affections hot,
  Of pensived and subdued desires the tender,
  Nature hath charged me that I hoard them not,
  But yield them up where I myself must render-
  That is, to you, my origin and ender;
  For these, of force, must your oblations be,
  Since I their altar, you enpatron me.
'"O then advance of yours that phraseless hand
  Whose white weighs down the airy scale of praise;
  Take all these similes to your own command,
  Hallowed with sighs that burning lungs did raise;
  What me your minister for you obeys  
  Works under you; and to your audit comes
  Their distract parcels in combined sums.
'"How mighty then you are, O hear me tell!
I strong o'er them, and you o'er me being strong,
  Must for your victory us all congest,
  As compound love to physic your cold breast.
'"Now all these hearts that do on mine depend,
  Feeling it break, with bleeding groans they pine,
  And supplicant their sighs to your extend,
  To leave the batt'ry that you make 'gainst mine,
  Lending soft audience to my sweet design,
  And credent soul to that strong-bonded oath,
  That shall prefer and undertake my troth.